Eddard Stark had left before dawn, Septa Mordane informed Sansa as they broke their fast. “The king sent for him. Another hunt, I do believe. There are still wild aurochs in these lands, I am told.”
“I’ve never seen an aurochs,” Sansa said, feeding a piece of bacon to Lady under the table. The direwolf took it from her hand, as delicate as a queen.
Septa Mordane sniffed in disapproval. “A noble lady does not feed dogs at her table,” she said, breaking off another piece of comb and letting the honey drip down onto her bread.
“She’s not a dog, she’s a direwolf,” Sansa pointed out as Lady licked her fingers with a rough tongue. “Anyway, Father said we could keep them with us if we want.”
The septa was not appeased. “You’re a good girl, Sansa, but I do vow, when it comes to that creature you’re as willful as your sister Arya.” She scowled. “And where is Arya this morning?”
“She wasn’t hungry,” Sansa said, knowing full well that her sister had probably stolen down to the kitchen hours ago and wheedled a breakfast out of some cook’s boy.
“Do remind her to dress nicely today. The grey velvet, perhaps. We are all invited to ride with the queen and Princess Myrcella in the royal wheelhouse, and we must look our best.”
Sansa already looked her best. She had brushed out her long auburn hair until it shone, and picked her nicest blue silks. She had been looking forward to today for more than a week. It was a great honor to ride with the queen, and besides, Prince Joffrey might be there. Her betrothed. Just thinking it made her feel a strange fluttering inside, even though they were not to marry for years and years. Sansa did not really know Joffrey yet, but she was already in love with him. He was all she ever dreamt her prince should be, tall and handsome and strong, with hair like gold. She treasured every chance to spend time with him, few as they were. The only thing that scared her about today was Arya. Arya had a way of ruining everything. You never knew what she would do. “I’ll tell her,” Sansa said uncertainly, “but she’ll dress the way she always does.” She hoped it wouldn’t be too embarrassing. “May I be excused?”
“You may.” Septa Mordane helped herself to more bread and honey, and Sansa slid from the bench. Lady followed at her heels as she ran from the inn’s common room.
Outside, she stood for a moment amidst the shouts and curses and the creak of wooden wheels as the men broke down the tents and pavilions and loaded the wagons for another day’s march. The inn was a sprawling three-story structure of pale stone, the biggest that Sansa had ever seen, but even so, it had accommodations for less than a third of the king’s party, which had swollen to more than four hundred with the addition of her father’s household and the freeriders who had joined them on the road.
She found Arya on the banks of the Trident, trying to hold Nymeria still while she brushed dried mud from her fur. The direwolf was not enjoying the process. Arya was wearing the same riding leathers she had worn yesterday and the day before.
“You better put on something pretty,” Sansa told her. “Septa Mordane said so. We’re traveling in the queen’s wheelhouse with Princess Myrcella today.”
“I’m not,” Arya said, trying to brush a tangle out of Nymeria’s matted grey fur. “Mycah and I are going to ride upstream and look for rubies at the ford.”
“Rubies,” Sansa said, lost. “What rubies?”
Arya gave her a look like she was so stupid. “Rhaegar’s rubies. This is where King Robert killed him and won the crown.”
Sansa regarded her scrawny little sister in disbelief. “You can’t look for rubies, the princess is expecting us. The queen invited us both.”
“I don’t care,” Arya said. “The wheelhouse doesn’t even have windows, you can’t see a thing.”
“What could you want to see?” Sansa said, annoyed. She had been thrilled by the invitation, and her stupid sister was going to ruin everything, just as she’d feared. “It’s all just fields and farms and holdfasts.”
“It is not,” Arya said stubbornly. “If you came with us sometimes, you’d see.”
“I hate riding,” Sansa said fervently. “All it does is get you soiled and dusty and sore.”
Arya shrugged. “Hold still,” she snapped at Nymeria, “I’m not hurting you.” Then to Sansa she said, “When we were crossing the Neck, I counted thirty-six flowers I never saw before, and Mycah showed me a lizard-lion.”
Sansa shuddered. They had been twelve days crossing the Neck, rumbling down a crooked causeway through an endless black bog, and she had hated every moment of it. The air had been damp and clammy, the causeway so narrow they could not even make proper camp at night, they had to stop right on the kingsroad. Dense thickets of half-drowned trees pressed close around them, branches dripping with curtains of pale fungus. Huge flowers bloomed in the mud and floated on pools of stagnant water, but if you were stupid enough to leave the causeway to pluck them, there were quicksands waiting to suck you down, and snakes watching from the trees, and lizard-lions floating half-submerged in the water, like black logs with eyes and teeth.
None of which stopped Arya, of course. One day she came back grinning her horsey grin, her hair all tangled and her clothes covered in mud, clutching a raggedy bunch of purple and green flowers for Father. Sansa kept hoping he would tell Arya to behave herself and act like the highborn lady she was supposed to be, but he never did, he only hugged her and thanked her for the flowers. That just made her worse.
Then it turned out the purple flowers were called poison kisses, and Arya got a rash on her arms. Sansa would have thought that might have taught her a lesson, but Arya laughed about it, and the next day she rubbed mud all over her arms like some ignorant bog woman just because her friend Mycah told her it would stop the itching. She had bruises on her arms and shoulders too, dark purple welts and faded green-and-yellow splotches; Sansa had seen them when her sister undressed for sleep. How she had gotten those only the seven gods knew.
Arya was still going on, brushing out Nymeria’s tangles and chattering about things she’d seen on the trek south. “Last week we found this haunted watchtower, and the day before we chased a herd of wild horses. You should have seen them run when they caught a scent of Nymeria.” The wolf wriggled in her grasp and Arya scolded her. “Stop that, I have to do the other side, you’re all muddy.”
“You’re not supposed to leave the column,” Sansa reminded her. “Father said so.”
Arya shrugged. “I didn’t go far. Anyway, Nymeria was with me the whole time. I don’t always go off, either. Sometimes it’s fun just to ride along with the wagons and talk to people.”
Sansa knew all about the sorts of people Arya liked to talk to: squires and grooms and serving girls, old men and naked children, rough-spoken freeriders of uncertain birth. Arya would make friends with anybody. This Mycah was the worst; a butcher’s boy, thirteen and wild, he slept in the meat wagon and smelled of the slaughtering block. Just the sight of him was enough to make Sansa feel sick, but Arya seemed to prefer his company to hers.
Sansa was running out of patience now. “You have to come with me,” she told her sister firmly. “You can’t refuse the queen. Septa Mordane will expect you.”
Arya ignored her. She gave a hard yank with the brush. Nymeria growled and spun away, affronted. “Come back here!”
“There’s going to be lemon cakes and tea,” Sansa went on, all adult and reasonable. Lady brushed against her leg. Sansa scratched her ears the way she liked, and Lady sat beside her on her haunches, watching Arya chase Nymeria. “Why would you want to ride a smelly old horse and get all sore and sweaty when you could recline on feather pillows and eat cakes with the queen?”
“I don’t like the queen,” Arya said casually. Sansa sucked in her breath, shocked that even Arya would say such a thing, but her sister prattled on, heedless. “She won’t even let me bring Nymeria.” She thrust the brush under her belt and stalked her wolf. Nymeria watched her approach warily.
“A royal wheelhouse is no place for a wolf,” Sansa said. “And Princess Myrcella is afraid of them, you know that.”
“Myrcella is a little baby.” Arya grabbed Nymeria around her neck, but the moment she pulled out the brush again the direwolf wriggled free and bounded off. Frustrated, Arya threw down the brush. “Bad wolf!” she shouted.
Sansa couldn’t help but smile a little. The kennelmaster once told her that an animal takes after its master. She gave Lady a quick little hug. Lady licked her cheek. Sansa giggled. Arya heard and whirled around, glaring. “I don’t care what you say, I’m going out riding.” Her long horsey face got the stubborn look that meant she was going to do something willful.
“Gods be true, Arya, sometimes you act like such a child,” Sansa said. “I’ll go by myself then. It will be ever so much nicer that way. Lady and I will eat all the lemon cakes and just have the best time without you.”
She turned to walk off, but Arya shouted after her, “They won’t let you bring Lady either.” She was gone before Sansa could think of a reply, chasing Nymeria along the river.
Alone and humiliated, Sansa took the long way back to the inn, where she knew Septa Mordane would be waiting. Lady padded quietly by her side. She was almost in tears. All she wanted was for things to be nice and pretty, the way they were in the songs. Why couldn’t Arya be sweet and delicate and kind, like Princess Myrcella? She would have liked a sister like that.
Sansa could never understand how two sisters, born only two years apart, could be so different. It would have been easier if Arya had been a bastard, like their half brother Jon. She even looked like Jon, with the long face and brown hair of the Starks, and nothing of their lady mother in her face or her coloring. And Jon’s mother had been common, or so people whispered. Once, when she was littler, Sansa had even asked Mother if perhaps there hadn’t been some mistake. Perhaps the grumkins had stolen her real sister. But Mother had only laughed and said no, Arya was her daughter and Sansa’s trueborn sister, blood of their blood. Sansa could not think why Mother would want to lie about it, so she supposed it had to be true.
As she neared the center of camp, her distress was quickly forgotten. A crowd had gathered around the queen’s wheelhouse. Sansa heard excited voices buzzing like a hive of bees. The doors had been thrown open, she saw, and the queen stood at the top of the wooden steps, smiling down at someone. She heard her saying, “The council does us great honor, my good lords.”
“What’s happening?” she asked a squire she knew.
“The council sent riders from King’s Landing to escort us the rest of the way,” he told her. “An honor guard for the king.”
Anxious to see, Sansa let Lady clear a path through the crowd. People moved aside hastily for the direwolf. When she got closer, she saw two knights kneeling before the queen, in armor so fine and gorgeous that it made her blink.
One knight wore an intricate suit of white enameled scales, brilliant as a field of new-fallen snow, with silver chasings and clasps that glittered in the sun. When he removed his helm, Sansa saw that he was an old man with hair as pale as his armor, yet he seemed strong and graceful for all that. From his shoulders hung the pure white cloak of the Kingsguard.
His companion was a man near twenty whose armor was steel plate of a deep forest-green. He was the handsomest man Sansa had ever set eyes upon; tall and powerfully made, with jet-black hair that fell to his shoulders and framed a clean-shaven face, and laughing green eyes to match his armor. Cradled under one arm was an antlered helm, its magnificent rack shimmering in gold.
At first Sansa did not notice the third stranger. He did not kneel with the others. He stood to one side, beside their horses, a gaunt grim man who watched the proceedings in silence. His face was pockmarked and beardless, with deepset eyes and hollow cheeks. Though he was not an old man, only a few wisps of hair remained to him, sprouting above his ears, but those he had grown long as a woman’s. His armor was iron-grey chainmail over layers of boiled leather, plain and unadorned, and it spoke of age and hard use. Above his right shoulder the stained leather hilt of the blade strapped to his back was visible; a two-handed greatsword, too long to be worn at his side.
“The king is gone hunting, but I know he will be pleased to see you when he returns,” the queen was saying to the two knights who knelt before her, but Sansa could not take her eyes off the third man. He seemed to feel the weight of her gaze. Slowly he turned his head. Lady growled. A terror as overwhelming as anything Sansa Stark had ever felt filled her suddenly. She stepped backward and bumped into someone.
Strong hands grasped her by the shoulders, and for a moment Sansa thought it was her father, but when she turned, it was the burned face of Sandor Clegane looking down at her, his mouth twisted in a terrible mockery of a smile. “You are shaking, girl,” he said, his voice rasping. “Do I frighten you so much?”
He did, and had since she had first laid eyes on the ruin that fire had made of his face, though it seemed to her now that he was not half so terrifying as the other. Still, Sansa wrenched away from him, and the Hound laughed, and Lady moved between them, rumbling a warning. Sansa dropped to her knees to wrap her arms around the wolf. They were all gathered around gaping, she could feel their eyes on her, and here and there she heard muttered comments and titters of laughter.
“A wolf,” a man said, and someone else said, “Seven hells, that’s a direwolf,” and the first man said, “What’s it doing in camp?” and the Hound’s rasping voice replied, “The Starks use them for wet nurses,” and Sansa realized that the two stranger knights were looking down on her and Lady, swords in their hands, and then she was frightened again, and ashamed. Tears filled her eyes.
She heard the queen say, “Joffrey, go to her.”
And her prince was there.
“Leave her alone,” Joffrey said. He stood over her, beautiful in blue wool and black leather, his golden curls shining in the sun like a crown. He gave her his hand, drew her to her feet. “What is it, sweet lady? Why are you afraid? No one will hurt you. Put away your swords, all of you. The wolf is her little pet, that’s all.” He looked at Sandor Clegane. “And you, dog, away with you, you’re scaring my betrothed.”
The Hound, ever faithful, bowed and slid away quietly through the press. Sansa struggled to steady herself. She felt like such a fool. She was a Stark of Winterfell, a noble lady, and someday she would be a queen. “It was not him, my sweet prince,” she tried to explain. “It was the other one.”
The two stranger knights exchanged a look. “Payne?” chuckled the young man in the green armor.
The older man in white spoke to Sansa gently. “Ofttimes Ser Ilyn frightens me as well, sweet lady. He has a fearsome aspect.”
“As well he should.” The queen had descended from the wheelhouse. The spectators parted to make way for her. “If the wicked do not fear the King’s Justice, you have put the wrong man in the office.”
Sansa finally found her words. “Then surely you have chosen the right one, Your Grace,” she said, and a gale of laughter erupted all around her.
“Well spoken, child,” said the old man in white. “As befits the daughter of Eddard Stark. I am honored to know you, however irregular the manner of our meeting. I am Ser Barristan Selmy, of the Kingsguard.” He bowed.
Sansa knew the name, and now the courtesies that Septa Mordane had taught her over the years came back to her. “The Lord Commander of the Kingsguard,” she said, “and councillor to Robert our king and to Aerys Targaryen before him. The honor is mine, good knight. Even in the far north, the singers praise the deeds of Barristan the Bold.”
The green knight laughed again. “Barristan the Old, you mean. Don’t flatter him too sweetly, child, he thinks overmuch of himself already.” He smiled at her. “Now, wolf girl, if you can put a name to me as well, then I must concede that you are truly our Hand’s daughter.”
Joffrey stiffened beside her. “Have a care how you address my betrothed.”
“I can answer,” Sansa said quickly, to quell her prince’s anger. She smiled at the green knight. “Your helmet bears golden antlers, my lord. The stag is the sigil of the royal House. King Robert has two brothers. By your extreme youth, you can only be Renly Baratheon, Lord of Storm’s End and councillor to the king, and so I name you.”
Ser Barristan chuckled. “By his extreme youth, he can only be a prancing jackanapes, and so I name him.”
There was general laughter, led by Lord Renly himself. The tension of a few moments ago was gone, and Sansa was beginning to feel comfortable … until Ser Ilyn Payne shouldered two men aside, and stood before her, unsmiling. He did not say a word. Lady bared her teeth and began to growl, a low rumble full of menace, but this time Sansa silenced the wolf with a gentle hand to the head. “I am sorry if I offended you, Ser Ilyn,” she said.
She waited for an answer, but none came. As the headsman looked at her, his pale colorless eyes seemed to strip the clothes away from her, and then the skin, leaving her soul naked before him. Still silent, he turned and walked away.
Sansa did not understand. She looked at her prince. “Did I say something wrong, Your Grace? Why will he not speak to me?”
“Ser Ilyn has not been feeling talkative these past fourteen years,” Lord Renly commented with a sly smile.
Joffrey gave his uncle a look of pure loathing, then took Sansa’s hands in his own. “Aerys Targaryen had his tongue ripped out with hot pincers.”
“He speaks most eloquently with his sword, however,” the queen said, “and his devotion to our realm is unquestioned.” Then she smiled graciously and said, “Sansa, the good councillors and I must speak together until the king returns with your father. I fear we shall have to postpone your day with Myrcella. Please give your sweet sister my apologies. Joffrey, perhaps you would be so kind as to entertain our guest today.”
“It would be my pleasure, Mother,” Joffrey said very formally. He took her by the arm and led her away from the wheelhouse, and Sansa’s spirits took flight. A whole day with her prince! She gazed at Joffrey worshipfully. He was so gallant, she thought. The way he had rescued her from Ser Ilyn and the Hound, why, it was almost like the songs, like the time Serwyn of the Mirror Shield saved the Princess Daeryssa from the giants, or Prince Aemon the Dragonknight championing Queen Naerys’s honor against evil Ser Morgil’s slanders.
The touch of Joffrey’s hand on her sleeve made her heart beat faster. “What would you like to do?”
Be with you, Sansa thought, but she said, “Whatever you’d like to do, my prince.”
Joffrey reflected a moment. “We could go riding.”
“Oh, I love riding,” Sansa said.
Joffrey glanced back at Lady, who was following at their heels. “Your wolf is liable to frighten the horses, and my dog seems to frighten you. Let us leave them both behind and set off on our own, what do you say?”
Sansa hesitated. “If you like,” she said uncertainly. “I suppose I could tie Lady up.” She did not quite understand, though. “I didn’t know you had a dog …”
Joffrey laughed. “He’s my mother’s dog, in truth. She has set him to guard me, and so he does.”
“You mean the Hound,” she said. She wanted to hit herself for being so slow. Her prince would never love her if she seemed stupid. “Is it safe to leave him behind?”
Prince Joffrey looked annoyed that she would even ask. “Have no fear, lady. I am almost a man grown, and I don’t fight with wood like your brothers. All I need is this.” He drew his sword and showed it to her; a longsword adroitly shrunken to suit a boy of twelve, gleaming blue steel, castle-forged and double-edged, with a leather grip and a lion’s-head pommel in gold. Sansa exclaimed over it admiringly, and Joffrey looked pleased. “I call it Lion’s Tooth,” he said.
And so they left her direwolf and his bodyguard behind them, while they ranged east along the north bank of the Trident with no company save Lion’s Tooth.
It was a glorious day, a magical day. The air was warm and heavy with the scent of flowers, and the woods here had a gentle beauty that Sansa had never seen in the north. Prince Joffrey’s mount was a blood bay courser, swift as the wind, and he rode it with reckless abandon, so fast that Sansa was hard-pressed to keep up on her mare. It was a day for adventures. They explored the caves by the riverbank, and tracked a shadowcat to its lair, and when they grew hungry, Joffrey found a holdfast by its smoke and told them to fetch food and wine for their prince and his lady. They dined on trout fresh from the river, and Sansa drank more wine than she had ever drunk before. “My father only lets us have one cup, and only at feasts,” she confessed to her prince.
“My betrothed can drink as much as she wants,” Joffrey said, refilling her cup.
They went more slowly after they had eaten. Joffrey sang for her as they rode, his voice high and sweet and pure. Sansa was a little dizzy from the wine. “Shouldn’t we be starting back?” she asked.
“Soon,” Joffrey said. “The battleground is right up ahead, where the river bends. That was where my father killed Rhaegar Targaryen, you know. He smashed in his chest, crunch, right through the armor.” Joffrey swung an imaginary warhammer to show her how it was done. “Then my uncle Jaime killed old Aerys, and my father was king. What’s that sound?”
Sansa heard it too, floating through the woods, a kind of wooden clattering, snack snack snack. “I don’t know,” she said. It made her nervous, though. “Joffrey, let’s go back.”
“I want to see what it is.” Joffrey turned his horse in the direction of the sounds, and Sansa had no choice but to follow. The noises grew louder and more distinct, the clack of wood on wood, and as they grew closer they heard heavy breathing as well, and now and then a grunt.
“Someone’s there,” Sansa said anxiously. She found herself thinking of Lady, wishing the direwolf was with her.
“You’re safe with me.” Joffrey drew his Lion’s Tooth from its sheath. The sound of steel on leather made her tremble. “This way,” he said, riding through a stand of trees.
Beyond, in a clearing overlooking the river, they came upon a boy and a girl playing at knights. Their swords were wooden sticks, broom handles from the look of them, and they were rushing across the grass, swinging at each other lustily. The boy was years older, a head taller, and much stronger, and he was pressing the attack. The girl, a scrawny thing in soiled leathers, was dodging and managing to get her stick in the way of most of the boy’s blows, but not all. When she tried to lunge at him, he caught her stick with his own, swept it aside, and slid his wood down hard on her fingers. She cried out and lost her weapon.
Prince Joffrey laughed. The boy looked around, wide-eyed and startled, and dropped his stick in the grass. The girl glared at them, sucking on her knuckles to take the sting out, and Sansa was horrified. “Arya?” she called out incredulously.
“Go away,” Arya shouted back at them, angry tears in her eyes. “What are you doing here? Leave us alone.”
Joffrey glanced from Arya to Sansa and back again. “Your sister?” She nodded, blushing. Joffrey examined the boy, an ungainly lad with a coarse, freckled face and thick red hair. “And who are you, boy?” he asked in a commanding tone that took no notice of the fact that the other was a year his senior.
“Mycah,” the boy muttered. He recognized the prince and averted his eyes. “M’lord.”
“He’s the butcher’s boy,” Sansa said.
“He’s my friend,” Arya said sharply. “You leave him alone.”
“A butcher’s boy who wants to be a knight, is it?” Joffrey swung down from his mount, sword in hand. “Pick up your sword, butcher’s boy,” he said, his eyes bright with amusement. “Let us see how good you are.”
Mycah stood there, frozen with fear.
Joffrey walked toward him. “Go on, pick it up. Or do you only fight little girls?”
“She ast me to, m’lord,” Mycah said. “She ast me to.”
Sansa had only to glance at Arya and see the flush on her sister’s face to know the boy was telling the truth, but Joffrey was in no mood to listen. The wine had made him wild. “Are you going to pick up your sword?”
Mycah shook his head. “It’s only a stick, m’lord. It’s not no sword, it’s only a stick.”
“And you’re only a butcher’s boy, and no knight.” Joffrey lifted Lion’s Tooth and laid its point on Mycah’s cheek below the eye, as the butcher’s boy stood trembling. “That was my lady’s sister you were hitting, do you know that?” A bright bud of blood blossomed where his sword pressed into Mycah’s flesh, and a slow red line trickled down the boy’s cheek.
“Stop it!” Arya screamed. She grabbed up her fallen stick.
Sansa was afraid. “Arya, you stay out of this.”
“I won’t hurt him … much,” Prince Joffrey told Arya, never taking his eyes off the butcher’s boy.
Arya went for him.
Sansa slid off her mare, but she was too slow. Arya swung with both hands. There was a loud crack as the wood split against the back of the prince’s head, and then everything happened at once before Sansa’s horrified eyes. Joffrey staggered and whirled around, roaring curses. Mycah ran for the trees as fast as his legs would take him. Arya swung at the prince again, but this time Joffrey caught the blow on Lion’s Tooth and sent her broken stick flying from her hands. The back of his head was all bloody and his eyes were on fire. Sansa was shrieking, “No, no, stop it, stop it, both of you, you’re spoiling it,” but no one was listening. Arya scooped up a rock and hurled it at Joffrey’s head. She hit his horse instead, and the blood bay reared and went galloping off after Mycah. “Stop it, don’t, stop it!” Sansa screamed. Joffrey slashed at Arya with his sword, screaming obscenities, terrible words, filthy words. Arya darted back, frightened now, but Joffrey followed, hounding her toward the woods, backing her up against a tree. Sansa didn’t know what to do. She watched helplessly, almost blind from her tears.
Then a grey blur flashed past her, and suddenly Nymeria was there, leaping, jaws closing around Joffrey’s sword arm. The steel fell from his fingers as the wolf knocked him off his feet, and they rolled in the grass, the wolf snarling and ripping at him, the prince shrieking in pain. “Get it off,” he screamed. “Get it off!”
Arya’s voice cracked like a whip. “Nymeria!”
The direwolf let go of Joffrey and moved to Arya’s side. The prince lay in the grass, whimpering, cradling his mangled arm. His shirt was soaked in blood. Arya said, “She didn’t hurt you … much.” She picked up Lion’s Tooth where it had fallen, and stood over him, holding the sword with both hands.
Joffrey made a scared whimpery sound as he looked up at her. “No,” he said, “don’t hurt me. I’ll tell my mother.”
“You leave him alone!” Sansa screamed at her sister.
Arya whirled and heaved the sword into the air, putting her whole body into the throw. The blue steel flashed in the sun as the sword spun out over the river. It hit the water and vanished with a splash. Joffrey moaned. Arya ran off to her horse, Nymeria loping at her heels.
After they had gone, Sansa went to Prince Joffrey. His eyes were closed in pain, his breath ragged. Sansa knelt beside him. “Joffrey,” she sobbed. “Oh, look what they did, look what they did. My poor prince. Don’t be afraid. I’ll ride to the holdfast and bring help for you.” Tenderly she reached out and brushed back his soft blond hair.
His eyes snapped open and looked at her, and there was nothing but loathing there, nothing but the vilest contempt. “Then go,” he spit at her. “And don’t touch me.”

Sansa rode to the Hand’s tourney with Septa Mordane and Jeyne Poole, in a litter with curtains of yellow silk so fine she could see right through them. They turned the whole world gold. Beyond the city walls, a hundred pavilions had been raised beside the river, and the common folk came out in the thousands to watch the games. The splendor of it all took Sansa’s breath away; the shining armor, the great chargers caparisoned in silver and gold, the shouts of the crowd, the banners snapping in the wind … and the knights themselves, the knights most of all.
“It is better than the songs,” she whispered when they found the places that her father had promised her, among the high lords and ladies. Sansa was dressed beautifully that day, in a green gown that brought out the auburn of her hair, and she knew they were looking at her and smiling.
They watched the heroes of a hundred songs ride forth, each more fabulous than the last. The seven knights of the Kingsguard took the field, all but Jaime Lannister in scaled armor the color of milk, their cloaks as white as fresh-fallen snow. Ser Jaime wore the white cloak as well, but beneath it he was shining gold from head to foot, with a lion’s-head helm and a golden sword. Ser Gregor Clegane, the Mountain That Rides, thundered past them like an avalanche. Sansa remembered Lord Yohn Royce, who had guested at Winterfell two years before. “His armor is bronze, thousands and thousands of years old, engraved with magic runes that ward him against harm,” she whispered to Jeyne. Septa Mordane pointed out Lord Jason Mallister, in indigo chased with silver, the wings of an eagle on his helm. He had cut down three of Rhaegar’s bannermen on the Trident. The girls giggled over the warrior priest Thoros of Myr, with his flapping red robes and shaven head, until the septa told them that he had once scaled the walls of Pyke with a flaming sword in hand.
Other riders Sansa did not know; hedge knights from the Fingers and Highgarden and the mountains of Dorne, unsung freeriders and new-made squires, the younger sons of high lords and the heirs of lesser houses. Younger men, most had done no great deeds as yet, but Sansa and Jeyne agreed that one day the Seven Kingdoms would resound to the sound of their names. Ser Balon Swann. Lord Bryce Caron of the Marches. Bronze Yohn’s heir, Ser Andar Royce, and his younger brother Ser Robar, their silvered steel plate filigreed in bronze with the same ancient runes that warded their father. The twins Ser Horas and Ser Hobber, whose shields displayed the grape cluster sigil of the Redwynes, burgundy on blue. Patrek Mallister, Lord Jason’s son. Six Freys of the Crossing: Ser Jared, Ser Hosteen, Ser Danwell, Ser Emmon, Ser Theo, Ser Perwyn, sons and grandsons of old Lord Walder Frey, and his bastard son Martyn Rivers as well.
Jeyne Poole confessed herself frightened by the look of Jalabhar Xho, an exile prince from the Summer Isles who wore a cape of green and scarlet feathers over skin as dark as night, but when she saw young Lord Beric Dondarrion, with his hair like red gold and his black shield slashed by lightning, she pronounced herself willing to marry him on the instant.
The Hound entered the lists as well, and so too the king’s brother, handsome Lord Renly of Storm’s End. Jory, Alyn, and Harwin rode for Winterfell and the north. “Jory looks a beggar among these others,” Septa Mordane sniffed when he appeared. Sansa could only agree. Jory’s armor was blue-grey plate without device or ornament, and a thin grey cloak hung from his shoulders like a soiled rag. Yet he acquitted himself well, unhorsing Horas Redwyne in his first joust and one of the Freys in his second. In his third match, he rode three passes at a freerider named Lothor Brune whose armor was as drab as his own. Neither man lost his seat, but Brune’s lance was steadier and his blows better placed, and the king gave him the victory. Alyn and Harwin fared less well; Harwin was unhorsed in his first tilt by Ser Meryn of the Kingsguard, while Alyn fell to Ser Balon Swann.
The jousting went all day and into the dusk, the hooves of the great warhorses pounding down the lists until the field was a ragged wasteland of torn earth. A dozen times Jeyne and Sansa cried out in unison as riders crashed together, lances exploding into splinters while the commons screamed for their favorites. Jeyne covered her eyes whenever a man fell, like a frightened little girl, but Sansa was made of sterner stuff. A great lady knew how to behave at tournaments. Even Septa Mordane noted her composure and nodded in approval.
The Kingslayer rode brilliantly. He overthrew Ser Andar Royce and the Marcher Lord Bryce Caron as easily as if he were riding at rings, and then took a hard-fought match from white-haired Barristan Selmy, who had won his first two tilts against men thirty and forty years his junior.
Sandor Clegane and his immense brother, Ser Gregor the Mountain, seemed unstoppable as well, riding down one foe after the next in ferocious style. The most terrifying moment of the day came during Ser Gregor’s second joust, when his lance rode up and struck a young knight from the Vale under the gorget with such force that it drove through his throat, killing him instantly. The youth fell not ten feet from where Sansa was seated. The point of Ser Gregor’s lance had snapped off in his neck, and his life’s blood flowed out in slow pulses, each weaker than the one before. His armor was shiny new; a bright streak of fire ran down his outstretched arm, as the steel caught the light. Then the sun went behind a cloud, and it was gone. His cloak was blue, the color of the sky on a clear summer’s day, trimmed with a border of crescent moons, but as his blood seeped into it, the cloth darkened and the moons turned red, one by one.
Jeyne Poole wept so hysterically that Septa Mordane finally took her off to regain her composure, but Sansa sat with her hands folded in her lap, watching with a strange fascination. She had never seen a man die before. She ought to be crying too, she thought, but the tears would not come. Perhaps she had used up all her tears for Lady and Bran. It would be different if it had been Jory or Ser Rodrik or Father, she told herself. The young knight in the blue cloak was nothing to her, some stranger from the Vale of Arryn whose name she had forgotten as soon as she heard it. And now the world would forget his name too, Sansa realized; there would be no songs sung for him. That was sad.
After they carried off the body, a boy with a spade ran onto the field and shoveled dirt over the spot where he had fallen, to cover up the blood. Then the jousts resumed.
Ser Balon Swann also fell to Gregor, and Lord Renly to the Hound. Renly was unhorsed so violently that he seemed to fly backward off his charger, legs in the air. His head hit the ground with an audible crack that made the crowd gasp, but it was just the golden antler on his helm. One of the tines had snapped off beneath him. When Lord Renly climbed to his feet, the commons cheered wildly, for King Robert’s handsome young brother was a great favorite. He handed the broken tine to his conqueror with a gracious bow. The Hound snorted and tossed the broken antler into the crowd, where the commons began to punch and claw over the little bit of gold, until Lord Renly walked out among them and restored the peace. By then Septa Mordane had returned, alone. Jeyne had been feeling ill, she explained; she had helped her back to the castle. Sansa had almost forgotten about Jeyne.
Later a hedge knight in a checkered cloak disgraced himself by killing Beric Dondarrion’s horse, and was declared forfeit. Lord Beric shifted his saddle to a new mount, only to be knocked right off it by Thoros of Myr. Ser Aron Santagar and Lothor Brune tilted thrice without result; Ser Aron fell afterward to Lord Jason Mallister, and Brune to Yohn Royce’s younger son, Robar.
In the end it came down to four; the Hound and his monstrous brother Gregor, Jaime Lannister the Kingslayer, and Ser Loras Tyrell, the youth they called the Knight of Flowers.
Ser Loras was the youngest son of Mace Tyrell, the Lord of Highgarden and Warden of the South. At sixteen, he was the youngest rider on the field, yet he had unhorsed three knights of the Kingsguard that morning in his first three jousts. Sansa had never seen anyone so beautiful. His plate was intricately fashioned and enameled as a bouquet of a thousand different flowers, and his snow-white stallion was draped in a blanket of red and white roses. After each victory, Ser Loras would remove his helm and ride slowly round the fence, and finally pluck a single white rose from the blanket and toss it to some fair maiden in the crowd.
His last match of the day was against the younger Royce. Ser Robar’s ancestral runes proved small protection as Ser Loras split his shield and drove him from his saddle to crash with an awful clangor in the dirt. Robar lay moaning as the victor made his circuit of the field. Finally they called for a litter and carried him off to his tent, dazed and unmoving. Sansa never saw it. Her eyes were only for Ser Loras. When the white horse stopped in front of her, she thought her heart would burst.
To the other maidens he had given white roses, but the one he plucked for her was red. “Sweet lady,” he said, “no victory is half so beautiful as you.” Sansa took the flower timidly, struck dumb by his gallantry. His hair was a mass of lazy brown curls, his eyes like liquid gold. She inhaled the sweet fragrance of the rose and sat clutching it long after Ser Loras had ridden off.
When Sansa finally looked up, a man was standing over her, staring. He was short, with a pointed beard and a silver streak in his hair, almost as old as her father. “You must be one of her daughters,” he said to her. He had grey-green eyes that did not smile when his mouth did. “You have the Tully look.”
“I’m Sansa Stark,” she said, ill at ease. The man wore a heavy cloak with a fur collar, fastened with a silver mockingbird, and he had the effortless manner of a high lord, but she did not know him. “I have not had the honor, my lord.”
Septa Mordane quickly took a hand. “Sweet child, this is Lord Petyr Baelish, of the king’s small council.”
“Your mother was my queen of beauty once,” the man said quietly. His breath smelled of mint. “You have her hair.” His fingers brushed against her cheek as he stroked one auburn lock. Quite abruptly he turned and walked away.
By then, the moon was well up and the crowd was tired, so the king decreed that the last three matches would be fought the next morning, before the melee. While the commons began their walk home, talking of the day’s jousts and the matches to come on the morrow, the court moved to the riverside to begin the feast. Six monstrous huge aurochs had been roasting for hours, turning slowly on wooden spits while kitchen boys basted them with butter and herbs until the meat crackled and spit. Tables and benches had been raised outside the pavilions, piled high with sweetgrass and strawberries and fresh-baked bread.
Sansa and Septa Mordane were given places of high honor, to the left of the raised dais where the king himself sat beside his queen. When Prince Joffrey seated himself to her right, she felt her throat tighten. He had not spoken a word to her since the awful thing had happened, and she had not dared to speak to him. At first she thought she hated him for what they’d done to Lady, but after Sansa had wept her eyes dry, she told herself that it had not been Joffrey’s doing, not truly. The queen had done it; she was the one to hate, her and Arya. Nothing bad would have happened except for Arya.
She could not hate Joffrey tonight. He was too beautiful to hate. He wore a deep blue doublet studded with a double row of golden lion’s heads, and around his brow a slim coronet made of gold and sapphires. His hair was as bright as the metal. Sansa looked at him and trembled, afraid that he might ignore her or, worse, turn hateful again and send her weeping from the table.
Instead Joffrey smiled and kissed her hand, handsome and gallant as any prince in the songs, and said, “Ser Loras has a keen eye for beauty, sweet lady.”
“He was too kind,” she demurred, trying to remain modest and calm, though her heart was singing. “Ser Loras is a true knight. Do you think he will win tomorrow, my lord?”
“No,” Joffrey said. “My dog will do for him, or perhaps my uncle Jaime. And in a few years, when I am old enough to enter the lists, I shall do for them all.” He raised his hand to summon a servant with a flagon of iced summerwine, and poured her a cup. She looked anxiously at Septa Mordane, until Joffrey leaned over and filled the septa’s cup as well, so she nodded and thanked him graciously and said not another word.
The servants kept the cups filled all night, yet afterward Sansa could not recall ever tasting the wine. She needed no wine. She was drunk on the magic of the night, giddy with glamour, swept away by beauties she had dreamt of all her life and never dared hope to know. Singers sat before the king’s pavilion, filling the dusk with music. A juggler kept a cascade of burning clubs spinning through the air. The king’s own fool, the pie-faced simpleton called Moon Boy, danced about on stilts, all in motley, making mock of everyone with such deft cruelty that Sansa wondered if he was simple after all. Even Septa Mordane was helpless before him; when he sang his little song about the High Septon, she laughed so hard she spilled wine on herself.
And Joffrey was the soul of courtesy. He talked to Sansa all night, showering her with compliments, making her laugh, sharing little bits of court gossip, explaining Moon Boy’s japes. Sansa was so captivated that she quite forgot all her courtesies and ignored Septa Mordane, seated to her left.
All the while the courses came and went. A thick soup of barley and venison. Salads of sweetgrass and spinach and plums, sprinkled with crushed nuts. Snails in honey and garlic. Sansa had never eaten snails before; Joffrey showed her how to get the snail out of the shell, and fed her the first sweet morsel himself. Then came trout fresh from the river, baked in clay; her prince helped her crack open the hard casing to expose the flaky white flesh within. And when the meat course was brought out, he served her himself, slicing a queen’s portion from the joint, smiling as he laid it on her plate. She could see from the way he moved that his right arm was still troubling him, yet he uttered not a word of complaint.
Later came sweetbreads and pigeon pie and baked apples fragrant with cinnamon and lemon cakes frosted in sugar, but by then Sansa was so stuffed that she could not manage more than two little lemon cakes, as much as she loved them. She was wondering whether she might attempt a third when the king began to shout.
King Robert had grown louder with each course. From time to time Sansa could hear him laughing or roaring a command over the music and the clangor of plates and cutlery, but they were too far away for her to make out his words.
Now everybody heard him. “No,” he thundered in a voice that drowned out all other speech. Sansa was shocked to see the king on his feet, red of face, reeling. He had a goblet of wine in one hand, and he was drunk as a man could be. “You do not tell me what to do, woman,” he screamed at Queen Cersei. “I am king here, do you understand? I rule here, and if I say that I will fight tomorrow, I will fight!”
Everyone was staring. Sansa saw Ser Barristan, and the king’s brother Renly, and the short man who had talked to her so oddly and touched her hair, but no one made a move to interfere. The queen’s face was a mask, so bloodless that it might have been sculpted from snow. She rose from the table, gathered her skirts around her, and stormed off in silence, servants trailing behind.
Jaime Lannister put a hand on the king’s shoulder, but the king shoved him away hard. Lannister stumbled and fell. The king guffawed. “The great knight. I can still knock you in the dirt. Remember that, Kingslayer.” He slapped his chest with the jeweled goblet, splashing wine all over his satin tunic. “Give me my hammer and not a man in the realm can stand before me!”
Jaime Lannister rose and brushed himself off. “As you say, Your Grace.” His voice was stiff.
Lord Renly came forward, smiling. “You’ve spilled your wine, Robert. Let me bring you a fresh goblet.”
Sansa started as Joffrey laid his hand on her arm. “It grows late,” the prince said. He had a queer look on his face, as if he were not seeing her at all. “Do you need an escort back to the castle?”
“No,” Sansa began. She looked for Septa Mordane, and was startled to find her with her head on the table, snoring soft and ladylike snores. “I mean to say … yes, thank you, that would be most kind. I am tired, and the way is so dark. I should be glad for some protection.”
Joffrey called out, “Dog!”
Sandor Clegane seemed to take form out of the night, so quickly did he appear. He had exchanged his armor for a red woolen tunic with a leather dog’s head sewn on the front. The light of the torches made his burned face shine a dull red. “Yes, Your Grace?” he said.
“Take my betrothed back to the castle, and see that no harm befalls her,” the prince told him brusquely. And without even a word of farewell, Joffrey strode off, leaving her there.
Sansa could feel the Hound watching her. “Did you think Joff was going to take you himself?” He laughed. He had a laugh like the snarling of dogs in a pit. “Small chance of that.” He pulled her unresisting to her feet. “Come, you’re not the only one needs sleep. I’ve drunk too much, and I may need to kill my brother tomorrow.” He laughed again.
Suddenly terrified, Sansa pushed at Septa Mordane’s shoulder, hoping to wake her, but she only snored the louder. King Robert had stumbled off and half the benches were suddenly empty. The feast was over, and the beautiful dream had ended with it.
The Hound snatched up a torch to light their way. Sansa followed close beside him. The ground was rocky and uneven; the flickering light made it seem to shift and move beneath her. She kept her eyes lowered, watching where she placed her feet. They walked among the pavilions, each with its banner and its armor hung outside, the silence weighing heavier with every step. Sansa could not bear the sight of him, he frightened her so, yet she had been raised in all the ways of courtesy. A true lady would not notice his face, she told herself. “You rode gallantly today, Ser Sandor,” she made herself say.
Sandor Clegane snarled at her. “Spare me your empty little compliments, girl … and your ser’s. I am no knight. I spit on them and their vows. My brother is a knight. Did you see him ride today?”
“Yes,” Sansa whispered, trembling. “He was …”
“Gallant?” the Hound finished.
He was mocking her, she realized. “No one could withstand him,” she managed at last, proud of herself. It was no lie.
Sandor Clegane stopped suddenly in the middle of a dark and empty field. She had no choice but to stop beside him. “Some septa trained you well. You’re like one of those birds from the Summer Isles, aren’t you? A pretty little talking bird, repeating all the pretty little words they taught you to recite.”
“That’s unkind.” Sansa could feel her heart fluttering in her chest. “You’re frightening me. I want to go now.”
“No one could withstand him,” the Hound rasped. “That’s truth enough. No one could ever withstand Gregor. That boy today, his second joust, oh, that was a pretty bit of business. You saw that, did you? Fool boy, he had no business riding in this company. No money, no squire, no one to help him with that armor. That gorget wasn’t fastened proper. You think Gregor didn’t notice that? You think Ser Gregor’s lance rode up by chance, do you? Pretty little talking girl, you believe that, you’re empty-headed as a bird for true. Gregor’s lance goes where Gregor wants it to go. Look at me. Look at me!” Sandor Clegane put a huge hand under her chin and forced her face up. He squatted in front of her, and moved the torch close. “There’s a pretty for you. Take a good long stare. You know you want to. I’ve watched you turning away all the way down the kingsroad. Piss on that. Take your look.”
His fingers held her jaw as hard as an iron trap. His eyes watched hers. Drunken eyes, sullen with anger. She had to look.
The right side of his face was gaunt, with sharp cheekbones and a grey eye beneath a heavy brow. His nose was large and hooked, his hair thin, dark. He wore it long and brushed it sideways, because no hair grew on the other side of that face.
The left side of his face was a ruin. His ear had been burned away; there was nothing left but a hole. His eye was still good, but all around it was a twisted mass of scar, slick black flesh hard as leather, pocked with craters and fissured by deep cracks that gleamed red and wet when he moved. Down by his jaw, you could see a hint of bone where the flesh had been seared away.
Sansa began to cry. He let go of her then, and snuffed out the torch in the dirt. “No pretty words for that, girl? No little compliment the septa taught you?” When there was no answer, he continued. “Most of them, they think it was some battle. A siege, a burning tower, an enemy with a torch. One fool asked if it was dragonsbreath.” His laugh was softer this time, but just as bitter. “I’ll tell you what it was, girl,” he said, a voice from the night, a shadow leaning so close now that she could smell the sour stench of wine on his breath. “I was younger than you, six, maybe seven. A woodcarver set up shop in the village under my father’s keep, and to buy favor he sent us gifts. The old man made marvelous toys. I don’t remember what I got, but it was Gregor’s gift I wanted. A wooden knight, all painted up, every joint pegged separate and fixed with strings, so you could make him fight. Gregor is five years older than me, the toy was nothing to him, he was already a squire, near six foot tall and muscled like an ox. So I took his knight, but there was no joy to it, I tell you. I was scared all the while, and true enough, he found me. There was a brazier in the room. Gregor never said a word, just picked me up under his arm and shoved the side of my face down in the burning coals and held me there while I screamed and screamed. You saw how strong he is. Even then, it took three grown men to drag him off me. The septons preach about the seven hells. What do they know? Only a man who’s been burned knows what hell is truly like.
“My father told everyone my bedding had caught fire, and our maester gave me ointments. Ointments! Gregor got his ointments too. Four years later, they anointed him with the seven oils and he recited his knightly vows and Rhaegar Targaryen tapped him on the shoulder and said, ‘Arise, Ser Gregor.’”
The rasping voice trailed off. He squatted silently before her, a hulking black shape shrouded in the night, hidden from her eyes. Sansa could hear his ragged breathing. She was sad for him, she realized. Somehow, the fear had gone away.
The silence went on and on, so long that she began to grow afraid once more, but she was afraid for him now, not for herself. She found his massive shoulder with her hand. “He was no true knight,” she whispered to him.
The Hound threw back his head and roared. Sansa stumbled back, away from him, but he caught her arm. “No,” he growled at her, “no, little bird, he was no true knight.”
The rest of the way into the city, Sandor Clegane said not a word. He led her to where the carts were waiting, told a driver to take them back to the Red Keep, and climbed in after her. They rode in silence through the King’s Gate and up torchlit city streets. He opened the postern door and led her into the castle, his burned face twitching and his eyes brooding, and he was one step behind her as they climbed the tower stairs. He took her safe all the way to the corridor outside her bedchamber.
“Thank you, my lord,” Sansa said meekly.
The Hound caught her by the arm and leaned close. “The things I told you tonight,” he said, his voice sounding even rougher than usual. “If you ever tell Joffrey … your sister, your father … any of them …”
“I won’t,” Sansa whispered. “I promise.”
It was not enough. “If you ever tell anyone,” he finished, “I’ll kill you.”

“He wouldn’t send Ser Loras,” Sansa told Jeyne Poole that night as they shared a cold supper by lamplight. “I think it was because of his leg.”
Lord Eddard had taken his supper in his bedchamber with Alyn, Harwin, and Vayon Poole, the better to rest his broken leg, and Septa Mordane had complained of sore feet after standing in the gallery all day. Arya was supposed to join them, but she was late coming back from her dancing lesson.
“His leg?” Jeyne said uncertainly. She was a pretty, dark-haired girl of Sansa’s own age. “Did Ser Loras hurt his leg?”
“Not his leg,” Sansa said, nibbling delicately at a chicken leg. “Father’s leg, silly. It hurts him ever so much, it makes him cross. Otherwise I’m certain he would have sent Ser Loras.”
Her father’s decision still bewildered her. When the Knight of Flowers had spoken up, she’d been sure she was about to see one of Old Nan’s stories come to life. Ser Gregor was the monster and Ser Loras the true hero who would slay him. He even looked a true hero, so slim and beautiful, with golden roses around his slender waist and his rich brown hair tumbling down into his eyes. And then Father had refused him! It had upset her more than she could tell. She had said as much to Septa Mordane as they descended the stairs from the gallery, but the septa had only told her it was not her place to question her lord father’s decisions.
That was when Lord Baelish had said, “Oh, I don’t know, Septa. Some of her lord father’s decisions could do with a bit of questioning. The young lady is as wise as she is lovely.” He made a sweeping bow to Sansa, so deep she was not quite sure if she was being complimented or mocked.
Septa Mordane had been very upset to realize that Lord Baelish had overheard them. “The girl was just talking, my lord,” she’d said. “Foolish chatter. She meant nothing by the comment.”
Lord Baelish stroked his little pointed beard and said, “Nothing? Tell me, child, why would you have sent Ser Loras?”
Sansa had no choice but to explain about heroes and monsters. The king’s councillor smiled. “Well, those are not the reasons I’d have given, but …” He had touched her cheek, his thumb lightly tracing the line of a cheekbone. “Life is not a song, sweetling. You may learn that one day to your sorrow.”
Sansa did not feel like telling all that to Jeyne, however; it made her uneasy just to think back on it.
“Ser Ilyn’s the King’s Justice, not Ser Loras,” Jeyne said. “Lord Eddard should have sent him.”
Sansa shuddered. Every time she looked at Ser Ilyn Payne, she shivered. He made her feel as though something dead were slithering over her naked skin. “Ser Ilyn’s almost like a second monster. I’m glad Father didn’t pick him.”
“Lord Beric is as much a hero as Ser Loras. He’s ever so brave and gallant.”
“I suppose,” Sansa said doubtfully. Beric Dondarrion was handsome enough, but he was awfully old, almost twenty-two; the Knight of Flowers would have been much better. Of course, Jeyne had been in love with Lord Beric ever since she had first glimpsed him in the lists. Sansa thought she was being silly; Jeyne was only a steward’s daughter, after all, and no matter how much she mooned after him, Lord Beric would never look at someone so far beneath him, even if she hadn’t been half his age.
It would have been unkind to say so, however, so Sansa took a sip of milk and changed the subject. “I had a dream that Joffrey would be the one to take the white hart,” she said. It had been more of a wish, actually, but it sounded better to call it a dream. Everyone knew that dreams were prophetic. White harts were supposed to be very rare and magical, and in her heart she knew her gallant prince was worthier than his drunken father.
“A dream? Truly? Did Prince Joffrey just go up to it and touch it with his bare hand and do it no harm?”
“No,” Sansa said. “He shot it with a golden arrow and brought it back for me.” In the songs, the knights never killed magical beasts, they just went up to them and touched them and did them no harm, but she knew Joffrey liked hunting, especially the killing part. Only animals, though. Sansa was certain her prince had no part in murdering Jory and those other poor men; that had been his wicked uncle, the Kingslayer. She knew her father was still angry about that, but it wasn’t fair to blame Joff. That would be like blaming her for something that Arya had done.
“I saw your sister this afternoon,” Jeyne blurted out, as if she’d been reading Sansa’s thoughts. “She was walking through the stables on her hands. Why would she do a thing like that?”
“I’m sure I don’t know why Arya does anything.” Sansa hated stables, smelly places full of manure and flies. Even when she went riding, she liked the boy to saddle the horse and bring it to her in the yard. “Do you want to hear about the court or not?”
“I do,” Jeyne said.
“There was a black brother,” Sansa said, “begging men for the Wall, only he was kind of old and smelly.” She hadn’t liked that at all. She had always imagined the Night’s Watch to be men like Uncle Benjen. In the songs, they were called the black knights of the Wall. But this man had been crookbacked and hideous, and he looked as though he might have lice. If this was what the Night’s Watch was truly like, she felt sorry for her bastard half brother, Jon. “Father asked if there were any knights in the hall who would do honor to their houses by taking the black, but no one came forward, so he gave this Yoren his pick of the king’s dungeons and sent him on his way. And later these two brothers came before him, freeriders from the Dornish Marches, and pledged their swords to the service of the king. Father accepted their oaths …”
Jeyne yawned. “Are there any lemon cakes?”
Sansa did not like being interrupted, but she had to admit, lemon cakes sounded more interesting than most of what had gone on in the throne room. “Let’s see,” she said.
The kitchen yielded no lemon cakes, but they did find half of a cold strawberry pie, and that was almost as good. They ate it on the tower steps, giggling and gossiping and sharing secrets, and Sansa went to bed that night feeling almost as wicked as Arya.
The next morning she woke before first light and crept sleepily to her window to watch Lord Beric form up his men. They rode out as dawn was breaking over the city, with three banners going before them; the crowned stag of the king flew from the high staff, the direwolf of Stark and Lord Beric’s own forked lightning standard from shorter poles. It was all so exciting, a song come to life; the clatter of swords, the flicker of torchlight, banners dancing in the wind, horses snorting and whinnying, the golden glow of sunrise slanting through the bars of the portcullis as it jerked upward. The Winterfell men looked especially fine in their silvery mail and long grey cloaks.
Alyn carried the Stark banner. When she saw him rein in beside Lord Beric to exchange words, it made Sansa feel ever so proud. Alyn was handsomer than Jory had been; he was going to be a knight one day.
The Tower of the Hand seemed so empty after they left that Sansa was even pleased to see Arya when she went down to break her fast. “Where is everyone?” her sister wanted to know as she ripped the skin from a blood orange. “Did Father send them to hunt down Jaime Lannister?”
Sansa sighed. “They rode with Lord Beric, to behead Ser Gregor Clegane.” She turned to Septa Mordane, who was eating porridge with a wooden spoon. “Septa, will Lord Beric spike Ser Gregor’s head on his own gate or bring it back here for the king?” She and Jeyne Poole had been arguing over that last night.
The septa was horror-struck. “A lady does not discuss such things over her porridge. Where are your courtesies, Sansa? I swear, of late you’ve been near as bad as your sister.”
“What did Gregor do?” Arya asked.
“He burned down a holdfast and murdered a lot of people, women and children too.”
Arya screwed up her face in a scowl. “Jaime Lannister murdered Jory and Heward and Wyl, and the Hound murdered Mycah. Somebody should have beheaded them.”
“It’s not the same,” Sansa said. “The Hound is Joffrey’s sworn shield. Your butcher’s boy attacked the prince.”
“Liar,” Arya said. Her hand clenched the blood orange so hard that red juice oozed between her fingers.
“Go ahead, call me all the names you want,” Sansa said airily. “You won’t dare when I’m married to Joffrey. You’ll have to bow to me and call me Your Grace.” She shrieked as Arya flung the orange across the table. It caught her in the middle of the forehead with a wet squish and plopped down into her lap.
“You have juice on your face, Your Grace,” Arya said.
It was running down her nose and stinging her eyes. Sansa wiped it away with a napkin. When she saw what the fruit in her lap had done to her beautiful ivory silk dress, she shrieked again. “You’re horrible,” she screamed at her sister. “They should have killed you instead of Lady!”
Septa Mordane came lurching to her feet. “Your lord father will hear of this! Go to your chambers, at once. At once!”
“Me too?” Tears welled in Sansa’s eyes. “That’s not fair.”
“The matter is not subject to discussion. Go!”
Sansa stalked away with her head up. She was to be a queen, and queens did not cry. At least not where people could see. When she reached her bedchamber, she barred the door and took off her dress. The blood orange had left a blotchy red stain on the silk. “I hate her!” she screamed. She balled up the dress and flung it into the cold hearth, on top of the ashes of last night’s fire. When she saw that the stain had bled through onto her underskirt, she began to sob despite herself. She ripped off the rest of her clothes wildly, threw herself into bed, and cried herself back to sleep.
It was midday when Septa Mordane knocked upon her door. “Sansa. Your lord father will see you now.”
Sansa sat up. “Lady,” she whispered. For a moment it was as if the direwolf was there in the room, looking at her with those golden eyes, sad and knowing. She had been dreaming, she realized. Lady was with her, and they were running together, and … and … trying to remember was like trying to catch the rain with her fingers. The dream faded, and Lady was dead again.
“Sansa.” The rap came again, sharply. “Do you hear me?”
“Yes, Septa,” she called out. “Might I have a moment to dress, please?” Her eyes were red from crying, but she did her best to make herself beautiful.
Lord Eddard was bent over a huge leather-bound book when Septa Mordane marched her into the solar, his plaster-wrapped leg stiff beneath the table. “Come here, Sansa,” he said, not unkindly, when the septa had gone for her sister. “Sit beside me.” He closed the book.
Septa Mordane returned with Arya squirming in her grasp. Sansa had put on a lovely pale green damask gown and a look of remorse, but her sister was still wearing the ratty leathers and roughspun she’d worn at breakfast. “Here is the other one,” the septa announced.
“My thanks, Septa Mordane. I would talk to my daughters alone, if you would be so kind.” The septa bowed and left.
“Arya started it,” Sansa said quickly, anxious to have the first word. “She called me a liar and threw an orange at me and spoiled my dress, the ivory silk, the one Queen Cersei gave me when I was betrothed to Prince Joffrey. She hates that I’m going to marry the prince. She tries to spoil everything, Father, she can’t stand for anything to be beautiful or nice or splendid.”
“Enough, Sansa.” Lord Eddard’s voice was sharp with impatience.
Arya raised her eyes. “I’m sorry, Father. I was wrong and I beg my sweet sister’s forgiveness.”
Sansa was so startled that for a moment she was speechless. Finally she found her voice. “What about my dress?”
“Maybe … I could wash it,” Arya said doubtfully.
“Washing won’t do any good,” Sansa said. “Not if you scrubbed all day and all night. The silk is ruined.”
“Then I’ll … make you a new one,” Arya said.
Sansa threw back her head in disdain. “You? You couldn’t sew a dress fit to clean the pigsties.”
Their father sighed. “I did not call you here to talk of dresses. I’m sending you both back to Winterfell.”
For the second time Sansa found herself too stunned for words. She felt her eyes grow moist again.
“You can’t,” Arya said.
“Please, Father,” Sansa managed at last. “Please don’t.”
Eddard Stark favored his daughters with a tired smile. “At last we’ve found something you agree on.”
“I didn’t do anything wrong,” Sansa pleaded with him. “I don’t want to go back.” She loved King’s Landing; the pagaentry of the court, the high lords and ladies in their velvets and silks and gemstones, the great city with all its people. The tournament had been the most magical time of her whole life, and there was so much she had not seen yet, harvest feasts and masked balls and mummer shows. She could not bear the thought of losing it all. “Send Arya away, she started it, Father, I swear it. I’ll be good, you’ll see, just let me stay and I promise to be as fine and noble and courteous as the queen.”
Father’s mouth twitched strangely. “Sansa, I’m not sending you away for fighting, though the gods know I’m sick of you two squabbling. I want you back in Winterfell for your own safety. Three of my men were cut down like dogs not a league from where we sit, and what does Robert do? He goes hunting.”
Arya was chewing at her lip in that disgusting way she had. “Can we take Syrio back with us?”
“Who cares about your stupid dancing master?” Sansa flared. “Father, I only just now remembered, I can’t go away, I’m to marry Prince Joffrey.” She tried to smile bravely for him. “I love him, Father, I truly truly do, I love him as much as Queen Naerys loved Prince Aemon the Dragonknight, as much as Jonquil loved Ser Florian. I want to be his queen and have his babies.”
“Sweet one,” her father said gently, “listen to me. When you’re old enough, I will make you a match with a high lord who’s worthy of you, someone brave and gentle and strong. This match with Joffrey was a terrible mistake. That boy is no Prince Aemon, you must believe me.”
“He is!” Sansa insisted. “I don’t want someone brave and gentle, I want him. We’ll be ever so happy, just like in the songs, you’ll see. I’ll give him a son with golden hair, and one day he’ll be the king of all the realm, the greatest king that ever was, as brave as the wolf and as proud as the lion.”
Arya made a face. “Not if Joffrey’s his father,” she said. “He’s a liar and a craven and anyhow he’s a stag, not a lion.”
Sansa felt tears in her eyes. “He is not! He’s not the least bit like that old drunken king,” she screamed at her sister, forgetting herself in her grief.
Father looked at her strangely. “Gods,” he swore softly, “out of the mouth of babes …” He shouted for Septa Mordane. To the girls he said, “I am looking for a fast trading galley to take you home. These days, the sea is safer than the kingsroad. You will sail as soon as I can find a proper ship, with Septa Mordane and a complement of guards … and yes, with Syrio Forel, if he agrees to enter my service. But say nothing of this. It’s better if no one knows of our plans. We’ll talk again tomorrow.”
Sansa cried as Septa Mordane marched them down the steps. They were going to take it all away; the tournaments and the court and her prince, everything, they were going to send her back to the bleak grey walls of Winterfell and lock her up forever. Her life was over before it had begun.
“Stop that weeping, child,” Septa Mordane said sternly. “I am certain your lord father knows what is best for you.”
“It won’t be so bad, Sansa,” Arya said. “We’re going to sail on a galley. It will be an adventure, and then we’ll be with Bran and Robb again, and Old Nan and Hodor and the rest.” She touched her on the arm.
“Hodor!” Sansa yelled. “You ought to marry Hodor, you’re just like him, stupid and hairy and ugly!” She wrenched away from her sister’s hand, stormed into her bedchamber, and barred the door behind her.

They came for Sansa on the third day.
She chose a simple dress of dark grey wool, plainly cut but richly embroidered around the collar and sleeves. Her fingers felt thick and clumsy as she struggled with the silver fastenings without the benefit of servants. Jeyne Poole had been confined with her, but Jeyne was useless. Her face was puffy from all her crying, and she could not seem to stop sobbing about her father.
“I’m certain your father is well,” Sansa told her when she had finally gotten the dress buttoned right. “I’ll ask the queen to let you see him.” She thought that kindness might lift Jeyne’s spirits, but the other girl just looked at her with red, swollen eyes and began to cry all the harder. She was such a child.
Sansa had wept too, the first day. Even within the stout walls of Maegor’s Holdfast, with her door closed and barred, it was hard not to be terrified when the killing began. She had grown up to the sound of steel in the yard, and scarcely a day of her life had passed without hearing the clash of sword on sword, yet somehow knowing that the fighting was real made all the difference in the world. She heard it as she had never heard it before, and there were other sounds as well, grunts of pain, angry curses, shouts for help, and the moans of wounded and dying men. In the songs, the knights never screamed nor begged for mercy.
So she wept, pleading through her door for them to tell her what was happening, calling for her father, for Septa Mordane, for the king, for her gallant prince. If the men guarding her heard her pleas, they gave no answer. The only time the door opened was late that night, when they thrust Jeyne Poole inside, bruised and shaking. “They’re killing everyone,” the steward’s daughter had shrieked at her. She went on and on. The Hound had broken down her door with a warhammer, she said. There were bodies on the stair of the Tower of the Hand, and the steps were slick with blood. Sansa dried her own tears as she struggled to comfort her friend. They went to sleep in the same bed, cradled in each other’s arms like sisters.
The second day was even worse. The room where Sansa had been confined was at the top of the highest tower of Maegor’s Holdfast. From its window, she could see that the heavy iron portcullis in the gatehouse was down, and the drawbridge drawn up over the deep dry moat that separated the keep-within-a-keep from the larger castle that surrounded it. Lannister guardsmen prowled the walls with spears and crossbows to hand. The fighting was over, and the silence of the grave had settled over the Red Keep. The only sounds were Jeyne Poole’s endless whimpers and sobs.
They were fed—hard cheese and fresh-baked bread and milk to break their fast, roast chicken and greens at midday, and a late supper of beef and barley stew—but the servants who brought the meals would not answer Sansa’s questions. That evening, some women brought her clothes from the Tower of the Hand, and some of Jeyne’s things as well, but they seemed nearly as frightened as Jeyne, and when she tried to talk to them, they fled from her as if she had the grey plague. The guards outside the door still refused to let them leave the room.
“Please, I need to speak to the queen again,” Sansa told them, as she told everyone she saw that day. “She’ll want to talk to me, I know she will. Tell her I want to see her, please. If not the queen, then Prince Joffrey, if you’d be so kind. We’re to marry when we’re older.”
At sunset on the second day, a great bell began to ring. Its voice was deep and sonorous, and the long slow clanging filled Sansa with a sense of dread. The ringing went on and on, and after a while they heard other bells answering from the Great Sept of Baelor on Visenya’s Hill. The sound rumbled across the city like thunder, warning of the storm to come.
“What is it?” Jeyne asked, covering her ears. “Why are they ringing the bells?”
“The king is dead.” Sansa could not say how she knew it, yet she did. The slow, endless clanging filled their room, as mournful as a dirge. Had some enemy stormed the castle and murdered King Robert? Was that the meaning of the fighting they had heard?
She went to sleep wondering, restless, and fearful. Was her beautiful Joffrey the king now? Or had they killed him too? She was afraid for him, and for her father. If only they would tell her what was happening …
That night Sansa dreamt of Joffrey on the throne, with herself seated beside him in a gown of woven gold. She had a crown on her head, and everyone she had ever known came before her, to bend the knee and say their courtesies.
The next morning, the morning of the third day, Ser Boros Blount of the Kingsguard came to escort her to the queen.
Ser Boros was an ugly man with a broad chest and short, bandy legs. His nose was flat, his cheeks baggy with jowls, his hair grey and brittle. Today he wore white velvet, and his snowy cloak was fastened with a lion brooch. The beast had the soft sheen of gold, and his eyes were tiny rubies. “You look very handsome and splendid this morning, Ser Boros,” Sansa told him. A lady remembered her courtesies, and she was resolved to be a lady no matter what.
“And you, my lady,” Ser Boros said in a flat voice. “Her Grace awaits. Come with me.”
There were guards outside her door, Lannister men-at-arms in crimson cloaks and lion-crested helms. Sansa made herself smile at them pleasantly and bid them a good morning as she passed. It was the first time she had been allowed outside the chamber since Ser Arys Oakheart had led her there two mornings past. “To keep you safe, my sweet one,” Queen Cersei had told her. “Joffrey would never forgive me if anything happened to his precious.”
Sansa had expected that Ser Boros would escort her to the royal apartments, but instead he led her out of Maegor’s Holdfast. The bridge was down again. Some workmen were lowering a man on ropes into the depths of the dry moat. When Sansa peered down, she saw a body impaled on the huge iron spikes below. She averted her eyes quickly, afraid to ask, afraid to look too long, afraid he might be someone she knew.
They found Queen Cersei in the council chambers, seated at the head of a long table littered with papers, candles, and blocks of sealing wax. The room was as splendid as any that Sansa had ever seen. She stared in awe at the carved wooden screen and the twin sphinxes that sat beside the door.
“Your Grace,” Ser Boros said when they were ushered inside by another of the Kingsguard, Ser Mandon of the curiously dead face, “I’ve brought the girl.”
Sansa had hoped Joffrey might be with her. Her prince was not there, but three of the king’s councillors were. Lord Petyr Baelish sat on the queen’s left hand, Grand Maester Pycelle at the end of the table, while Lord Varys hovered over them, smelling flowery. All of them were clad in black, she realized with a feeling of dread. Mourning clothes …
The queen wore a high-collared black silk gown, with a hundred dark red rubies sewn into her bodice, covering her from neck to bosom. They were cut in the shape of teardrops, as if the queen were weeping blood. Cersei smiled to see her, and Sansa thought it was the sweetest and saddest smile she had ever seen. “Sansa, my sweet child,” she said, “I know you’ve been asking for me. I’m sorry that I could not send for you sooner. Matters have been very unsettled, and I have not had a moment. I trust my people have been taking good care of you?”
“Everyone has been very sweet and pleasant, Your Grace, thank you ever so much for asking,” Sansa said politely. “Only, well, no one will talk to us or tell us what’s happened …”
“Us?” Cersei seemed puzzled.
“We put the steward’s girl in with her,” Ser Boros said. “We did not know what else to do with her.”
The queen frowned. “Next time, you will ask,” she said, her voice sharp. “The gods only know what sort of tales she’s been filling Sansa’s head with.”
“Jeyne’s scared,” Sansa said. “She won’t stop crying. I promised her I’d ask if she could see her father.”
Old Grand Maester Pycelle lowered his eyes.
“Her father is well, isn’t he?” Sansa said anxiously. She knew there had been fighting, but surely no one would harm a steward. Vayon Poole did not even wear a sword.
Queen Cersei looked at each of the councillors in turn. “I won’t have Sansa fretting needlessly. What shall we do with this little friend of hers, my lords?”
Lord Petyr leaned forward. “I’ll find a place for her.”
“Not in the city,” said the queen.
“Do you take me for a fool?”
The queen ignored that. “Ser Boros, escort this girl to Lord Petyr’s apartments and instruct his people to keep her there until he comes for her. Tell her that Littlefinger will be taking her to see her father, that ought to calm her down. I want her gone before Sansa returns to her chamber.”
“As you command, Your Grace,” Ser Boros said. He bowed deeply, spun on his heel, and took his leave, his long white cloak stirring the air behind him.
Sansa was confused. “I don’t understand,” she said. “Where is Jeyne’s father? Why can’t Ser Boros take her to him instead of Lord Petyr having to do it?” She had promised herself she would be a lady, gentle as the queen and as strong as her mother, the Lady Catelyn, but all of a sudden she was scared again. For a second she thought she might cry. “Where are you sending her? She hasn’t done anything wrong, she’s a good girl.”
“She’s upset you,” the queen said gently. “We can’t be having that. Not another word, now. Lord Baelish will see that Jeyne’s well taken care of, I promise you.” She patted the chair beside her. “Sit down, Sansa. I want to talk to you.”
Sansa seated herself beside the queen. Cersei smiled again, but that did not make her feel any less anxious. Varys was wringing his soft hands together, Grand Maester Pycelle kept his sleepy eyes on the papers in front of him, but she could feel Littlefinger staring. Something about the way the small man looked at her made Sansa feel as though she had no clothes on. Goose bumps pimpled her skin.
“Sweet Sansa,” Queen Cersei said, laying a soft hand on her wrist. “Such a beautiful child. I do hope you know how much Joffrey and I love you.”
“You do?” Sansa said, breathless. Littlefinger was forgotten. Her prince loved her. Nothing else mattered.
The queen smiled. “I think of you almost as my own daughter. And I know the love you bear for Joffrey.” She gave a weary shake of her head. “I am afraid we have some grave news about your lord father. You must be brave, child.”
Her quiet words gave Sansa a chill. “What is it?”
“Your father is a traitor, dear,” Lord Varys said.
Grand Maester Pycelle lifted his ancient head. “With my own ears, I heard Lord Eddard swear to our beloved King Robert that he would protect the young princes as if they were his own sons. And yet the moment the king was dead, he called the small council together to steal Prince Joffrey’s rightful throne.”
“No,” Sansa blurted. “He wouldn’t do that. He wouldn’t!”
The queen picked up a letter. The paper was torn and stiff with dried blood, but the broken seal was her father’s, the direwolf stamped in pale wax. “We found this on the captain of your household guard, Sansa. It is a letter to my late husband’s brother Stannis, inviting him to take the crown.”
“Please, Your Grace, there’s been a mistake.” Sudden panic made her dizzy and faint. “Please, send for my father, he’ll tell you, he would never write such a letter, the king was his friend.”
“Robert thought so,” said the queen. “This betrayal would have broken his heart. The gods are kind, that he did not live to see it.” She sighed. “Sansa, sweetling, you must see what a dreadful position this has left us in. You are innocent of any wrong, we all know that, and yet you are the daughter of a traitor. How can I allow you to marry my son?”
“But I love him,” Sansa wailed, confused and frightened. What did they mean to do to her? What had they done to her father? It was not supposed to happen this way. She had to wed Joffrey, they were betrothed, he was promised to her, she had even dreamed about it. It wasn’t fair to take him away from her on account of whatever her father might have done.
“How well I know that, child,” Cersei said, her voice so kind and sweet. “Why else should you have come to me and told me of your father’s plan to send you away from us, if not for love?”
“It was for love,” Sansa said in a rush. “Father wouldn’t even give me leave to say farewell.” She was the good girl, the obedient girl, but she had felt as wicked as Arya that morning, sneaking away from Septa Mordane, defying her lord father. She had never done anything so willful before, and she would never have done it then if she hadn’t loved Joffrey as much as she did. “He was going to take me back to Winterfell and marry me to some hedge knight, even though it was Joff I wanted. I told him, but he wouldn’t listen.” The king had been her last hope. The king could command Father to let her stay in King’s Landing and marry Prince Joffrey, Sansa knew he could, but the king had always frightened her. He was loud and rough-voiced and drunk as often as not, and he would probably have just sent her back to Lord Eddard, if they even let her see him. So she went to the queen instead, and poured out her heart, and Cersei had listened and thanked her sweetly … only then Ser Arys had escorted her to the high room in Maegor’s Holdfast and posted guards, and a few hours later, the fighting had begun outside. “Please,” she finished, “you have to let me marry Joffrey, I’ll be ever so good a wife to him, you’ll see. I’ll be a queen just like you, I promise.”
Queen Cersei looked to the others. “My lords of the council, what do you say to her plea?”
“The poor child,” murmured Varys. “A love so true and innocent, Your Grace, it would be cruel to deny it … and yet, what can we do? Her father stands condemned.” His soft hands washed each other in a gesture of helpless distress.
“A child born of traitor’s seed will find that betrayal comes naturally to her,” said Grand Maester Pycelle. “She is a sweet thing now, but in ten years, who can say what treasons she may hatch?”
“No,” Sansa said, horrified. “I’m not, I’d never … I wouldn’t betray Joffrey, I love him, I swear it, I do.”
“Oh, so poignant,” said Varys. “And yet, it is truly said that blood runs truer than oaths.”
“She reminds me of the mother, not the father,” Lord Petyr Baelish said quietly. “Look at her. The hair, the eyes. She is the very image of Cat at the same age.”
The queen looked at her, troubled, and yet Sansa could see kindness in her clear green eyes. “Child,” she said, “if I could truly believe that you were not like your father, why nothing should please me more than to see you wed to my Joffrey. I know he loves you with all his heart.” She sighed. “And yet, I fear that Lord Varys and the Grand Maester have the right of it. The blood will tell. I have only to remember how your sister set her wolf on my son.”
“I’m not like Arya,” Sansa blurted. “She has the traitor’s blood, not me. I’m good, ask Septa Mordane, she’ll tell you, I only want to be Joffrey’s loyal and loving wife.”
She felt the weight of Cersei’s eyes as the queen studied her face. “I believe you mean it, child.” She turned to face the others. “My lords, it seems to me that if the rest of her kin were to remain loyal in this terrible time, that would go a long way toward laying our fears to rest.”
Grand Maester Pycelle stroked his huge soft beard, his wide brow furrowed in thought. “Lord Eddard has three sons.”
“Mere boys,” Lord Petyr said with a shrug. “I should be more concerned with Lady Catelyn and the Tullys.”
The queen took Sansa’s hand in both of hers. “Child, do you know your letters?”
Sansa nodded nervously. She could read and write better than any of her brothers, although she was hopeless at sums.
“I am pleased to hear that. Perhaps there is hope for you and Joffrey still …”
“What do you want me to do?”
“You must write your lady mother, and your brother, the eldest … what is his name?”
“Robb,” Sansa said.
“The word of your lord father’s treason will no doubt reach them soon. Better that it should come from you. You must tell them how Lord Eddard betrayed his king.”
Sansa wanted Joffrey desperately, but she did not think she had the courage to do as the queen was asking. “But he never … I don’t … Your Grace, I wouldn’t know what to say …”
The queen patted her hand. “We will tell you what to write, child. The important thing is that you urge Lady Catelyn and your brother to keep the king’s peace.”
“It will go hard for them if they don’t,” said Grand Maester Pycelle. “By the love you bear them, you must urge them to walk the path of wisdom.”
“Your lady mother will no doubt fear for you dreadfully,” the queen said. “You must tell her that you are well and in our care, that we are treating you gently and seeing to your every want. Bid them to come to King’s Landing and pledge their fealty to Joffrey when he takes his throne. If they do that … why, then we shall know that there is no taint in your blood, and when you come into the flower of your womanhood, you shall wed the king in the Great Sept of Baelor, before the eyes of gods and men.”
 … wed the king … The words made her breath come faster, yet still Sansa hesitated. “Perhaps … if I might see my father, talk to him about …”
“Treason?” Lord Varys hinted.
“You disappoint me, Sansa,” the queen said, with eyes gone hard as stones. “We’ve told you of your father’s crimes. If you are truly as loyal as you say, why should you want to see him?”
“I … I only meant …” Sansa felt her eyes grow wet. “He’s not … please, he hasn’t been … hurt, or … or …”
“Lord Eddard has not been harmed,” the queen said.
“But … what’s to become of him?”
“That is a matter for the king to decide,” Grand Maester Pycelle announced ponderously.
The king! Sansa blinked back her tears. Joffrey was the king now, she thought. Her gallant prince would never hurt her father, no matter what he might have done. If she went to him and pleaded for mercy, she was certain he’d listen. He had to listen, he loved her, even the queen said so. Joff would need to punish Father, the lords would expect it, but perhaps he could send him back to Winterfell, or exile him to one of the Free Cities across the narrow sea. It would only have to be for a few years. By then she and Joffrey would be married. Once she was queen, she could persuade Joff to bring Father back and grant him a pardon.
Only … if Mother or Robb did anything treasonous, called the banners or refused to swear fealty or anything, it would all go wrong. Her Joffrey was good and kind, she knew it in her heart, but a king had to be stern with rebels. She had to make them understand, she had to!
“I’ll … I’ll write the letters,” Sansa told them.
With a smile as warm as the sunrise, Cersei Lannister leaned close and kissed her gently on the cheek. “I knew you would. Joffrey will be so proud when I tell him what courage and good sense you’ve shown here today.”
In the end, she wrote four letters. To her mother, the Lady Catelyn Stark, and to her brothers at Winterfell, and to her aunt and her grandfather as well, Lady Lysa Arryn of the Eyrie, and Lord Hoster Tully of Riverrun. By the time she had done, her fingers were cramped and stiff and stained with ink. Varys had her father’s seal. She warmed the pale white beeswax over a candle, poured it carefully, and watched as the eunuch stamped each letter with the direwolf of House Stark.
Jeyne Poole and all her things were gone when Ser Mandon Moore returned Sansa to the high tower of Maegor’s Holdfast. No more weeping, she thought gratefully. Yet somehow it seemed colder with Jeyne gone, even after she’d built a fire. She pulled a chair close to the hearth, took down one of her favorite books, and lost herself in the stories of Florian and Jonquil, of Lady Shella and the Rainbow Knight, of valiant Prince Aemon and his doomed love for his brother’s queen.
It was not until later that night, as she was drifting off to sleep, that Sansa realized she had forgotten to ask about her sister.

The walls of the throne room had been stripped bare, the hunting tapestries that King Robert loved taken down and stacked in the corner in an untidy heap.
Ser Mandon Moore went to take his place under the throne beside two of his fellows of the Kingsguard. Sansa hovered by the door, for once unguarded. The queen had given her freedom of the castle as a reward for being good, yet even so, she was escorted everywhere she went. “Honor guards for my daughter-to-be,” the queen called them, but they did not make Sansa feel honored.
“Freedom of the castle” meant that she could go wherever she chose within the Red Keep so long as she promised not to go beyond the walls, a promise Sansa had been more than willing to give. She couldn’t have gone beyond the walls anyway. The gates were watched day and night by Janos Slynt’s gold cloaks, and Lannister house guards were always about as well. Besides, even if she could leave the castle, where would she go? It was enough that she could walk in the yard, pick flowers in Myrcella’s garden, and visit the sept to pray for her father. Sometimes she prayed in the godswood as well, since the Starks kept the old gods.
This was the first court session of Joffrey’s reign, so Sansa looked about nervously. A line of Lannister house guards stood beneath the western windows, a line of gold-cloaked City Watchmen beneath the east. Of smallfolk and commoners, she saw no sign, but under the gallery a cluster of lords great and small milled restlessly. There were no more than twenty, where a hundred had been accustomed to wait upon King Robert.
Sansa slipped in among them, murmuring greetings as she worked her way toward the front. She recognized black-skinned Jalabhar Xho, gloomy Ser Aron Santagar, the Redwyne twins Horror and Slobber … only none of them seemed to recognize her. Or if they did, they shied away as if she had the grey plague. Sickly Lord Gyles covered his face at her approach and feigned a fit of coughing, and when funny drunken Ser Dontos started to hail her, Ser Balon Swann whispered in his ear and he turned away.
And so many others were missing. Where had the rest of them gone? Sansa wondered. Vainly, she searched for friendly faces. Not one of them would meet her eyes. It was as if she had become a ghost, dead before her time.
Grand Maester Pycelle was seated alone at the council table, seemingly asleep, his hands clasped together atop his beard. She saw Lord Varys hurry into the hall, his feet making no sound. A moment later Lord Baelish entered through the tall doors in the rear, smiling. He chatted amiably with Ser Balon and Ser Dontos as he made his way to the front. Butterflies fluttered nervously in Sansa’s stomach. I shouldn’t be afraid, she told herself. I have nothing to be afraid of, it will all come out well, Joff loves me and the queen does too, she said so.
A herald’s voice rang out. “All hail His Grace, Joffrey of the Houses Baratheon and Lannister, the First of his Name, King of the Andals, the Rhoynar, and the First Men, and Lord of the Seven Kingdoms. All hail his lady mother, Cersei of House Lannister, Queen Regent, Light of the West, and Protector of the Realm.”
Ser Barristan Selmy, resplendent in white plate, led them in. Ser Arys Oakheart escorted the queen, while Ser Boros Blount walked beside Joffrey, so six of the Kingsguard were now in the hall, all the White Swords save Jaime Lannister alone. Her prince—no, her king now!—took the steps of the Iron Throne two at a time, while his mother was seated with the council. Joff wore plush black velvets slashed with crimson, a shimmering cloth-of-gold cape with a high collar, and on his head a golden crown crusted with rubies and black diamonds.
When Joffrey turned to look out over the hall, his eye caught Sansa’s. He smiled, seated himself, and spoke. “It is a king’s duty to punish the disloyal and reward those who are true. Grand Maester Pycelle, I command you to read my decrees.”
Pycelle pushed himself to his feet. He was clad in a magnificent robe of thick red velvet, with an ermine collar and shiny gold fastenings. From a drooping sleeve, heavy with gilded scrollwork, he drew a parchment, unrolled it, and began to read a long list of names, commanding each in the name of king and council to present themselves and swear their fealty to Joffrey. Failing that, they would be adjudged traitors, their lands and titles forfeit to the throne.
The names he read made Sansa hold her breath. Lord Stannis Baratheon, his lady wife, his daughter. Lord Renly Baratheon. Both Lord Royces and their sons. Ser Loras Tyrell. Lord Mace Tyrell, his brothers, uncles, sons. The red priest, Thoros of Myr. Lord Beric Dondarrion. Lady Lysa Arryn and her son, the little Lord Robert. Lord Hoster Tully, his brother Ser Brynden, his son Ser Edmure. Lord Jason Mallister. Lord Bryce Caron of the Marches. Lord Tytos Blackwood. Lord Walder Frey and his heir Ser Stevron. Lord Karyl Vance. Lord Jonos Bracken. Lady Shella Whent. Doran Martell, Prince of Dorne, and all his sons. So many, she thought as Pycelle read on and on, it will take a whole flock of ravens to send out these commands.
And at the end, near last, came the names Sansa had been dreading. Lady Catelyn Stark. Robb Stark. Brandon Stark, Rickon Stark, Arya Stark. Sansa stifled a gasp. Arya. They wanted Arya to present herself and swear an oath … it must mean her sister had fled on the galley, she must be safe at Winterfell by now …
Grand Maester Pycelle rolled up the list, tucked it up his left sleeve, and pulled another parchment from his right. He cleared his throat and resumed. “In the place of the traitor Eddard Stark, it is the wish of His Grace that Tywin Lannister, Lord of Casterly Rock and Warden of the West, take up the office of Hand of the King, to speak with his voice, lead his armies against his enemies, and carry out his royal will. So the king has decreed. The small council consents.
“In the place of the traitor Stannis Baratheon, it is the wish of His Grace that his lady mother, the Queen Regent Cersei Lannister, who has ever been his staunchest support, be seated upon his small council, that she may help him rule wisely and with justice. So the king has decreed. The small council consents.”
Sansa heard a soft murmuring from the lords around her, but it was quickly stilled. Pycelle continued.
“It is also the wish of His Grace that his loyal servant, Janos Slynt, Commander of the City Watch of King’s Landing, be at once raised to the rank of lord and granted the ancient seat of Harrenhal with all its attendant lands and incomes, and that his sons and grandsons shall hold these honors after him until the end of time. It is moreover his command that Lord Slynt be seated immediately upon his small council, to assist in the governance of the realm. So the king has decreed. The small council consents.”
Sansa glimpsed motion from the corner of her eye as Janos Slynt made his entrance. This time the muttering was louder and angrier. Proud lords whose houses went back thousands of years made way reluctantly for the balding, frog-faced commoner as he marched past. Golden scales had been sewn onto the black velvet of his doublet and rang together softly with each step. His cloak was checked black-and-gold satin. Two ugly boys who must have been his sons went before him, struggling with the weight of a heavy metal shield as tall as they were. For his sigil he had taken a bloody spear, gold on a night-black field. The sight of it raised goose prickles up and down Sansa’s arms.
As Lord Slynt took his place, Grand Maester Pycelle resumed. “Lastly, in these times of treason and turmoil, with our beloved Robert so lately dead, it is the view of the council that the life and safety of King Joffrey is of paramount importance …” He looked to the queen.
Cersei stood. “Ser Barristan Selmy, stand forth.”
Ser Barristan had been standing at the foot of the Iron Throne, as still as any statue, but now he went to one knee and bowed his head. “Your Grace, I am yours to command.”
“Rise, Ser Barristan,” Cersei Lannister said. “You may remove your helm.”
“My lady?” Standing, the old knight took off his high white helm, though he did not seem to understand why.
“You have served the realm long and faithfully, good ser, and every man and woman in the Seven Kingdoms owes you thanks. Yet now I fear your service is at an end. It is the wish of king and council that you lay down your heavy burden.”
“My … burden? I fear I … I do not …”
The new-made lord, Janos Slynt, spoke up, his voice heavy and blunt. “Her Grace is trying to tell you that you are relieved as Lord Commander of the Kingsguard.”
The tall, white-haired knight seemed to shrink as he stood there, scarcely breathing. “Your Grace,” he said at last. “The Kingsguard is a Sworn Brotherhood. Our vows are taken for life. Only death may relieve the Lord Commander of his sacred trust.”
“Whose death, Ser Barristan?” The queen’s voice was soft as silk, but her words carried the whole length of the hall. “Yours, or your king’s?”
“You let my father die,” Joffrey said accusingly from atop the Iron Throne. “You’re too old to protect anybody.”
Sansa watched as the knight peered up at his new king. She had never seen him look his years before, yet now he did. “Your Grace,” he said. “I was chosen for the White Swords in my twenty-third year. It was all I had ever dreamed, from the moment I first took sword in hand. I gave up all claim to my ancestral keep. The girl I was to wed married my cousin in my place, I had no need of land or sons, my life would be lived for the realm. Ser Gerold Hightower himself heard my vows … to ward the king with all my strength … to give my blood for his … I fought beside the White Bull and Prince Lewyn of Dorne … beside Ser Arthur Dayne, the Sword of the Morning. Before I served your father, I helped shield King Aerys, and his father Jaehaerys before him … three kings …”
“And all of them dead,” Littlefinger pointed out.
“Your time is done,” Cersei Lannister announced. “Joffrey requires men around him who are young and strong. The council has determined that Ser Jaime Lannister will take your place as the Lord Commander of Sworn Brothers of the White Swords.”
“The Kingslayer,” Ser Barristan said, his voice hard with contempt. “The false knight who profaned his blade with the blood of the king he had sworn to defend.”
“Have a care for your words, ser,” the queen warned. “You are speaking of our beloved brother, your king’s own blood.”
Lord Varys spoke, gentler than the others. “We are not unmindful of your service, good ser. Lord Tywin Lannister has generously agreed to grant you a handsome tract of land north of Lannisport, beside the sea, with gold and men sufficient to build you a stout keep, and servants to see to your every need.”
Ser Barristan looked up sharply. “A hall to die in, and men to bury me. I thank you, my lords … but I spit upon your pity.” He reached up and undid the clasps that held his cloak in place, and the heavy white garment slithered from his shoulders to fall in a heap on the floor. His helmet dropped with a clang. “I am a knight,” he told them. He opened the silver fastenings of his breastplate and let that fall as well. “I shall die a knight.”
“A naked knight, it would seem,” quipped Littlefinger.
They all laughed then, Joffrey on his throne, and the lords standing attendance, Janos Slynt and Queen Cersei and Sandor Clegane and even the other men of the Kingsguard, the five who had been his brothers until a moment ago. Surely that must have hurt the most, Sansa thought. Her heart went out to the gallant old man as he stood shamed and red-faced, too angry to speak. Finally he drew his sword.
Sansa heard someone gasp. Ser Boros and Ser Meryn moved forward to confront him, but Ser Barristan froze them in place with a look that dripped contempt. “Have no fear, sers, your king is safe … no thanks to you. Even now, I could cut through the five of you as easy as a dagger cuts cheese. If you would serve under the Kingslayer, not a one of you is fit to wear the white.” He flung his sword at the foot of the Iron Throne. “Here, boy. Melt it down and add it to the others, if you like. It will do you more good than the swords in the hands of these five. Perhaps Lord Stannis will chance to sit on it when he takes your throne.”
He took the long way out, his steps ringing loud against the floor and echoing off the bare stone walls. Lords and ladies parted to let him pass. Not until the pages had closed the great oak-and-bronze doors behind him did Sansa hear sounds again: soft voices, uneasy stirrings, the shuffle of papers from the council table. “He called me boy,” Joffrey said peevishly, sounding younger than his years. “He talked about my uncle Stannis too.”
“Idle talk,” said Varys the eunuch. “Without meaning …”
“He could be making plots with my uncles. I want him seized and questioned.” No one moved. Joffrey raised his voice. “I said, I want him seized!”
Janos Slynt rose from the council table. “My gold cloaks will see to it, Your Grace.”
“Good,” said King Joffrey. Lord Janos strode from the hall, his ugly sons double-stepping to keep up as they lugged the great metal shield with the arms of House Slynt.
“Your Grace,” Littlefinger reminded the king. “If we might resume, the seven are now six. We find ourselves in need of a new sword for your Kingsguard.”
Joffrey smiled. “Tell them, Mother.”
“The king and council have determined that no man in the Seven Kingdoms is more fit to guard and protect His Grace than his sworn shield, Sandor Clegane.”
“How do you like that, dog?” King Joffrey asked.
The Hound’s scarred face was hard to read. He took a long moment to consider. “Why not? I have no lands nor wife to forsake, and who’d care if I did?” The burned side of his mouth twisted. “But I warn you, I’ll say no knight’s vows.”
“The Sworn Brothers of the Kingsguard have always been knights,” Ser Boros said firmly.
“Until now,” the Hound said in his deep rasp, and Ser Boros fell silent.
When the king’s herald moved forward, Sansa realized the moment was almost at hand. She smoothed down the cloth of her skirt nervously. She was dressed in mourning, as a sign of respect for the dead king, but she had taken special care to make herself beautiful. Her gown was the ivory silk that the queen had given her, the one Arya had ruined, but she’d had them dye it black and you couldn’t see the stain at all. She had fretted over her jewelry for hours and finally decided upon the elegant simplicity of a plain silver chain.
The herald’s voice boomed out. “If any man in this hall has other matters to set before His Grace, let him speak now or go forth and hold his silence.”
Sansa quailed. Now, she told herself, I must do it now. Gods give me courage. She took one step, then another. Lords and knights stepped aside silently to let her pass, and she felt the weight of their eyes on her. I must be as strong as my lady mother. “Your Grace,” she called out in a soft, tremulous voice.
The height of the Iron Throne gave Joffrey a better vantage point than anyone else in the hall. He was the first to see her. “Come forward, my lady,” he called out, smiling.
His smile emboldened her, made her feel beautiful and strong. He does love me, he does. Sansa lifted her head and walked toward him, not too slow and not too fast. She must not let them see how nervous she was.
“The Lady Sansa, of House Stark,” the herald cried.
She stopped under the throne, at the spot where Ser Barristan’s white cloak lay puddled on the floor beside his helm and breastplate. “Do you have some business for king and council, Sansa?” the queen asked from the council table.
“I do.” She knelt on the cloak, so as not to spoil her gown, and looked up at her prince on his fearsome black throne. “As it please Your Grace, I ask mercy for my father, Lord Eddard Stark, who was the Hand of the King.” She had practiced the words a hundred times.
The queen sighed. “Sansa, you disappoint me. What did I tell you about traitor’s blood?”
“Your father has committed grave and terrible crimes, my lady,” Grand Maester Pycelle intoned.
“Ah, poor sad thing,” sighed Varys. “She is only a babe, my lords, she does not know what she asks.”
Sansa had eyes only for Joffrey. He must listen to me, he must, she thought. The king shifted on his seat. “Let her speak,” he commanded. “I want to hear what she says.”
“Thank you, Your Grace.” Sansa smiled, a shy secret smile, just for him. He was listening. She knew he would.
“Treason is a noxious weed,” Pycelle declared solemnly. “It must be torn up, root and stem and seed, lest new traitors sprout from every roadside.”
“Do you deny your father’s crime?” Lord Baelish asked.
“No, my lords.” Sansa knew better than that. “I know he must be punished. All I ask is mercy. I know my lord father must regret what he did. He was King Robert’s friend and he loved him, you all know he loved him. He never wanted to be Hand until the king asked him. They must have lied to him. Lord Renly or Lord Stannis or … or somebody, they must have lied, otherwise …”
King Joffrey leaned forward, hands grasping the arms of the throne. Broken sword points fanned out between his fingers. “He said I wasn’t the king. Why did he say that?”
“His leg was broken,” Sansa replied eagerly. “It hurt ever so much, Maester Pycelle was giving him milk of the poppy, and they say that milk of the poppy fills your head with clouds. Otherwise he would never have said it.”
Varys said, “A child’s faith … such sweet innocence … and yet, they say wisdom oft comes from the mouths of babes.”
“Treason is treason,” Pycelle replied at once.
Joffrey rocked restlessly on the throne. “Mother?”
Cersei Lannister considered Sansa thoughtfully. “If Lord Eddard were to confess his crime,” she said at last, “we would know he had repented his folly.”
Joffrey pushed himself to his feet. Please, Sansa thought, please, please, be the king I know you are, good and kind and noble, please. “Do you have any more to say?” he asked her.
“Only … that as you love me, you do me this kindness, my prince,” Sansa said.
King Joffrey looked her up and down. “Your sweet words have moved me,” he said gallantly, nodding, as if to say all would be well. “I shall do as you ask … but first your father has to confess. He has to confess and say that I’m the king, or there will be no mercy for him.”
“He will,” Sansa said, heart soaring. “Oh, I know he will.”

In the tower room at the heart of Maegor’s Holdfast, Sansa gave herself to the darkness.
She drew the curtains around her bed, slept, woke weeping, and slept again. When she could not sleep she lay under her blankets shivering with grief. Servants came and went, bringing meals, but the sight of food was more than she could bear. The dishes piled up on the table beneath her window, untouched and spoiling, until the servants took them away again.
Sometimes her sleep was leaden and dreamless, and she woke from it more tired than when she had closed her eyes. Yet those were the best times, for when she dreamed, she dreamed of Father. Waking or sleeping, she saw him, saw the gold cloaks fling him down, saw Ser Ilyn striding forward, unsheathing Ice from the scabbard on his back, saw the moment … the moment when … she had wanted to look away, she had wanted to, her legs had gone out from under her and she had fallen to her knees, yet somehow she could not turn her head, and all the people were screaming and shouting, and her prince had smiled at her, he’d smiled and she’d felt safe, but only for a heartbeat, until he said those words, and her father’s legs … that was what she remembered, his legs, the way they’d jerked when Ser Ilyn … when the sword …
Perhaps I will die too, she told herself, and the thought did not seem so terrible to her. If she flung herself from the window, she could put an end to her suffering, and in the years to come the singers would write songs of her grief. Her body would lie on the stones below, broken and innocent, shaming all those who had betrayed her. Sansa went so far as to cross the bedchamber and throw open the shutters … but then her courage left her, and she ran back to her bed, sobbing.
The serving girls tried to talk to her when they brought her meals, but she never answered them. Once Grand Maester Pycelle came with a box of flasks and bottles, to ask if she was ill. He felt her brow, made her undress, and touched her all over while her bedmaid held her down. When he left he gave her a potion of honeywater and herbs and told her to drink a swallow every night. She drank it all right then and went back to sleep.
She dreamt of footsteps on the tower stair, an ominous scraping of leather on stone as a man climbed slowly toward her bedchamber, step by step. All she could do was huddle behind her door and listen, trembling, as he came closer and closer. It was Ser Ilyn Payne, she knew, coming for her with Ice in his hand, coming to take her head. There was no place to run, no place to hide, no way to bar the door. Finally the footsteps stopped and she knew he was just outside, standing there silent with his dead eyes and his long pocked face. That was when she realized she was naked. She crouched down, trying to cover herself with her hands, as her door began to swing open, creaking, the point of the greatsword poking through …
She woke murmuring, “Please, please, I’ll be good, I’ll be good, please don’t,” but there was no one to hear.
When they finally came for her in truth, Sansa never heard their footsteps. It was Joffrey who opened her door, not Ser Ilyn but the boy who had been her prince. She was in bed, curled up tight, her curtains drawn, and she could not have said if it was noon or midnight. The first thing she heard was the slam of the door. Then her bed hangings were yanked back, and she threw up a hand against the sudden light and saw them standing over her.
“You will attend me in court this afternoon,” Joffrey said. “See that you bathe and dress as befits my betrothed.” Sandor Clegane stood at his shoulder in a plain brown doublet and green mantle, his burned face hideous in the morning light. Behind them were two knights of the Kingsguard in long white satin cloaks.
Sansa drew her blanket up to her chin to cover herself. “No,” she whimpered, “please … leave me be.”
“If you won’t rise and dress yourself, my Hound will do it for you,” Joffrey said.
“I beg of you, my prince …”
“I’m king now. Dog, get her out of bed.”
Sandor Clegane scooped her up around the waist and lifted her off the featherbed as she struggled feebly. Her blanket fell to the floor. Underneath she had only a thin bedgown to cover her nakedness. “Do as you’re bid, child,” Clegane said. “Dress.” He pushed her toward her wardrobe, almost gently.
Sansa backed away from them. “I did as the queen asked, I wrote the letters, I wrote what she told me. You promised you’d be merciful. Please, let me go home. I won’t do any treason, I’ll be good, I swear it, I don’t have traitor’s blood, I don’t. I only want to go home.” Remembering her courtesies, she lowered her head. “As it please you,” she finished weakly.
“It does not please me,” Joffrey said. “Mother says I’m still to marry you, so you’ll stay here, and you’ll obey.”
“I don’t want to marry you,” Sansa wailed. “You chopped off my father’s head!”
“He was a traitor. I never promised to spare him, only that I’d be merciful, and I was. If he hadn’t been your father, I would have had him torn or flayed, but I gave him a clean death.”
Sansa stared at him, seeing him for the first time. He was wearing a padded crimson doublet patterned with lions and a cloth-of-gold cape with a high collar that framed his face. She wondered how she could ever have thought him handsome. His lips were as soft and red as the worms you found after a rain, and his eyes were vain and cruel. “I hate you,” she whispered.
King Joffrey’s face hardened. “My mother tells me that it isn’t fitting that a king should strike his wife. Ser Meryn.”
The knight was on her before she could think, yanking back her hand as she tried to shield her face and back-handing her across the ear with a gloved fist. Sansa did not remember falling, yet the next she knew she was sprawled on one knee amongst the rushes. Her head was ringing. Ser Meryn Trant stood over her, with blood on the knuckles of his white silk glove.
“Will you obey now, or shall I have him chastise you again?”
Sansa’s ear felt numb. She touched it, and her fingertips came away wet and red. “I … as … as you command, my lord.”
“Your Grace,” Joffrey corrected her. “I shall look for you in court.” He turned and left.
Ser Meryn and Ser Arys followed him out, but Sandor Clegane lingered long enough to yank her roughly to her feet. “Save yourself some pain, girl, and give him what he wants.”
“What … what does he want? Please, tell me.”
“He wants you to smile and smell sweet and be his lady love,” the Hound rasped. “He wants to hear you recite all your pretty little words the way the septa taught you. He wants you to love him … and fear him.”
After he was gone, Sansa sank back onto the rushes, staring at the wall until two of her bedmaids crept timidly into the chamber. “I will need hot water for my bath, please,” she told them, “and perfume, and some powder to hide this bruise.” The right side of her face was swollen and beginning to ache, but she knew Joffrey would want her to be beautiful.
The hot water made her think of Winterfell, and she took strength from that. She had not washed since the day her father died, and she was startled at how filthy the water became. Her maids sluiced the blood off her face, scrubbed the dirt from her back, washed her hair and brushed it out until it sprang back in thick auburn curls. Sansa did not speak to them, except to give them commands; they were Lannister servants, not her own, and she did not trust them. When the time came to dress, she chose the green silk gown that she had worn to the tourney. She recalled how gallant Joff had been to her that night at the feast. Perhaps it would make him remember as well, and treat her more gently.
She drank a glass of buttermilk and nibbled at some sweet biscuits as she waited, to settle her stomach. It was midday when Ser Meryn returned. He had donned his white armor; a shirt of enameled scales chased with gold, a tall helm with a golden sunburst crest, greaves and gorget and gauntlet and boots of gleaming plate, a heavy wool cloak clasped with a golden lion. His visor had been removed from his helm, to better show his dour face; pouchy bags under his eyes, a wide sour mouth, rusty hair spotted with grey. “My lady,” he said, bowing, as if he had not beaten her bloody only three hours past. “His Grace has instructed me to escort you to the throne room.”
“Did he instruct you to hit me if I refused to come?”
“Are you refusing to come, my lady?” The look he gave her was without expression. He did not so much as glance at the bruise he had left her.
He did not hate her, Sansa realized; neither did he love her. He felt nothing for her at all. She was only a … a thing to him. “No,” she said, rising. She wanted to rage, to hurt him as he’d hurt her, to warn him that when she was queen she would have him exiled if he ever dared strike her again … but she remembered what the Hound had told her, so all she said was, “I shall do whatever His Grace commands.”
“As I do,” he replied.
“Yes … but you are no true knight, Ser Meryn.”
Sandor Clegane would have laughed at that, Sansa knew. Other men might have cursed her, warned her to keep silent, even begged for her forgiveness. Ser Meryn Trant did none of these. Ser Meryn Trant simply did not care.
The balcony was deserted save for Sansa. She stood with her head bowed, fighting to hold back her tears, while below Joffrey sat on his Iron Throne and dispensed what it pleased him to call justice. Nine cases out of ten seemed to bore him; those he allowed his council to handle, squirming restlessly while Lord Baelish, Grand Maester Pycelle, or Queen Cersei resolved the matter. When he did choose to make a ruling, though, not even his queen mother could sway him.
A thief was brought before him and he had Ser Ilyn chop his hand off, right there in court. Two knights came to him with a dispute about some land, and he decreed that they should duel for it on the morrow. “To the death,” he added. A woman fell to her knees to plead for the head of a man executed as a traitor. She had loved him, she said, and she wanted to see him decently buried. “If you loved a traitor, you must be a traitor too,” Joffrey said. Two gold cloaks dragged her off to the dungeons.
Frog-faced Lord Slynt sat at the end of the council table wearing a black velvet doublet and a shiny cloth-of-gold cape, nodding with approval every time the king pronounced a sentence. Sansa stared hard at his ugly face, remembering how he had thrown down her father for Ser Ilyn to behead, wishing she could hurt him, wishing that some hero would throw him down and cut off his head. But a voice inside her whispered, There are no heroes, and she remembered what Lord Petyr had said to her, here in this very hall. “Life is not a song, sweetling,” he’d told her. “You may learn that one day to your sorrow.” In life, the monsters win, she told herself, and now it was the Hound’s voice she heard, a cold rasp, metal on stone. “Save yourself some pain, girl, and give him what he wants.”
The last case was a plump tavern singer, accused of making a song that ridiculed the late King Robert. Joff commanded them to fetch his woodharp and ordered him to perform the song for the court. The singer wept and swore he would never sing that song again, but the king insisted. It was sort of a funny song, all about Robert fighting with a pig. The pig was the boar who’d killed him, Sansa knew, but in some verses it almost sounded as if he were singing about the queen. When the song was done, Joffrey announced that he’d decided to be merciful. The singer could keep either his fingers or his tongue. He would have a day to make his choice. Janos Slynt nodded.
That was the final business of the afternoon, Sansa saw with relief, but her ordeal was not yet done. When the herald’s voice dismissed the court, she fled the balcony, only to find Joffrey waiting for her at the base of the curving stairs. The Hound was with him, and Ser Meryn as well. The young king examined her critically, top to bottom. “You look much better than you did.”
“Thank you, Your Grace,” Sansa said. Hollow words, but they made him nod and smile.
“Walk with me,” Joffrey commanded, offering her his arm. She had no choice but to take it. The touch of his hand would have thrilled her once; now it made her flesh crawl. “My name day will be here soon,” Joffrey said as they slipped out the rear of the throne room. “There will be a great feast, and gifts. What are you going to give me?”
“I … I had not thought, my lord.”
“Your Grace,” he said sharply. “You truly are a stupid girl, aren’t you? My mother says so.”
“She does?” After all that had happened, his words should have lost their power to hurt her, yet somehow they had not. The queen had always been so kind to her.
“Oh, yes. She worries about our children, whether they’ll be stupid like you, but I told her not to trouble herself.” The king gestured, and Ser Meryn opened a door for them.
“Thank you, Your Grace,” she murmured. The Hound was right, she thought, I am only a little bird, repeating the words they taught me. The sun had fallen below the western wall, and the stones of the Red Keep glowed dark as blood.
“I’ll get you with child as soon as you’re able,” Joffrey said as he escorted her across the practice yard. “If the first one is stupid, I’ll chop off your head and find a smarter wife. When do you think you’ll be able to have children?”
Sansa could not look at him, he shamed her so. “Septa Mordane says most … most highborn girls have their flowering at twelve or thirteen.”
Joffrey nodded. “This way.” He led her into the gatehouse, to the base of the steps that led up to the battlements.
Sansa jerked back away from him, trembling. Suddenly she knew where they were going. “No,” she said, her voice a frightened gasp. “Please, no, don’t make me, I beg you …”
Joffrey pressed his lips together. “I want to show you what happens to traitors.”
Sansa shook her head wildly. “I won’t. I won’t.”
“I can have Ser Meryn drag you up,” he said. “You won’t like that. You had better do what I say.” Joffrey reached for her, and Sansa cringed away from him, backing into the Hound.
“Do it, girl,” Sandor Clegane told her, pushing her back toward the king. His mouth twitched on the burned side of his face and Sansa could almost hear the rest of it. He'll have you up there no matter what, so give him what he wants.
She forced herself to take King Joffrey’s hand. The climb was something out of a nightmare; every step was a struggle, as if she were pulling her feet out of ankle-deep mud, and there were more steps than she would have believed, a thousand thousand steps, and horror waiting on the ramparts.
From the high battlements of the gatehouse, the whole world spread out below them. Sansa could see the Great Sept of Baelor on Visenya’s hill, where her father had died. At the other end of the Street of the Sisters stood the fire-blackened ruins of the Dragonpit. To the west, the swollen red sun was half-hidden behind the Gate of the Gods. The salt sea was at her back, and to the south was the fish market and the docks and the swirling torrent of the Blackwater Rush. And to the north …
She turned that way, and saw only the city, streets and alleys and hills and bottoms and more streets and more alleys and the stone of distant walls. Yet she knew that beyond them was open country, farms and fields and forests, and beyond that, north and north and north again, stood Winterfell.
“What are you looking at?” Joffrey said. “This is what I wanted you to see, right here.”
A thick stone parapet protected the outer edge of the rampart, reaching as high as Sansa’s chin, with crenellations cut into it every five feet for archers. The heads were mounted between the crenels, along the top of the wall, impaled on iron spikes so they faced out over the city. Sansa had noted them the moment she’d stepped out onto the wallwalk, but the river and the bustling streets and the setting sun were ever so much prettier. He can make me look at the heads, she told herself, but he can’t make me see them.
“This one is your father,” he said. “This one here. Dog, turn it around so she can see him.”
Sandor Clegane took the head by the hair and turned it. The severed head had been dipped in tar to preserve it longer. Sansa looked at it calmly, not seeing it at all. It did not really look like Lord Eddard, she thought; it did not even look real. “How long do I have to look?”
Joffrey seemed disappointed. “Do you want to see the rest?” There was a long row of them.
“If it please Your Grace.”
Joffrey marched her down the wallwalk, past a dozen more heads and two empty spikes. “I’m saving those for my uncle Stannis and my uncle Renly,” he explained. The other heads had been dead and mounted much longer than her father. Despite the tar, most were long past being recognizable. The king pointed to one and said, “That’s your septa there,” but Sansa could not even have told that it was a woman. The jaw had rotted off her face, and birds had eaten one ear and most of a cheek.
Sansa had wondered what had happened to Septa Mordane, although she supposed she had known all along. “Why did you kill her?” she asked. “She was god-sworn …”
“She was a traitor.” Joffrey looked pouty; somehow she was upsetting him. “You haven’t said what you mean to give me for my name day. Maybe I should give you something instead, would you like that?”
“If it please you, my lord,” Sansa said.
When he smiled, she knew he was mocking her. “Your brother is a traitor too, you know.” He turned Septa Mordane’s head back around. “I remember your brother from Winterfell. My dog called him the lord of the wooden sword. Didn’t you, dog?”
“Did I?” the Hound replied. “I don’t recall.”
Joffrey gave a petulant shrug. “Your brother defeated my uncle Jaime. My mother says it was treachery and deceit. She wept when she heard. Women are all weak, even her, though she pretends she isn’t. She says we need to stay in King’s Landing in case my other uncles attack, but I don’t care. After my name day feast, I’m going to raise a host and kill your brother myself. That’s what I’ll give you, Lady Sansa. Your brother’s head.”
A kind of madness took over her then, and she heard herself say, “Maybe my brother will give me your head.”
Joffrey scowled. “You must never mock me like that. A true wife does not mock her lord. Ser Meryn, teach her.”
This time the knight grasped her beneath the jaw and held her head still as he struck her. He hit her twice, left to right, and harder, right to left. Her lip split and blood ran down her chin, to mingle with the salt of her tears.
“You shouldn’t be crying all the time,” Joffrey told her. “You’re more pretty when you smile and laugh.”
Sansa made herself smile, afraid that he would have Ser Meryn hit her again if she did not, but it was no good, the king still shook his head. “Wipe off the blood, you’re all messy.”
The outer parapet came up to her chin, but along the inner edge of the walk was nothing, nothing but a long plunge to the bailey seventy or eighty feet below. All it would take was a shove, she told herself. He was standing right there, right there, smirking at her with those fat wormlips. You could do it, she told herself. You could. Do it right now. It wouldn’t even matter if she went over with him. It wouldn’t matter at all.
“Here, girl.” Sandor Clegane knelt before her, between her and Joffrey. With a delicacy surprising in such a big man, he dabbed at the blood welling from her broken lip.
The moment was gone. Sansa lowered her eyes. “Thank you,” she said when he was done. She was a good girl, and always remembered her courtesies.

The morning of King Joffrey’s name day dawned bright and windy, with the 
long tail of the great comet visible through the high scuttling clouds. Sansa 
was watching it from her tower window when Ser Arys Oakheart arrived to escort 
her down to the tourney grounds. “What do you think it means?” she asked 
him.
“Glory to your betrothed,” Ser Arys answered at once. “See how it flames 
across the sky today on His Grace’s name day, as if the gods themselves had 
raised a banner in his honor. The smallfolk have named it King Joffrey’s 
Comet.”Doubtless that was what they told Joffrey; Sansa was not so sure. “I’ve 
heard servants calling it the Dragon’s Tail.”
“King Joffrey sits where Aegon the Dragon once sat, in the castle built by his 
son,” Ser Arys said. “He is the dragon’s heir—and crimson is the color 
of House Lannister, another sign. This comet is sent to herald Joffrey’s ascent 
to the throne, I have no doubt. It means that he will triumph over his 
enemies.”
Is it true? she wondered. Would the gods be so cruel? Her 
mother was one of Joffrey’s enemies now, her brother Robb another. Her father 
had died by the king’s command. Must Robb and her lady mother die next? The 
comet was red, but Joffrey was Baratheon as much as Lannister, and 
their sigil was a black stag on a golden field. Shouldn’t the gods have sent 
Joff a golden comet?Sansa closed the shutters and turned sharply away from the window. “You 
look very lovely today, my lady,” Ser Arys said.
“Thank you, ser.” Knowing that Joffrey would require her to attend the 
tourney in his honor, Sansa had taken special care with her face and clothes. 
She wore a gown of pale purple silk and a moonstone hair net that had been a 
gift from Joffrey. The gown had long sleeves to hide the bruises on her arms. 
Those were Joffrey’s gifts as well. When they told him that Robb had been 
proclaimed King in the North, his rage had been a fearsome thing, and he had 
sent Ser Boros to beat her.
“Shall we go?” Ser Arys offered his arm and she let him lead her from her 
chamber. If she must have one of the Kingsguard dogging her steps, Sansa 
preferred that it be him. Ser Boros was short-tempered, Ser Meryn cold, and Ser 
Mandon’s strange dead eyes made her uneasy, while Ser Preston treated her like 
a lackwit child. Arys Oakheart was courteous, and would talk to her cordially. 
Once he even objected when Joffrey commanded him to hit her. He did 
hit her in the end, but not hard as Ser Meryn or Ser Boros might have, and at 
least he had argued. The others obeyed without 
question . . . except for the Hound, but Joff never asked the 
Hound to punish her. He used the other five for that.
Ser Arys had light brown hair and a face that was not unpleasant to look upon. 
Today he made quite the dashing figure, with his white silk cloak fastened at 
the shoulder by a golden leaf, and a spreading oak tree worked upon the breast 
of his tunic in shining gold thread. “Who do you think will win the day’s

honors?” Sansa asked as they descended the steps arm in arm.
“I will,” Ser Arys answered, smiling. “Yet I fear the triumph will have no 
savor. This will be a small field, and poor. No more than two score will enter 
the lists, including squires and freeriders. There is small honor in unhorsing 
green boys.”
The last tourney had been different, Sansa reflected. King Robert had staged it 
in her father’s honor. High lords and fabled champions had come from all over 
the realm to compete, and the whole city had turned out to watch. She 
remembered the splendor of it: the field of pavilions along the river with a 
knight’s shield hung before each door, the long rows of silken pennants waving 
in the wind, the gleam of sunlight on bright steel and gilded spurs. The days 
had rung to the sounds of trumpets and pounding hooves, and the nights had been 
full of feasts and song. Those had been the most magical days of her life, but 
they seemed a memory from another age now. Robert Baratheon was dead, and her 
father as well, beheaded for a traitor on the steps of the Great Sept of 
Baelor. Now there were three kings in the land, and war raged beyond the 
Trident while the city filled with desperate men. Small wonder that they had to 
hold Joff’s tournament behind the thick stone walls of the Red Keep.
“Will the queen attend, do you think?” Sansa always felt safer when Cersei 
was there to restrain her son.
“I fear not, my lady. The council is meeting, some urgent business.” Ser Arys 
dropped his voice. “Lord Tywin has gone to ground at Harrenhal instead of 
bringing his army to the city as

the queen commanded. Her Grace is furious.” He fell silent as a column of 
Lannister guardsmen marched past, in crimson cloaks and lion-crested helms. Ser 
Arys was fond of gossip, but only when he was certain that no one was 
listening.
The carpenters had erected a gallery and lists in the outer bailey. It was a 
poor thing indeed, and the meager throng that had gathered to watch filled but 
half the seats. Most of the spectators were guardsmen in the gold cloaks of the 
City Watch or the crimson of House Lannister; of lords and ladies there were 
but a paltry few, the handful that remained at court. Grey-faced Lord Gyles 
Rosby was coughing into a square of pink silk. Lady Tanda was bracketed by her 
daughters, placid dull Lollys and acid-tongued Falyse. Ebon-skinned Jalabhar 
Xho was an exile who had no other refuge, Lady Ermesande a babe seated on her 
wet nurse’s lap. The talk was she would soon be wed to one of the queen’s 
cousins, so the Lannisters might claim her lands.
The king was shaded beneath a crimson canopy, one leg thrown negligently over 
the carved wooden arm of his chair. Princess Myrcella and Prince Tommen sat 
behind him. In the back of the royal box, Sandor Clegane stood at guard, his 
hands resting on his swordbelt. The white cloak of the Kingsguard was draped 
over his broad shoulders and fastened with a jeweled brooch, the snowy cloth 
looking somehow unnatural against his brown roughspun tunic and studded leather 
jerkin. “Lady Sansa,” the Hound announced curtly when he saw her. His voice 
was as rough as the sound of a saw on wood. The burn scars on his face and 
throat made one side

of his mouth twitch when he spoke.
Princess Myrcella nodded a shy greeting at the sound of Sansa’s name, but plump 
little Prince Tommen jumped up eagerly. “Sansa, did you hear? I’m to ride in 
the tourney today. Mother said I could.” Tommen was all of eight. He reminded 
her of her own little brother, Bran. They were of an age. Bran was back at 
Winterfell, a cripple, yet safe.
Sansa would have given anything to be with him. “I fear for the life of your 
foeman,” she told Tommen solemnly.
“His foeman will be stuffed with straw,” Joff said as he rose. The king was 
clad in a gilded breastplate with a roaring lion engraved upon its chest, as if 
he expected the war to engulf them at any moment. He was thirteen today, and 
tall for his age, with the green eyes and golden hair of the 
Lannisters.
“Your Grace,” she said, dipping in a curtsy.
Ser Arys bowed. “Pray pardon me, Your Grace. I must equip myself for the 
lists.”
Joffrey waved a curt dismissal while he studied Sansa from head to heels. “I’m 
pleased you wore my stones.”
So the king had decided to play the gallant today. Sansa was relieved. “I 
thank you for them . . . and for your tender words. I pray you 
a lucky name day, Your Grace.”
“Sit,” Joff commanded, gesturing her to the empty seat beside his own. “Have 
you heard? The Beggar King is dead.”
“Who?” For a moment Sansa was afraid he meant Robb.
“Viserys. The last son of Mad King Aerys. He’s been going

about the Free Cities since before I was born, calling himself a king. Well, 
Mother says the Dothraki finally crowned him. With molten gold.” He laughed. 
“That’s funny, don’t you think? The dragon was their sigil. It’s almost as 
good as if some wolf killed your traitor brother. Maybe I’ll feed him to wolves 
after I’ve caught him. Did I tell you, I intend to challenge him to single 
combat?”
“I should like to see that, Your Grace.” More than you know. Sansa 
kept her tone cool and polite, yet even so Joffrey’s eyes narrowed as he tried 
to decide whether she was mocking him. “Will you enter the lists today?” she 
asked quickly.
The king frowned. “My lady mother said it was not fitting, since the tourney 
is in my honor. Otherwise I would have been champion. Isn’t that so, 
dog?”
The Hound’s mouth twitched. “Against this lot? Why not?”
He had been the champion in her father’s tourney, Sansa remembered. 
“Will you joust today, my lord?” she asked him.
Clegane’s voice was thick with contempt. “Wouldn’t be worth the bother of 
arming myself. This is a tournament of gnats.”
The king laughed. “My dog has a fierce bark. Perhaps I should command him to 
fight the day’s champion. To the death.” Joffrey was fond of making men fight 
to the death.
“You’d be one knight the poorer.” The Hound had never taken a knight’s vows. 
His brother was a knight, and he hated his brother.
A blare of trumpets sounded. The king settled back in his

seat and took Sansa’s hand. Once that would have set her heart to pounding, but 
that was before he had answered her plea for mercy by presenting her with her 
father’s head. His touch filled her with revulsion now, but she knew better 
than to show it. She made herself sit very still.
“Ser Meryn Trant of the Kingsguard,” a herald called.
Ser Meryn entered from the west side of the yard, clad in gleaming white 
plate chased with gold and mounted on a milk-white charger with a flowing grey 
mane. His cloak streamed behind him like a field of snow. He carried a 
twelve-foot lance.
“Ser Hobber of House Redwyne, of the Arbor,” the herald sang. Ser 
Hobber trotted in from the east, riding a black stallion caparisoned in 
burgundy and blue. His lance was striped in the same colors, and his shield 
bore the grape cluster sigil of his House. The Redwyne twins were the queen’s 
unwilling guests, even as Sansa was. She wondered whose notion it had been for 
them to ride in Joffrey’s tourney. Not their own, she thought.
At a signal from the master of revels, the combatants couched their lances and 
put their spurs to their mounts. There were shouts from the watching guardsmen 
and the lords and ladies in the gallery. The knights came together in the 
center of the yard with a great shock of wood and steel. The white lance and 
the striped one exploded in splinters within a second of each other. Hobber 
Redwyne reeled at the impact, yet somehow managed to keep his seat. Wheeling 
their horses about at the far end of the lists, the knights tossed down their 
broken lances and

accepted replacements from the squires. Ser Horas Redwyne, Ser
Hobber’s twin, 
shouted encouragement to his brother.
But on their second pass Ser Meryn swung the point of his lance to strike Ser 
Hobber in the chest, driving him from the saddle to crash resoundingly to the 
earth. Ser Horas cursed and ran out to help his battered brother from the 
field.
“Poorly ridden,” declared King Joffrey.
“Ser Balon Swann, of Stonehelm in the Red Watch,” came the herald’s 
cry. Wide white wings ornamented Ser Balon’s greathelm, and black and white 
swans fought on his shield. “Morros of House Slynt, heir to Lord Janos of 
Harrenhal.”
“Look at that upjumped oaf,” Joff hooted, loud enough for half the yard to 
hear. Morros, a mere squire and a new-made squire at that, was having 
difficulty managing lance and shield. The lance was a knight’s weapon, Sansa 
knew, the Slynts lowborn. Lord Janos had been no more than commander of the 
City Watch before Joffrey had raised him to Harrenhal and the 
council.
I hope he falls and shames himself, she thought bitterly. I hope 
Ser Balon kills him. When Joffrey proclaimed her father’s death, it had 
been Janos Slynt who seized Lord Eddard’s severed head by the hair and raised 
it on high for king and crowd to behold, while Sansa wept and 
screamed.
Morros wore a checkered black-and-gold cloak over black armor inlaid with 
golden scrollwork. On his shield was the bloody spear his father had chosen as 
the sigil of their new-made house. But he did not seem to know what to do with 
the shield as he urged

his horse forward, and Ser Balon’s point struck the blazon square. Morros 
dropped his lance, fought for balance, and lost. One foot caught in a stirrup 
as he fell, and the runaway charger dragged the youth to the end of the lists, 
head bouncing against the ground. Joff hooted derision. Sansa was appalled, 
wondering if the gods had heard her vengeful prayer. But when they disentangled 
Morros Slynt from his horse, they found him bloodied but alive. “Tommen, we 
picked the wrong foe for you,” the king told his brother. “The straw knight 
jousts better than that one.”
Next came Ser Horas Redwyne’s turn. He fared better than his twin, vanquishing 
an elderly knight whose mount was bedecked with silver griffins against a 
striped blue-and-white field. Splendid as he looked, the old man made a poor 
contest of it. Joffrey curled his lip. “This is a feeble show.”
“I warned you,” said the Hound. “Gnats.”
The king was growing bored. It made Sansa anxious. She lowered her eyes and 
resolved to keep quiet, no matter what. When Joffrey Baratheon’s mood darkened, 
any chance word might set off one of his rages.
“Lothor Brune, freerider in the service of Lord
Baelish,” cried the 
herald. “Ser Dontos the Red, of House Hollard.”
The freerider, a small man in dented plate without device, duly appeared at the 
west end of the yard, but of his opponent there was no sign. Finally a chestnut 
stallion trotted into view in a swirl of crimson and scarlet silks, but Ser 
Dontos was not on it. The knight appeared a moment later, cursing and 
staggering,

clad in breastplate and plumed helm and nothing else. His legs were pale and 
skinny, and his manhood flopped about obscenely as he chased after his horse. 
The watchers roared and shouted insults. Catching his horse by the bridle, Ser 
Dontos tried to mount, but the animal would not stand still and the knight was 
so drunk that his bare foot kept missing the stirrup.
By then the crowd was howling with laughter . . . all but the 
king. Joffrey had a look in his eyes that Sansa remembered well, the same look 
he’d had at the Great Sept of Baelor the day he pronounced death on Lord Eddard 
Stark. Finally Ser Dontos the Red gave it up for a bad job, sat down in the 
dirt, and removed his plumed helm. “I lose,” he shouted. “Fetch me some 
wine.”
The king stood. “A cask from the cellars! I’ll see him drowned in 
it.”
Sansa heard herself gasp. “No, you can’t.”
Joffrey turned his head. “What did you say?”
Sansa could not believe she had spoken. Was she mad? To tell him no 
in front of half the court? She hadn’t meant to say anything, 
only . . . Ser Dontos was drunk and silly and useless, but he 
meant no harm.
“Did you say I can’t? Did you?”
“Please,” Sansa said, “I only meant . . . it would be ill 
luck, Your Grace . . . to, to kill a man on your name 
day.”
“You’re lying,” Joffrey said. “I ought to drown you with him, if you care 
for him so much.”
“I don’t care for him, Your Grace.” The words tumbled out

desperately. “Drown him or have his head off, only . . . kill 
him on the morrow, if you like, but please . . . not today, not 
on your name day. I couldn’t bear for you to have ill 
luck . . . terrible luck, even for kings, the singers all say 
so . . .”
Joffrey scowled. He knew she was lying, she could see it. He would make her 
bleed for this.
“The girl speaks truly,” the Hound rasped. “What a man sows on his name day, 
he reaps throughout the year.” His voice was flat, as if he did not care a 
whit whether the king believed him or no. Could it be true? Sansa 
had not known. It was just something she’d said, desperate to avoid 
punishment.
Unhappy, Joffrey shifted in his seat and flicked his fingers at Ser Dontos. 
“Take him away. I’ll have him killed on the morrow, the fool.”
“He is,” Sansa said. “A fool. You’re so clever, to see it. He’s better 
fitted to be a fool than a knight, isn’t he? You ought to dress him in motley 
and make him clown for you. He doesn’t deserve the mercy of a quick 
death.”
The king studied her a moment. “Perhaps you’re not so stupid as Mother says.” 
He raised his voice. “Did you hear my lady, Dontos? From this day on, you’re 
my new fool. You can sleep with Moon Boy and dress in motley.”
Ser Dontos, sobered by his near brush with death, crawled to his knees. “Thank 
you, Your Grace. And you, my lady. Thank you.”
As a brace of Lannister guardsmen led him off, the master of revels approached 
the box. “Your Grace,” he said, “shall I summon

a new challenger for Brune, or proceed with the next tilt?”
“Neither. These are gnats, not knights. I’d have them all put to death, only 
it’s my name day. The tourney is done. Get them all out of my 
sight.”
The master of revels bowed, but Prince Tommen was not so obedient. “I’m 
supposed to ride against the straw man.”
“Not today.”
“But I want to ride!”
“I don’t care what you want.”
“Mother said I could ride.”
“She said,” Princess Myrcella agreed.
“Mother said,” mocked the king. “Don’t be childish.”
“We’re children,” Myrcella declared haughtily. “We’re supposed to 
be childish.”
The Hound laughed. “She has you there.”
Joffrey was beaten. “Very well. Even my brother couldn’t tilt any worse than 
these others. Master, bring out the quintain, Tommen wants to be a 
gnat.”
Tommen gave a shout of joy and ran off to be readied, his chubby little legs 
pumping hard. “Luck,” Sansa called to him.
They set up the quintain at the far end of the lists while the prince’s pony 
was being saddled. Tommen’s opponent was a child-sized leather warrior stuffed 
with straw and mounted on a pivot, with a shield in one hand and a padded mace 
in the other. Someone had fastened a pair of antlers to the knight’s head. 
Joffrey’s father King Robert had worn antlers on his helm, Sansa

remembered . . . but so did his uncle Lord Renly, Robert’s 
brother, who had turned traitor and crowned himself king.
A pair of squires buckled the prince into his ornate silver-and-crimson armor. 
A tall plume of red feathers sprouted from the crest of his helm, and the lion 
of Lannister and crowned stag of Baratheon frolicked together on his shield. 
The squires helped him mount, and Ser Aron Santagar, the Red Keep’s 
master-at-arms, stepped forward and handed Tommen a blunted silver longsword 
with a leaf-shaped blade, crafted to fit an eight-year-old hand.
Tommen raised the blade high. “Casterly Rock!” he shouted in a high boyish 
voice as he put his heels into his pony and started across the 
hard-packed dirt 
at the quintain. Lady Tanda and Lord Gyles started a ragged cheer, and Sansa 
added her voice to theirs. The king brooded in silence.
Tommen got his pony up to a brisk trot, waved his sword vigorously, and struck 
the knight’s shield a solid blow as he went by. The quintain spun, the padded 
mace flying around to give the prince a mighty whack in the back of his head. 
Tommen spilled from the saddle, his new armor rattling like a bag of old pots 
as he hit the ground. His sword went flying, his pony cantered away across the 
bailey, and a great gale of derision went up. King Joffrey laughed longest and 
loudest of all.
“Oh,” Princess Myrcella cried. She scrambled out of the box and ran to her 
little brother.
Sansa found herself possessed of a queer giddy courage. “You should go with 
her,” she told the king. “Your brother might

be hurt.”
Joffrey shrugged. “What if he is?”
“You should help him up and tell him how well he rode.” Sansa could not seem 
to stop herself.
“He got knocked off his horse and fell in the dirt,” the king pointed out. 
“That’s not riding well.”
“Look,” the Hound interrupted. “The boy has courage. He’s going to try 
again.”
They were helping Prince Tommen mount his pony. If only Tommen were the 
elder instead of Joffrey, Sansa thought. I wouldn’t mind marrying 
Tommen.
The sounds from the gatehouse took them by surprise. Chains rattled as the 
portcullis was drawn upward, and the great gates opened to the creak of iron 
hinges. “Who told them to open the gate?” Joff demanded. With the troubles in 
the city, the gates of the Red Keep had been closed for days.
A column of riders emerged from beneath the portcullis with a clink of steel 
and a clatter of hooves. Clegane stepped close to the king, one hand on the 
hilt of his longsword. The visitors were dinted and haggard and dusty, yet the 
standard they carried was the lion of Lannister, golden on its crimson field. A 
few wore the red cloaks and mail of Lannister men-at-arms, but more were 
freeriders and sellswords, armored in oddments and bristling with sharp 
steel . . . and there were others, monstrous savages out of one 
of Old Nan’s tales, the scary ones Bran used to love. They were clad in shabby 
skins and boiled leather, with long hair and

fierce beards. Some wore bloodstained bandages over their brows or wrapped 
around their hands, and others were missing eyes, ears, and fingers.
In their midst, riding on a tall red horse in a strange high saddle that 
cradled him back and front, was the queen’s dwarf brother Tyrion Lannister, the 
one they called the Imp. He had let his beard grow to cover his pushed-in face, 
until it was a bristly tangle of yellow and black hair, coarse as wire. Down 
his back flowed a shadowskin cloak, black fur striped with white. He held the 
reins in his left hand and carried his right arm in a white silk sling, but 
otherwise looked as grotesque as Sansa remembered from when he had visited 
Winterfell. With his bulging brow and mismatched eyes, he was still the ugliest 
man she had ever chanced to look upon.
Yet Tommen put his spurs into his pony and galloped headlong across the yard, 
shouting with glee. One of the savages, a huge shambling man so hairy that his 
face was all but lost beneath his whiskers, scooped the boy out of his saddle, 
armor and all, and deposited him on the ground beside his uncle. Tommen’s 
breathless laughter echoed off the walls as Tyrion clapped him on the 
backplate, and Sansa was startled to see that the two were of a height. 
Myrcella came running after her brother, and the dwarf picked her up by the 
waist and spun her in a circle, squealing.
When he lowered her back to the ground, the little man kissed her lightly on 
the brow and came waddling across the yard toward Joffrey. Two of his men 
followed close behind him; a black-haired

black-eyed sellsword who moved like a stalking cat, and a gaunt youth with an 
empty socket where one eye should have been. Tommen and Myrcella trailed after 
them.
The dwarf went to one knee before the king. “Your Grace.”
“You,” Joffrey said.
“Me,” the Imp agreed, “although a more courteous greeting might be in order, 
for an uncle and an elder.”
“They said you were dead,” the Hound said.
The little man gave the big one a look. One of his eyes was green, one was 
black, and both were cool. “I was speaking to the king, not to his 
cur.”
“I’m glad you’re not dead,” said Princess Myrcella.
“We share that view, sweet child.” Tyrion turned to Sansa. “My lady, I am 
sorry for your losses. Truly, the gods are cruel.”
Sansa could not think of a word to say to him. How could he be sorry for her 
losses? Was he mocking her? It wasn’t the gods who’d been cruel, it was 
Joffrey.
“I am sorry for your loss as well, Joffrey,” the dwarf said.
“What loss?”
“Your royal father? A large fierce man with a black beard; you’ll recall him 
if you try. He was king before you.”
“Oh, him. Yes, it was very sad, a boar killed him.”
“Is that what ‘they’ say, Your Grace?”
Joffrey frowned. Sansa felt that she ought to say something. What was it that 
Septa Mordane used to tell her? A lady’s armor is courtesy, that was 
it. She donned her armor and

said, “I’m sorry my lady mother took you captive, my lord.”
“A great many people are sorry for that,” Tyrion replied, “and before I am 
done, some may be a deal
sorrier . . . yet I thank you for the 
sentiment. Joffrey, where might I find your mother?”
“She’s with my council,” the king answered. “Your brother Jaime keeps losing 
battles.” He gave Sansa an angry look, as if it were her fault. 
“He’s been taken by the Starks and we’ve lost Riverrun and now her stupid 
brother is calling himself a king.”
The dwarf smiled crookedly. “All sorts of people are calling themselves kings 
these days.”
Joff did not know what to make of that, though he looked suspicious and out of 
sorts. “Yes. Well. I am pleased you’re not dead, Uncle. Did you bring me a 
gift for my name day?”
“I did. My wits.”
“I’d sooner have Robb Stark’s head,” Joff said with a sly glance at Sansa. 
“Tommen, Myrcella, come.”
Sandor Clegane lingered behind a moment. “I’d guard that tongue of yours, 
little man,” he warned, before he strode off after his liege.
Sansa was left with the dwarf and his monsters. She tried to think of what else 
she might say. “You hurt your arm,” she managed at last.
“One of your northmen hit me with a morningstar during the battle on the Green 
Fork. I escaped him by falling off my horse.” His grin turned into something 
softer as he studied her face. “Is it grief for your lord father that makes 
you so sad?”“My father was a traitor,” Sansa said at once. “And my brother and 
lady mother are traitors as well.” That reflex she had learned quickly. “I am 
loyal to my beloved Joffrey.”
“No doubt. As loyal as a deer surrounded by wolves.”
“Lions,” she whispered, without thinking. She glanced about nervously, but 
there was no one close enough to hear.
Lannister reached out and took her hand, and gave it a squeeze. “I am only a 
little lion, child, and I vow, I shall not savage you.” Bowing, he said, “But 
now you must excuse me. I have urgent business with queen and 
council.”
Sansa watched him walk off, his body swaying heavily from side to side with 
every step, like something from a grotesquerie. He speaks more gently than 
Joffrey, she thought, but the queen spoke to me gently too. He’s 
still a Lannister, her brother and Joff’s uncle, and no friend. Once she 
had loved Prince Joffrey with all her heart, and admired and trusted his 
mother, the queen. They had repaid that love and trust with her father’s head. 
Sansa would never make that mistake again.

Come to the godswood tonight, if you want to go home.
The words were the same on the hundredth reading as they’d 
been on the first, 
when Sansa had discovered the folded sheet of parchment beneath her pillow. She 
did not know how it had gotten there or who had sent it. The note was unsigned, 
unsealed, and the hand unfamiliar. She crushed the parchment to her chest and 
whispered the words to herself. “Come to the godswood tonight, if you want to 
go home,” she breathed, ever so faintly.What could it mean? Should she take it to the queen to prove that she was 
being good? Nervously, she rubbed her stomach. The angry purple bruise Ser 
Meryn had given her had faded to an ugly yellow, but still hurt. His fist had 
been mailed when he hit her. It was her own fault. She must learn to hide her 
feelings better, so as not to anger Joffrey. When she heard that the Imp had 
sent Lord Slynt to the Wall, she had forgotten herself and said, “I hope the 
Others get him.” The king had not been pleased.
Come to the godswood tonight, if you want to go home.
Sansa had prayed so hard. Could this be her answer at last, a true knight sent 
to save her? Perhaps it was one of the Redwyne twins, or bold Ser Balon 
Swann . . . or even Beric Dondarrion, the young lord her friend 
Jeyne Poole had loved, with his red-gold hair and the spray of stars on his 
black cloak.Come to the godswood tonight, if you want to go home.
What if it was some cruel jape of Joffrey’s, like the day he had taken her up 
to the battlements to show her Father’s head? Or perhaps it was some subtle 
snare to prove she was not loyal. If she went to the godswood, would she find 
Ser Ilyn Payne waiting for her, sitting silent under the heart tree with Ice in 
his hand, his pale eyes watching to see if she’d come?
Come to the godswood tonight, if you want to go home.
When the door opened, she hurriedly stuffed the note under her sheet and sat on 
it. It was her bedmaid, the mousy one with the limp brown hair. “What do you 
want?” Sansa demanded.
“Will milady be wanting a bath tonight?”
“A fire, I think . . . I feel a chill.” She was 
shivering, though the day had been hot.
“As you wish.”
Sansa watched the girl suspiciously. Had she seen the note? Had she put it 
under the pillow? It did not seem likely; she seemed a stupid girl, not one 
you’d want delivering secret notes, but Sansa did not know her. The queen had 
her servants changed every fortnight, to make certain none of them befriended 
her.
When a fire was blazing in the hearth, Sansa thanked the maid curtly and 
ordered her out. The girl was quick to obey, as ever, but Sansa decided there 
was something sly about her eyes. Doubtless, she was scurrying off to report to 
the queen, or maybe Varys. All her maids spied on her, she was 
certain.
Once alone, she thrust the note in the flames, watching the

parchment curl and blacken. Come to the godswood tonight, if you want to 
go home. She drifted to her window. Below, she could see a short knight in 
moon-pale armor and a heavy white cloak pacing the drawbridge. From his height, 
it could only be Ser Preston Greenfield. The queen had given her freedom of the 
castle, but even so, he would want to know where she was going if she tried to 
leave Maegor’s Holdfast at this time of night. What was she to tell him? 
Suddenly she was glad she had burned the note.
She unlaced her gown and crawled into her bed, but she did not sleep. Was 
he still there? she wondered. How long will he wait? It was so 
cruel, to send her a note and tell her nothing. The thoughts went round and 
round in her head.
If only she had someone to tell her what to do. She missed Septa Mordane, and 
even more Jeyne Poole, her truest friend. The septa had lost her head with the 
rest, for the crime of serving House Stark. Sansa did not know what had 
happened to Jeyne, who had disappeared from her rooms afterward, never to be 
mentioned again. She tried not to think of them too often, yet sometimes the 
memories came unbidden, and then it was hard to hold back the tears. Once in a 
while, Sansa even missed her sister. By now Arya was safe back in Winterfell, 
dancing and sewing, playing with Bran and baby Rickon, even riding through the 
winter town if she liked. Sansa was allowed to go riding too, but only in the 
bailey, and it got boring going round in a circle all day.
She was wide awake when she heard the shouting. Distant at first, then growing 
louder. Many voices yelling together. She

could not make out the words. And there were horses as well, and pounding feet, 
shouts of command. She crept to her window and saw men running on the walls, 
carrying spears and torches. Go back to your bed, Sansa told herself, 
this is nothing that
concerns you, just some new trouble out in the 
city. The talk at the wells had all been of troubles in the city of late. 
People were crowding in, running from the war, and many had no way to live save 
by robbing and killing each other. Go to bed.
But when she looked, the white knight was gone, the bridge across the dry moat 
down but undefended.
Sansa turned away without thinking and ran to her wardrobe. Oh, what am I 
doing? she asked herself as she dressed. This is madness. She 
could see the lights of many torches on the curtain walls. Had Stannis and 
Renly come at last to kill Joffrey and claim their brother’s throne? If so, the 
guards would raise the drawbridge, cutting off Maegor’s Holdfast from the outer 
castle. Sansa threw a plain grey cloak over her shoulders and picked up the 
knife she used to cut her meat. If it is some trap, better that I die than 
let them hurt me more, she told herself. She hid the blade under her 
cloak.
A column of red-cloaked swordsmen ran past as she slipped out into the night. 
She waited until they were well past before she darted across the undefended 
drawbridge. In the yard, men were buckling on swordbelts and cinching the 
saddles of their horses. She glimpsed Ser Preston near the stables with three 
others of the Kingsguard, white cloaks bright as the moon as they

helped Joffrey into his armor. Her breath caught in her throat when she saw the 
king. Thankfully, he did not see her. He was shouting for his sword and 
crossbow.
The noise receded as she moved deeper into the castle, never daring to look 
back for fear that Joffrey might be watching . . . or worse, 
following. The serpentine steps twisted ahead, striped by bars of flickering 
light from the narrow windows above. Sansa was panting by the time she reached 
the top. She ran down a shadowy colonnade and pressed herself against a wall to 
catch her breath. When something brushed against her leg, she almost jumped out 
of her skin, but it was only a cat, a ragged black tom with a chewed-off ear. 
The creature spit at her and leapt away.
By the time she reached the godswood, the noises had faded to a faint rattle of 
steel and a distant shouting. Sansa pulled her cloak tighter. The air was rich 
with the smells of earth and leaf. Lady would have liked this place, 
she thought. There was something wild about a godswood; even here, in the heart 
of the castle at the heart of the city, you could feel the old gods watching 
with a thousand unseen eyes.
Sansa had favored her mother’s gods over her father’s. She loved the statues, 
the pictures in leaded glass, the fragrance of burning incense, the septons 
with their robes and crystals, the magical play of the rainbows over altars 
inlaid with mother-of-pearl and onyx and lapis lazuli. Yet she could not deny 
that the godswood had a certain power too. Especially by night. Help 
me, she prayed, send me a friend, a true knight to champion 
me . . .She moved from tree to tree, feeling the roughness of the bark beneath 
her fingers. Leaves brushed at her cheeks. Had she come too late? He would not 
have left so soon, would he? Or had he even been here? Dare she risk calling 
out? It seemed so hushed and still here . . .
“I feared you would not come, child.”
Sansa whirled. A man stepped out of the shadows, heavyset, thick of neck, 
shambling. He wore a dark grey robe with the cowl pulled forward, but when a 
thin sliver of moonlight touched his cheek, she knew him at once by the blotchy 
skin and web of broken veins beneath. “Ser Dontos,” she breathed, 
heartbroken. “Was it you?”
“Yes, my lady.” When he moved closer, she could smell the sour stench of wine 
on his breath. “Me.” He reached out a hand.
Sansa shrank back. “Don’t!” She slid her hand under her cloak, to 
her hidden knife. “What . . . what do you want with 
me?”
“Only to help you,” Dontos said, “as you helped me.”
“You’re drunk, aren’t you?”
“Only one cup of wine, to help my courage. If they catch me now, they’ll strip 
the skin off my back.”
And what will they do to me? Sansa found herself thinking of Lady 
again. She could smell out falsehood, she could, but she was dead, 
Father had killed her, on account of Arya. She drew the knife and held it 
before her with both hands.
“Are you going to stab me?” Dontos asked.
“I will,” she said. “Tell me who sent you.”“No one, sweet lady. I swear it on my honor as a knight.”
“A knight?” Joffrey had decreed that he was to be a knight no longer, only a 
fool, lower even than Moon Boy. “I prayed to the gods for a knight to come 
save me,” she said. “I prayed and prayed. Why would they send me a drunken 
old fool?”
“I deserve that, though . . . I know it’s queer, 
but . . . all those years I was a knight, I was truly a fool, 
and now that I am a fool I think . . . I think I may find it in 
me to be a knight again, sweet lady. And all because of 
you . . . your grace, your courage. You saved me, not only from 
Joffrey, but from myself.” His voice dropped. “The singers say there was 
another fool once who was the greatest knight of 
all . . .”
“Florian,” Sansa whispered. A shiver went through her.
“Sweet lady, I would be your Florian,” Dontos said humbly, falling to his 
knees before her.
Slowly, Sansa lowered the knife. Her head seemed terribly light, as if she were 
floating. This is madness, to trust myself to this drunkard, but if I turn 
away will the chance ever come again? “How . . . how 
would you do it? Get me away?”
Ser Dontos raised his face to her. “Taking you from the castle, that will be 
the hardest. Once you’re out, there are ships that would take you home. I’d 
need to find the coin and make the arrangements, that’s all.”
“Could we go now?” she asked, hardly daring to hope.
“This very night? No, my lady, I fear not. First I must find a sure way to get 
you from the castle when the hour is ripe.

It will not be easy, nor quick. They watch me as well.” He licked his lips 
nervously. “Will you put away your blade?”
Sansa slipped the knife beneath her cloak. “Rise, ser.”
“Thank you, sweet lady.” Ser Dontos lurched clumsily to his feet, and brushed 
earth and leaves from his knees. “Your lord father was as true a man as the 
realm has ever known, but I stood by and let them slay him. I said nothing, did 
nothing . . . and yet, when Joffrey would have slain me, you 
spoke up. Lady, I have never been a hero, no Ryam Redwyne or Barristan the 
Bold. I’ve won no tourneys, no renown in war . . . but I 
was a knight once, and you have helped me remember what that meant. 
My life is a poor thing, but it is yours.” Ser Dontos placed a hand on the 
gnarled bole of the heart tree. He was shaking, she saw. “I vow, with your 
father’s gods as witness, that I shall send you home.”
He swore. A solemn oath, before the gods. 
“Then . . . I will put myself in your hands, ser. But how will 
I know, when it is time to go? Will you send me another note?”
Ser Dontos glanced about anxiously. “The risk is too great. You must come 
here, to the godswood. As often as you can. This is the safest place. The 
only safe place. Nowhere else. Not in your chambers nor mine nor on 
the steps nor in the yard, even if it seems we are alone. The stones have ears 
in the Red Keep, and only here may we talk freely.”
“Only here,” Sansa said. “I’ll remember.”
“And if I should seem cruel or mocking or indifferent when men are watching, 
forgive me, child. I have a role to play, and

you must do the same. One misstep and our heads will adorn the walls as did 
your father’s.”
She nodded. “I understand.”
“You will need to be brave and strong . . . and patient, 
patient above all.”
“I will be,” she promised, 
“but . . . please . . . make it as soon as you 
can. I’m afraid . . .”
“So am I,” Ser Dontos said, smiling wanly. “And now you must go, before you 
are missed.”
“You will not come with me?”
“Better if we are never seen together.”
Nodding, Sansa took a step . . . then spun back, nervous, and 
softly laid a kiss on his cheek, her eyes closed. “My Florian,” she 
whispered. “The gods heard my prayer.”
She flew along the river walk, past the small kitchen, and through the pig 
yard, her hurried footsteps lost beneath the squealing of the hogs in their 
pens. Home, she thought, home, he is going to take me home, 
he’ll keep me safe, my Florian. The songs about Florian and Jonquil were 
her very favorites. Florian was homely too, though not so 
old.
She was racing headlong down the serpentine steps when a man lurched out of a 
hidden doorway. Sansa caromed into him and lost her balance. Iron fingers 
caught her by the wrist before she could fall, and a deep voice rasped at her. 
“It’s a long roll down the serpentine, little bird. Want to kill us both?” 
His laughter was rough as a saw on stone. “Maybe you do.”The Hound. “No, my lord, pardons, I’d never.” Sansa averted 
her eyes but it was too late, he’d seen her face. “Please, you’re hurting 
me.” She tried to wriggle free.
“And what’s Joff’s little bird doing flying down the serpentine in the black 
of night?” When she did not answer, he shook her. “Where were 
you?”
“The g-g-godswood, my lord,” she said, not daring to lie. 
“Praying . . . praying for my father, 
and . . . for the king, praying that he’d not be 
hurt.”
“Think I’m so drunk that I’d believe that?” He let go his grip on 
her arm, swaying slightly as he stood, stripes of light and darkness falling 
across his terrible burnt face. “You look almost a 
woman . . . face, teats, and you’re taller too, 
almost . . . ah, you’re still a stupid little bird, aren’t you? 
Singing all the songs they taught you . . . sing me a song, why 
don’t you? Go on. Sing to me. Some song about knights and fair maids. You like 
knights, don’t you?”
He was scaring her. “T-true knights, my lord.”
“True knights,” he mocked. “And I’m no lord, no more than I’m a 
knight. Do I need to beat that into you?” Clegane reeled and almost fell. 
“Gods,” he swore, “too much wine. Do you like wine, little bird? 
True wine? A flagon of sour red, dark as blood, all a man needs. Or a 
woman.” He laughed, shook his head. “Drunk as a dog, damn me. You come now. 
Back to your cage, little bird. I’ll take you there. Keep you safe for the 
king.” The Hound gave her a push, oddly gentle, and followed her down the

steps. By the time they reached the bottom, he had lapsed back into a brooding 
silence, as if he had forgotten she was there.
When they reached Maegor’s Holdfast, she was alarmed to see that it was Ser 
Boros Blount who now held the bridge. His high white helm turned stiffly at the 
sound of their footsteps. Sansa flinched away from his gaze. Ser Boros was the 
worst of the Kingsguard, an ugly man with a foul temper, all scowls and 
jowls.
“That one is nothing to fear, girl.” The Hound laid a heavy hand on her 
shoulder. “Paint stripes on a toad, he does not become a tiger.”
Ser Boros lifted his visor. “Ser, where—”
“Fuck your ser, Boros. You’re the knight, not me. I’m the king’s 
dog, remember?”
“The king was looking for his dog earlier.”
“The dog was drinking. It was your night to shield him, ser. You and 
my other brothers.”
Ser Boros turned to Sansa. “How is it you are not in your chambers at this 
hour, lady?”
“I went to the godswood to pray for the safety of the king.” The lie sounded 
better this time, almost true.
“You expect her to sleep with all the noise?” Clegane said. “What was the 
trouble?”
“Fools at the gate,” Ser Boros admitted. “Some loose tongues spread tales of 
the preparations for Tyrek’s wedding feast, and these wretches got it in their 
heads they should be feasted too. His Grace led a sortie and sent them 
scurrying.”“A brave boy,” Clegane said, mouth twitching.
Let us see how brave he is when he faces my brother, Sansa thought. 
The Hound escorted her across the drawbridge. As they were winding their way up 
the steps, she said, “Why do you let people call you a dog? You won’t let 
anyone call you a knight.”
“I like dogs better than knights. My father’s father was kennelmaster at the 
Rock. One autumn year, Lord Tytos came between a lioness and her prey. The 
lioness didn’t give a shit that she was Lannister’s own sigil. Bitch tore into 
my lord’s horse and would have done for my lord too, but my grandfather came up 
with the hounds. Three of his dogs died running her off. My grandfather lost a 
leg, so Lannister paid him for it with lands and a towerhouse, and took his son 
to squire. The three dogs on our banner are the three that died, in the yellow 
of autumn grass. A hound will die for you, but never lie to you. And he’ll look 
you straight in the face.” He cupped her under the jaw, raising her chin, his 
fingers pinching her painfully. “And that’s more than little birds can 
do, isn’t it? I never got my song.”
“I . . . I know a song about Florian and Jonquil.”
“Florian and Jonquil? A fool and his cunt. Spare me. But one day I’ll have a 
song from you, whether you will it or no.”
“I will sing it for you gladly.”
Sandor Clegane snorted. “Pretty thing, and such a bad liar. A dog can smell a 
lie, you know. Look around you, and take a good whiff. They’re all liars 
here . . . and every one better than you.”

The longer you keep him waiting, the worse it will go for you,” Sandor 
Clegane warned her.
Sansa tried to hurry, but her fingers fumbled at buttons and knots. The Hound 
was always rough-tongued, but something in the way he had looked at her filled 
her with dread. Had Joffrey found out about her meetings with Ser Dontos? 
Please no, she thought as she brushed out her hair. Ser Dontos was 
her only hope. I have to look pretty, Joff likes me to look pretty, he’s 
always liked me in this gown, this color. She smoothed the cloth down. The 
fabric was tight across her chest.When she emerged, Sansa walked on the Hound’s left, away from the burned 
side of his face. “Tell me what I’ve done.”
“Not you. Your kingly brother.”
“Robb’s a traitor.” Sansa knew the words by rote. “I had no part in whatever 
he did.” Gods be good, don’t let it be the Kingslayer. If Robb had 
harmed Jaime Lannister, it would mean her life. She thought of Ser Ilyn, and 
how those terrible pale eyes staring pitilessly out of that gaunt pockmarked 
face.
The Hound snorted. “They trained you well, little bird.” He conducted her to 
the lower bailey, where a crowd had gathered around the archery butts. Men 
moved aside to let them through. She could hear Lord Gyles coughing. Loitering 
stablehands eyed

her insolently, but Ser Horas Redwyne averted his gaze as she passed, and his 
brother Hobber pretended not to see her. A yellow cat was dying on the ground, 
mewling piteously, a crossbow quarrel through its ribs. Sansa stepped around 
it, feeling ill.
Ser Dontos approached on his broomstick horse; since he’d been too drunk to 
mount his destrier at the tourney, the king had decreed that henceforth he must 
always go horsed. “Be brave,” he whispered, squeezing her arm.
Joffrey stood in the center of the throng, winding an ornate crossbow. Ser 
Boros and Ser Meryn were with him. The sight of them was enough to tie her 
insides in knots.
“Your Grace.” She fell to her knees.
“Kneeling won’t save you now,” the king said. “Stand up. You’re here to 
answer for your brother’s latest treasons.”
“Your Grace, whatever my traitor brother has done, I had no part. You know 
that, I beg you, please—”
“Get her up!”
The Hound pulled her to her feet, not ungently.
“Ser Lancel,” Joff said, “tell her of this outrage.”
Sansa had always thought Lancel Lannister comely and well spoken, but there was 
neither pity nor kindness in the look he gave her. “Using some vile sorcery, 
your brother fell upon Ser Stafford Lannister with an army of wargs, not three 
days ride from Lannisport. Thousands of good men were butchered as they slept, 
without the chance to lift sword. After the slaughter, the northmen feasted on 
the flesh of the slain.”Horror coiled cold hands around Sansa’s throat.
“You have nothing to say?” asked Joffrey.
“Your Grace, the poor child is shocked witless,” murmured Ser 
Dontos.
“Silence, fool.” Joffrey lifted his crossbow and pointed it at her face. 
“You Starks are as unnatural as those wolves of yours. I’ve not forgotten how 
your monster savaged me.”
“That was Arya’s wolf,” she said. “Lady never hurt you, but you killed her 
anyway.”
“No, your father did,” Joff said, “but I killed your father. I wish I’d done 
it myself. I killed a man last night who was bigger than your father. They came 
to the gate shouting my name and calling for bread like I was some 
baker, but I taught them better. I shot the loudest one right through 
the throat.”
“And he died?” With the ugly iron head of the quarrel staring her in the 
face, it was hard to think what else to say.
“Of course he died, he had my quarrel in his throat. There was a woman 
throwing rocks, I got her as well, but only in the arm.” Frowning, he lowered 
the crossbow. “I’d shoot you too, but if I do Mother says they’d kill my uncle 
Jaime. Instead you’ll just be punished and we’ll send word to your brother 
about what will happen to you if he doesn’t yield. Dog, hit her.”
“Let me beat her!” Ser Dontos shoved forward, tin armor clattering. He was 
armed with a “morningstar” whose head was a melon. My Florian. She 
could have kissed him, blotchy skin and broken veins and all. He trotted his 
broomstick around her,

shouting “Traitor, traitor” and whacking her over the head with the melon. 
Sansa covered herself with her hands, staggering every time the fruit pounded 
her, her hair sticky by the second blow. People were laughing. The melon flew 
to pieces. Laugh, Joffrey, she prayed as the juice ran down her face 
and the front of her blue silk gown. Laugh and be 
satisfied.
Joffrey did not so much as snigger. “Boros. Meryn.”
Ser Meryn Trant seized Dontos by the arm and flung him brusquely away. The 
red-faced fool went sprawling, broomstick, melon, and all. Ser Boros seized 
Sansa.
“Leave her face,” Joffrey commanded. “I like her pretty.”
Boros slammed a fist into Sansa’s belly, driving the air out of her. When she 
doubled over, the knight grabbed her hair and drew his sword, and for one 
hideous instant she was certain he meant to open her throat. As he laid the 
flat of the blade across her thighs, she thought her legs might break from the 
force of the blow. Sansa screamed. Tears welled in her eyes. It will be 
over soon. She soon lost count of the blows.
“Enough,” she heard the Hound rasp.
“No it isn’t,” the king replied. “Boros, make her naked.”
Boros shoved a meaty hand down the front of Sansa’s bodice and gave a hard 
yank. The silk came tearing away, baring her to the waist. Sansa covered her 
breasts with her hands. She could hear sniggers, far off and cruel. “Beat her 
bloody,” Joffrey said, “we’ll see how her brother 
fancies—”
“What is the meaning of this?”The Imp’s voice cracked like a whip, and suddenly Sansa was free. She 
stumbled to her knees, arms crossed over her chest, her breath ragged. “Is 
this your notion of chivalry, Ser Boros?” Tyrion Lannister demanded angrily. 
His pet sellsword stood with him, and one of his wildlings, the one with the 
burned eye. “What sort of knight beats helpless maids?”
“The sort who serves his king, Imp.” Ser Boros raised his sword, and Ser 
Meryn stepped up beside him, his blade scraping clear of its 
scabbard.
“Careful with those,” warned the dwarf’s sellsword. “You don’t want to get 
blood all over those pretty white cloaks.”
“Someone give the girl something to cover herself with,” the Imp said. Sandor 
Clegane unfastened his cloak and tossed it at her. Sansa clutched it against 
her chest, fists bunched hard in the white wool. The coarse weave was scratchy 
against her skin, but no velvet had ever felt so fine.
“This girl’s to be your queen,” the Imp told Joffrey. “Have you no regard 
for her honor?”
“I’m punishing her.”
“For what crime? She did not fight her brother’s battle.”
“She has the blood of a wolf.”
“And you have the wits of a goose.”
“You can’t talk to me that way. The king can do as he likes.”
“Aerys Targaryen did as he liked. Has your mother ever told you what happened 
to him?”
Ser Boros Blount harrumphed. “No man threatens His Grace in

the presence of the Kingsguard.”
Tyrion Lannister raised an eyebrow. “I am not threatening the king, ser, I am 
educating my nephew. Bronn, Timett, the next time Ser Boros opens his mouth, 
kill him.” The dwarf smiled. “Now that was a threat, ser. See the 
difference?”
Ser Boros turned a dark shade of red. “The queen will hear of 
this!”
“No doubt she will. And why wait? Joffrey, shall we send for your 
mother?”
The king flushed.
“Nothing to say, Your Grace?” his uncle went on. “Good. Learn to use your 
ears more and your mouth less, or your reign will be shorter than I am. Wanton 
brutality is no way to win your people’s love . . . or your 
queen’s.”
“Fear is better than love, Mother says.” Joffrey pointed at Sansa. 
“She fears me.”
The Imp sighed. “Yes, I see. A pity Stannis and Renly aren’t twelve-year-old 
girls as well. Bronn, Timett, bring her.”
Sansa moved as if in a dream. She thought the Imp’s men would take her back to 
her bedchamber in Maegor’s Holdfast, but instead they conducted her to the 
Tower of the Hand. She had not set foot inside that place since the day her 
father fell from grace, and it made her feel faint to climb those steps 
again.
Some serving girls took charge of her, mouthing meaningless comforts to stop 
her shaking. One stripped off the ruins of her gown and smallclothes, and 
another bathed her and washed the

sticky juice from her face and her hair. As they scrubbed her down with soap 
and sluiced warm water over her head, all she could see were the faces from the 
bailey. Knights are sworn to defend the weak, protect women, and fight for 
the right, but none of them did a thing. Only Ser Dontos had tried to 
help, and he was no longer a knight, no more than the Imp was, nor the 
Hound . . . the Hound hated 
knights . . . I hate them too, Sansa thought. 
They are no true knights, not one of them.
After she was clean, plump ginger-headed Maester Frenken came to see her. He 
bid her lie facedown on the mattress while he spread a salve across the angry 
red welts that covered the backs of her legs. Afterward he mixed her a draught 
of dreamwine, with some honey so it might go down easier. “Sleep a bit, child. 
When you wake, all this will seem a bad dream.”
No it won’t, you stupid man, Sansa thought, but she drank the 
dreamwine anyway, and slept.
It was dark when she woke again, not quite knowing where she was, the room both 
strange and strangely familiar. As she rose, a stab of pain went through her 
legs and brought it all back. Tears filled her eyes. Someone had laid out a 
robe for her beside the bed. Sansa slipped it on and opened the door. Outside 
stood a hard-faced woman with leathery brown skin, three necklaces looped about 
her scrawny neck. One was gold and one was silver and one was made of human 
ears. “Where does she think she’s going?” the woman asked, leaning on a tall 
spear.
“The godswood.” She had to find Ser Dontos, beg him to take

her home now before it was too late.
“The halfman said you’re not to leave,” the woman said. “Pray here, the gods 
will hear.”
Meekly, Sansa dropped her eyes and retreated back inside. She realized suddenly 
why this place seemed so familiar. They’ve put me in Arya’s old 
bedchamber, from when Father was the Hand of the King. All her things are gone 
and the furnishings have been moved around, but it’s the 
same . . .
A short time later, a serving girl brought a platter of cheese and bread and 
olives, with a flagon of cold water. “Take it away,” Sansa commanded, but the 
girl left the food on a table. She was thirsty, she realized. Every 
step sent knives through her thighs, but she made herself cross the room. She 
drank two cups of water, and was nibbling on an olive when the knock 
came.
Anxiously, she turned toward the door, smoothed down the folds of her robe. 
“Yes?”
The door opened, and Tyrion Lannister stepped inside. “My lady. I trust I am 
not disturbing you?”
“Am I your prisoner?”
“My guest.” He was wearing his chain of office, a necklace of linked golden 
hands. “I thought we might talk.”
“As my lord commands.” Sansa found it hard not to stare; his face was so ugly 
it held a queer fascination for her.
“The food and garments are to your satisfaction?” he asked. “If there is 
anything else you need, you have only to ask.”
“You are most kind. And this morning . . . it was very good of

you to help me.”
“You have a right to know why Joffrey was so wroth. Six nights gone, your 
brother fell upon my uncle Stafford, encamped with his host at a village called 
Oxcross not three days ride from Casterly Rock. Your northerners won a crushing 
victory. We received word only this morning.”
Robb will kill you all, she thought, exulting. 
“It’s . . . terrible, my lord. My brother is a vile 
traitor.”
The dwarf smiled wanly. “Well, he’s no fawn, he’s made that clear 
enough.”
“Ser Lancel said Robb led an army of wargs . . .”
The Imp gave a disdainful bark of laughter. “Ser Lancel’s a wineskin warrior 
who wouldn’t know a warg from a wart. Your brother had his direwolf with him, 
but I suspect that’s as far as it went. The northmen crept into my uncle’s camp 
and cut his horse lines, and Lord Stark sent his wolf among them. Even 
war-trained destriers went mad. Knights were trampled to death in their 
pavilions, and the rabble woke in terror and fled, casting aside their weapons 
to run the faster. Ser Stafford was slain as he chased after a horse. Lord 
Rickard Karstark drove a lance through his chest. Ser Rubert Brax is also dead, 
along with Ser Lymond Vikary, Lord Crakehall, and Lord Jast. Half a hundred 
more have been taken captive, including Jast’s sons and my nephew Martyn 
Lannister. Those who survived are spreading wild tales and swearing that the 
old gods of the north march with your brother.”
“Then . . . there was no sorcery?”Lannister snorted. “Sorcery is the sauce fools spoon over failure to 
hide the flavor of their own incompetence. My mutton-headed uncle had not even 
troubled to post sentries, it would seem. His host was 
raw—apprentice 
boys, miners, fieldhands, fisherfolk, the sweepings of 
Lannisport. The only 
mystery is how your brother reached him. Our forces still hold the stronghold 
at the Golden Tooth, and they swear he did not pass.” The dwarf gave an 
irritated shrug. “Well, Robb Stark is my father’s bane. Joffrey is mine. Tell 
me, what do you feel for my kingly nephew?”
“I love him with all my heart,” Sansa said at once.
“Truly?” He did not sound convinced. “Even now?”
“My love for His Grace is greater than it has ever been.”
The Imp laughed aloud. “Well, someone has taught you to lie well. You may be 
grateful for that one day, child. You are a child still, are you not? 
Or have you flowered?”
Sansa blushed. It was a rude question, but the shame of being stripped before 
half the castle made it seem like nothing. “No, my lord.”
“That’s all to the good. If it gives you any solace, I do not intend that you 
ever wed Joffrey. No marriage will reconcile Stark and Lannister after all that 
has happened, I fear. More’s the pity. The match was one of King Robert’s 
better notions, if Joffrey hadn’t mucked
it up.”
She knew she ought to say something, but the words caught in her throat.“You grow very quiet,” Tyrion Lannister observed. “Is this what you 
want? An end to your betrothal?”
“I . . .” Sansa did not know what to say. Is it a trick? 
Will he punish me if I tell the truth? She stared at the dwarf’s brutal 
bulging brow, the hard black eye and the shrewd green one, the crooked teeth 
and wiry beard. “I only want to be loyal.”
“Loyal,” the dwarf mused, “and far from any Lannisters. I can scarce blame 
you for that. When I was your age, I wanted the same thing.” He smiled. “They 
tell me you visit the godswood every day. What do you pray for, 
Sansa?”
I pray for Robb’s victory and Joffrey’s death . . . and 
for home. For Winterfell. “I pray for an end to the fighting.”
“We’ll have that soon enough. There will be another battle, between your 
brother Robb and my lord father, and that will settle the issue.”
Robb will beat him, Sansa thought. He beat your uncle and your 
brother Jaime, he’ll beat your father too.
It was as if her face were an open book, so easily did the dwarf read her 
hopes. “Do not take Oxcross too much to heart, my lady,” he told her, not 
unkindly. “A battle is not a war, and my

lord father is assuredly not my uncle Stafford. The next time you visit the 
godswood, pray that your brother has the wisdom to bend the knee. Once the 
north returns to the king’s peace, I mean to send you home.” He hopped down 
off the window seat and said, “You may sleep here tonight. I’ll give you some 
of my own men as a guard, some Stone Crows perhaps—”
“No,” Sansa blurted out, aghast. If she was locked in the Tower of the Hand, 
guarded by the dwarf’s men, how would Ser Dontos ever spirit her away to 
freedom?
“Would you prefer Black Ears? I’ll give you Chella if a woman would make you 
more at ease.”
“Please, no, my lord, the wildlings frighten me.”
He grinned. “Me as well. But more to the point, they frighten Joffrey and that 
nest of sly vipers and lickspittle dogs he calls a Kingsguard. With Chella or 
Timett by your side, no one would dare offer you harm.”
“I would sooner return to my own bed.” A lie came to her suddenly, but it 
seemed so right that she blurted it out at once. “This tower was 
where my father’s men were slain. Their ghosts would give me terrible dreams, 
and I would see their blood wherever I looked.”
Tyrion Lannister studied her face. “I am no stranger to nightmares, Sansa. 
Perhaps you are wiser than I knew. Permit me at least to escort you safely back 
to your own chambers.”

The southern sky was black with smoke. It rose swirling off a hundred 
distant fires, its sooty fingers smudging out the stars. Across the Blackwater 
Rush, a line of flame burned nightly from horizon to horizon, while on this 
side the Imp had fired the whole riverfront: docks and warehouses, homes and 
brothels, everything outside the city walls.Even in the Red Keep, the air tasted of ashes. When Sansa found Ser 
Dontos in the quiet of the godswood, he asked if she’d been crying. “It’s only 
from the smoke,” she lied. “It looks as though half the kingswood is 
burning.”
“Lord Stannis wants to smoke out the Imp’s savages.” Dontos swayed as he 
spoke, one hand on the trunk of a chestnut tree. A wine stain discolored the 
red-and-yellow motley of his tunic. “They kill his scouts and raid his baggage 
train. And the wildlings have been lighting fires too. The Imp told the queen 
that Stannis had better train his horses to eat ash, since he would find no 
blade of grass. I heard him say so. I hear all sorts of things as a fool that I 
never heard when I was a knight. They talk as though I am not there, 
and”—he leaned close, breathing his winey breath right in her 
face—“the Spider pays in gold for any little trifle. I think Moon Boy 
has been his for years.”He is drunk again. My poor Florian he names himself, and so he is. 
But he is all I have. “Is it true Lord Stannis burned the godswood at 
Storm’s End?”
Dontos nodded. “He made a great pyre of the trees as an offering to his new 
god. The red priestess made him do it. They say she rules him now, body and 
soul. He’s vowed to burn the Great Sept of Baelor too, if he takes the 
city.”
“Let him.” When Sansa had first beheld the Great Sept with its marble walls 
and seven crystal towers, she’d thought it was the most beautiful building in 
the world, but that had been before Joffrey beheaded her father on its steps. 
“I want it burned.”
“Hush, child, the gods will hear you.”
“Why should they? They never hear my prayers.”
“Yes they do. They sent me to you, didn’t they?”
Sansa picked at the bark of a tree. She felt light-headed, almost feverish. 
“They sent you, but what good have you done? You promised you would take me 
home, but I’m still here.”
Dontos patted her arm. “I’ve spoken to a certain man I know, a good friend to 
me . . . and you, my lady. He will hire a swift ship to take us 
to safety, when the time is right.”
“The time is right now,” Sansa insisted, “before the fighting starts. 
They’ve forgotten about me. I know we could slip away if we tried.”
“Child, child.” Dontos shook his head. “Out of the castle, yes, we could do 
that, but the city gates are more heavily guarded than ever, and the Imp has 
even closed off the river.”It was true. The Blackwater Rush was as empty as Sansa had ever seen it. 
All the ferries had been withdrawn to the north bank, and the trading galleys 
had fled or been seized by the Imp to be made over for battle. The only ships 
to be seen were the king’s war galleys. They rowed endlessly up and down, 
staying to the deep water in the middle of the river and exchanging flights of 
arrows with Stannis’s archers on the south shore.
Lord Stannis himself was still on the march, but his vanguard had appeared two 
nights ago during the black of the moon. King’s Landing had woken to the sight 
of their tents and banners. They were five thousand, Sansa had heard, near as 
many as all the gold cloaks in the city. They flew the red or green apples of 
House Fossoway, the turtle of Estermont, and the
fox-and-flowers of Florent, 
and their commander was Ser Guyard Morrigen, a famous southron knight who men 
now called Guyard the Green. His standard showed a crow in flight, its black 
wings spread wide against a storm-green sky. But it was the pale yellow banners 
that worried the city. Long ragged tails streamed behind them like flickering 
flames, and in place of a lord’s sigil they bore the device of a god: the 
burning heart of the Lord of Light.
“When Stannis comes, he’ll have ten times as many men as Joffrey does, 
everyone says so.”
Dontos squeezed her shoulder. “The size of his host does not matter, 
sweetling, so long as they are on the wrong side of the river. Stannis cannot 
cross without ships.”
“He has ships. More than Joffrey.”“It’s a long sail from Storm’s End, the fleet will need to come up 
Massey’s Hook and through the Gullet and across Blackwater Bay. Perhaps the 
good gods will send a storm to sweep them from the seas.” Dontos gave a 
hopeful smile. “It is not easy for you, I know. You must be patient, child. 
When my friend returns to the city, we shall have our ship. Have faith in your 
Florian, and try not to be afraid.”
Sansa dug her nails into her hand. She could feel the fear in her tummy, 
twisting and pinching, worse every day. Nightmares of the day Princess Myrcella 
had sailed still troubled her sleep; dark suffocating dreams that woke her in 
the black of night, struggling for breath. She could hear the people screaming 
at her, screaming without words, like animals. They had hemmed her in and 
thrown filth at her and tried to pull her off her horse, and would have done 
worse if the Hound had not cut his way to her side. They had torn the High 
Septon to pieces and smashed in Ser Aron’s head with a rock. Try not to be 
afraid! he said.
The whole city was afraid. Sansa could see it from the castle walls. The 
smallfolk were hiding themselves behind closed shutters and barred doors as if 
that would keep them safe. The last time King’s Landing had fallen, the 
Lannisters looted and raped as they pleased and put hundreds to the sword, even 
though the city had opened its gates. This time the Imp meant to fight, and a 
city that fought could expect no mercy at all.
Dontos was prattling on. “If I were still a knight, I should have to put on 
armor and man the walls with the rest. I

ought to kiss King Joffrey’s feet and thank him sweetly.”
“If you thanked him for making you a fool, he’d make you a knight again,” 
Sansa said sharply.
Dontos chuckled. “My Jonquil’s a clever girl, isn’t she?”
“Joffrey and his mother say I’m stupid.”
“Let them. You’re safer that way, sweetling. Queen Cersei and the Imp and Lord 
Varys and their like, they all watch each other keen as hawks, and pay this one 
and that one to spy out what the others are doing, but no one ever troubles 
themselves about Lady Tanda’s daughter, do they?” Dontos covered his mouth to 
stifle a burp. “Gods preserve you, my little Jonquil.” He was growing weepy. 
The wine did that to him. “Give your Florian a little kiss now. A kiss for 
luck.” He swayed toward her.
Sansa dodged the wet groping lips, kissed him lightly on an unshaven cheek, and 
bid him good night. It took all her strength not to weep. She had been weeping 
too much of late. It was unseemly, she knew, but she could not seem to help 
herself; the tears would come, sometimes over a trifle, and nothing she did 
could hold them back.
The drawbridge to Maegor’s Holdfast was unguarded. The Imp had moved most of 
the gold cloaks to the city walls, and the white knights of the Kingsguard had 
duties more important than dogging her heels. Sansa could go where she would so 
long as she did not try to leave the castle, but there was nowhere she wanted 
to go.
She crossed over the dry moat with its cruel iron spikes and made her way up 
the narrow turnpike stair, but when she reached

the door of her bedchamber she could not bear to enter. The very walls of the 
room made her feel trapped; even with the window opened wide it felt as though 
there were no air to breathe.
Turning back to the stair, Sansa climbed. The smoke blotted out the stars and 
the thin crescent of moon, so the roof was dark and thick with shadows. Yet 
from here she could see everything: the Red Keep’s tall towers and great 
cornerforts, the maze of city streets beyond, to south and west the river 
running black, the bay to the east, the columns of smoke and cinders, and 
fires, fires everywhere. Soldiers crawled over the city walls like ants with 
torches, and crowded the hoardings that had sprouted from the ramparts. Down by 
the Mud Gate, outlined against the drifting smoke, she could make out the vague 
shape of the three huge catapults, the biggest anyone had ever seen, 
overtopping the walls by a good twenty feet. Yet none of it made her feel less 
fearful. A stab went through her, so sharp that Sansa sobbed and clutched at 
her belly. She might have fallen, but a shadow moved suddenly, and strong 
fingers grabbed her arm and steadied her.
She grabbed a merlon for support, her fingers scrabbling at the rough stone. 
“Let go of me,” she cried. “Let go.”
“The little bird thinks she has wings, does she? Or do you mean to end up 
crippled like that brother of yours?”
Sansa twisted in his grasp. “I wasn’t going to fall. It was 
only . . . you startled me, that’s all.”
“You mean I scared you. And still do.”
She took a deep breath to calm herself. “I thought I was

alone, I . . .” She glanced away.
“The little bird still can’t bear to look at me, can she?” The Hound released 
her. “You were glad enough to see my face when the mob had you, though. 
Remember?”
Sansa remembered all too well. She remembered the way they had howled, the feel 
of the blood running down her cheek from where the stone had struck her, and 
the garlic stink on the breath of the man who had tried to pull her from her 
horse. She could still feel the cruel pinch of fingers on her wrist as she lost 
her balance and began to fall.
She’d thought she was going to die then, but the fingers had twitched, all five 
at once, and the man had shrieked loud as a horse. When his hand fell away, 
another hand, stronger, shoved her back into her saddle. The man with the 
garlicky breath was on the ground, blood pumping out the stump of his arm, but 
there were others all around, some with clubs in hand. The Hound leapt at them, 
his sword a blur of steel that trailed a red mist as it swung. When they broke 
and ran before him he had laughed, his terrible burned face for a moment 
transformed.
She made herself look at that face now, really look. It was only courteous, and 
a lady must never forget her courtesies. The scars are not the worst part, 
nor even the way his mouth twitches. It’s his eyes. She had never seen 
eyes so full of anger. “I . . . I should have come to you 
after,” she said haltingly. “To thank you, for . . . for 
saving me . . . you were so brave.”
“Brave?” His laugh was half a snarl. “A dog doesn’t need

courage to chase off rats. They had me thirty to one, and not a man of them 
dared face me.”
She hated the way he talked, always so harsh and angry. “Does it give you joy 
to scare people?”
“No, it gives me joy to kill people.” His mouth twitched. “Wrinkle up your 
face all you like, but spare me this false piety. You were a high lord’s get. 
Don’t tell me Lord Eddard Stark of Winterfell never killed a man.”
“That was his duty. He never liked it.”
“Is that what he told you?” Clegane laughed again. “Your father lied. 
Killing is the sweetest thing there is.” He drew his longsword. 
“Here’s your truth. Your precious father found that out on Baelor’s 
steps. Lord of Winterfell, Hand of the King, Warden of the North, the mighty 
Eddard Stark, of a line eight thousand years old . . . but Ilyn 
Payne’s blade went through his neck all the same, didn’t it? Do you remember 
the dance he did when his head came off his shoulders?”
Sansa hugged herself, suddenly cold. “Why are you always so hateful? I was 
thanking you . . .”
“Just as if I was one of those true knights you love so well, yes. What do you 
think a knight is for, girl? You think it’s all taking favors from 
ladies and looking fine in gold plate? Knights are for killing.” He 
laid the edge of his longsword against her neck, just under her ear. Sansa 
could feel the sharpness of the steel. “I killed my first man at twelve. I’ve 
lost count of how many I’ve killed since then. High lords with

old names, fat rich men dressed in velvet, knights puffed up like bladders with 
their honors, yes, and women and children too—they’re all meat, and I’m 
the butcher. Let them have their lands and their gods and their gold. Let them 
have their sers.” Sandor Clegane spat at her feet to show what he 
thought of that. “So long as I have this,” he said, lifting the sword from 
her throat, “there’s no man on earth I need fear.”
Except your brother, Sansa thought, but she had better sense than to 
say it aloud. He is a dog, just as he says. A half-wild, mean-tempered dog 
that bites any hand that tries to pet him, and yet will savage any man who 
tries to hurt his masters. “Not even the men across the 
river?”
Clegane’s eyes turned toward the distant fires. “All this burning.” He 
sheathed his sword. “Only cowards fight with fire.”
“Lord Stannis is no coward.”
“He’s not the man his brother was either. Robert never let a little thing like 
a river stop him.”
“What will you do when he crosses?”
“Fight. Kill. Die, maybe.”
“Aren’t you afraid? The gods might send you down to some terrible hell for all 
the evil you’ve done.”
“What evil?” He laughed. “What gods?”
“The gods who made us all.”
“All?” he mocked. “Tell me, little bird, what kind of god makes a monster 
like the Imp, or a halfwit like Lady Tanda’s daughter? If there are gods, they 
made sheep so wolves could eat

mutton, and they made the weak for the strong to play with.”
“True knights protect the weak.”
He snorted. “There are no true knights, no more than there are gods. If you 
can’t protect yourself, die and get out of the way of those who can. Sharp 
steel and strong arms rule this world, don’t ever believe any 
different.”
Sansa backed away from him. “You’re awful.”
“I’m honest. It’s the world that’s awful. Now fly away, little bird, I’m sick 
of you peeping at me.”
Wordless, she fled. She was afraid of
Sandor Clegane . . . and 
yet, some part of her wished that Ser Dontos had a little of the Hound’s 
ferocity. There are gods, she told herself, and there are true 
knights too. All the stories can’t be lies.
That night Sansa dreamed of the riot again. The mob surged around her, 
shrieking, a maddened beast with a thousand faces. Everywhere she turned she 
saw faces twisted into monstrous inhuman masks. She wept and told them she had 
never done them hurt, yet they dragged her from her horse all the same. “No,” 
she cried, “no, please, don’t, don’t,” but no one paid her any 
heed. She shouted for Ser Dontos, for her brothers, for her dead father and her 
dead wolf, for gallant Ser Loras who had given her a red rose once, but none of 
them came. She called for the heroes from the songs, for Florian and Ser Ryam 
Redwyne and Prince Aemon the Dragonknight, but no one heard. Women swarmed over 
her like weasels, pinching her legs and kicking her in the belly, and someone 
hit her in the face and she felt her teeth shatter. Then

she saw the bright glimmer of steel. The knife plunged into her belly and tore 
and tore and tore, until there was nothing left of her down there but shiny wet 
ribbons.
When she woke, the pale light of morning was slanting through her window, yet 
she felt as sick and achy as if she had not slept at all. There was something 
sticky on her thighs. When she threw back the blanket and saw the blood, all 
she could think was that her dream had somehow come true. She remembered the 
knives inside her, twisting and ripping. She squirmed away in horror, kicking 
at the sheets and falling to the floor, breathing raggedly, naked, bloodied, 
and afraid.
But as she crouched there, on her hands and knees, understanding came. “No, 
please,” Sansa whimpered, “please, no.” She didn’t want this happening to 
her, not now, not here, not now, not now, not now, not now.
Madness took hold of her. Pulling herself up by the bedpost, she went to the 
basin and washed between her legs, scrubbing away all the stickiness. By the 
time she was done, the water was pink with blood. When her maidservants saw it 
they would know. Then she remembered the bedclothes. She rushed back 
to the bed and stared in horror at the dark red stain and the tale it told. All 
she could think was that she had to get rid of it, or else they’d see. She 
couldn’t let them see, or they’d marry her to Joffrey and make her lay with 
him.
Snatching up her knife, Sansa hacked at the sheet, cutting out the stain. 
If they ask me about the hole, what will I 
say? Tears ran down her face. She pulled the torn sheet from the bed, and the 
stained blanket as well. I’ll have to burn them. She balled up the 
evidence, stuffed it in the fireplace, drenched it in oil from her bedside 
lamp, and lit it afire. Then she realized that the blood had soaked through the 
sheet into the featherbed, so she bundled that up as well, but it was big and 
cumbersome, hard to move. Sansa could get only half of it into the fire. She 
was on her knees, struggling to shove the mattress into the flames as thick 
grey smoke eddied around her and filled the room, when the door burst open and 
she heard her maid gasp.
In the end it took three of them to pull her away. And it was all for nothing. 
The bedclothes were burnt, but by the time they carried her off her thighs were 
bloody again. It was as if her own body had betrayed her to Joffrey, unfurling 
a banner of Lannister crimson for all the world to see.
When the fire was out, they carried off the singed featherbed, fanned away the 
worst of the smoke, and brought up a tub. Women came and went, muttering and 
looking at her strangely. They filled the tub with scalding hot water, bathed 
her and washed her hair and gave her a cloth to wear between her legs. By then 
Sansa was calm again, and ashamed for her folly. The smoke had ruined most of 
her clothing. One of the women went away and came back with a green wool shift 
that was almost her size. “It’s not as pretty as your own things, but it will 
serve,” she announced when she’d pulled it down over Sansa’s head. “Your 
shoes weren’t burned, so at least you won’t need to go barefoot to the 
queen.”Cersei Lannister was breaking her fast when Sansa was ushered into her 
solar. “You may sit,” the queen said graciously. “Are you hungry?” She 
gestured at the table. There was porridge, honey, milk, boiled eggs, and crisp 
fried fish.
The sight of the food made Sansa feel ill. Her tummy was tied in a knot. “No, 
thank you, Your Grace.”
“I don’t blame you. Between Tyrion and Lord Stannis, everything I eat tastes 
of ash. And now you’re setting fires as well. What did you hope to 
accomplish?”
Sansa lowered her head. “The blood frightened me.”
“The blood is the seal of your womanhood. Lady Catelyn might have prepared 
you. You’ve had your first flowering, no more.”
Sansa had never felt less flowery. “My lady mother told me, but 
I . . . I thought it would be different.”
“Different how?”
“I don’t know. Less . . . less messy, and more 
magical.”
Queen Cersei laughed. “Wait until you birth a child, Sansa. A woman’s life is 
nine parts mess to one part magic, you’ll learn that soon 
enough . . . and the parts that look like magic often turn out 
to be messiest of all.” She took a sip of milk. “So now you are a woman. Do 
you have the least idea of what that means?”
“It means that I am now fit to be wedded and bedded,” said Sansa, “and to 
bear children for the king.”
The queen gave a wry smile. “A prospect that no longer entices you as it once 
did, I can see. I will not fault you for

that. Joffrey has always been difficult. Even his birth . . . I 
labored a day and a half to bring him forth. You cannot imagine the pain, 
Sansa. I screamed so loudly that I fancied Robert might hear me in the 
kingswood.”
“His Grace was not with you?”
“Robert? Robert was hunting. That was his custom. Whenever my time was near, 
my royal husband would flee to the trees with his huntsmen and hounds. When he 
returned he would present me with some pelts or a stag’s head, and I would 
present him with a baby.
“Not that I wanted him to stay, mind you. I had Grand Maester 
Pycelle and an army of midwives, and I had my brother. When they told Jaime he 
was not allowed in the birthing room, he smiled and asked which of them 
proposed to keep him out.
“Joffrey will show you no such devotion, I fear. You could thank your sister 
for that, if she weren’t dead. He’s never been able to forget that day on the 
Trident when you saw her shame him, so he shames you in turn. You’re stronger 
than you seem, though. I expect you’ll survive a bit of humiliation. I did. You 
may never love the king, but you’ll love his children.”
“I love His Grace with all my heart,” Sansa said.
The queen sighed. “You had best learn some new lies, and quickly. Lord Stannis 
will not like that one, I promise you.”
“The new High Septon said that the gods will never permit Lord Stannis to win, 
since Joffrey is the rightful king.”
A half smile flickered across the queen’s face. “Robert’s

trueborn son and heir. Though Joff would cry whenever Robert picked him up. His 
Grace did not like that. His bastards had always gurgled at him happily, and 
sucked his finger when he put it in their little baseborn mouths. Robert wanted 
smiles and cheers, always, so he went where he found them, to his friends and 
his whores. Robert wanted to be loved. My brother Tyrion has the same disease. 
Do you want to be loved, Sansa?”
“Everyone wants to be loved.”
“I see flowering hasn’t made you any brighter,” said Cersei. “Sansa, permit 
me to share a bit of womanly wisdom with you on this very special day. Love is 
poison. A sweet poison, yes, but it will kill you all the same.”

They had been singing in the sept all morning, since the first report of 
enemy sails had reached the castle. The sound of their voices mingled with the 
whicker of horses, the clank of steel, and the groaning hinges of the great 
bronze gates to make a strange and fearful music. In the sept they sing 
for the Mother’s mercy but on the walls it’s the Warrior they pray to, and all 
in silence. She remembered how Septa Mordane used to tell them that the 
Warrior and the Mother were only two faces of the same great god. But if 
there is only one, whose prayers will be heard?Ser Meryn Trant held the blood bay for Joffrey to mount. Boy and horse 
alike wore gilded mail and enameled crimson plate, with matching golden lions 
on their heads. The pale sunlight flashed off the golds and reds every time 
Joff moved. Bright, shining, and empty, Sansa thought.
The Imp was mounted on a red stallion, armored more plainly than the king in 
battle gear that made him look like a little boy dressed up in his father’s 
clothes. But there was nothing childish about the battle-axe slung below his 
shield. Ser Mandon Moore rode at his side, white steel icy bright. When Tyrion 
saw her he turned his horse her way. “Lady Sansa,” he called from the saddle, 
“surely my sister has asked you to join the other highborn ladies in 
Maegor’s?”“She has, my lord, but King Joffrey sent for me to see him off. I mean 
to visit the sept as well, to pray.”
“I won’t ask for whom.” His mouth twisted oddly; if that was a smile, it was 
the queerest she had ever seen. “This day may change all. For you as well as 
for House Lannister. I ought to have sent you off with Tommen, now that I think 
on it. Still, you should be safe enough in Maegor’s, so long 
as—”
“Sansa!” The boyish shout rang across the yard; Joffrey had seen 
her. “Sansa, here!”
He calls me as if he were calling a dog, she thought.
“His Grace has need of you,” Tyrion Lannister observed. “We’ll talk again 
after the battle, if the gods permit.”
Sansa threaded her way through a file of gold-cloaked spearmen as Joffrey 
beckoned her closer. “It will be battle soon, everyone says so.”
“May the gods have mercy on us all.”
“My uncle’s the one who will need mercy, but I won’t give him any.” Joffrey 
drew his sword. The pommel was a ruby cut in the shape of a heart, set between 
a lion’s jaws. Three fullers were deeply incised in the blade. “My new blade, 
Hearteater.”
He’d owned a sword named Lion’s Tooth once, Sansa remembered. Arya had taken it 
from him and thrown it in a river. I hope Stannis does the same with this 
one. “It is beautifully wrought, Your Grace.”
“Bless my steel with a kiss.” He extended the blade down to her. “Go on, 
kiss it.”He had never sounded more like a stupid little boy. Sansa touched her 
lips to the metal, thinking that she would kiss any number of swords sooner 
than Joffrey. The gesture seemed to please him, though. He sheathed the blade 
with a flourish. “You’ll kiss it again when I return, and taste my uncle’s 
blood.”
Only if one of your Kingsguard kills him for you. Three of the White 
Swords would go with Joffrey and his uncle: Ser Meryn, Ser Mandon, and Ser 
Osmund Kettleblack. “Will you lead your knights into battle?” Sansa asked, 
hoping.
“I would, but my uncle the Imp says my uncle Stannis will never cross the 
river. I’ll command the Three Whores, though. I’m going to see to the traitors 
myself.” The prospect made Joff smile. His plump pink lips always made him 
look pouty. Sansa had liked that once, but now it made her sick.
“They say my brother Robb always goes where the fighting is thickest,” she 
said recklessly. “Though he’s older than Your Grace, to be sure. A man 
grown.”
That made him frown. “I’ll deal with your brother after I’m done with my 
traitor uncle. I’ll gut him with Hearteater, you’ll see.” He wheeled his horse 
about and spurred toward the gate. Ser Meryn and Ser Osmund fell in to his 
right and left, the gold cloaks following four abreast. The Imp and Ser Mandon 
Moore brought up the rear. The guards saw them off with shouts and cheers. When 
the last was gone, a sudden stillness settled over the yard, like the hush 
before a storm.
Through the quiet, the singing pulled at her. Sansa turned

toward the sept. Two stableboys followed, and one of the guards whose watch was 
ended. Others fell in behind them.
Sansa had never seen the sept so crowded, nor so brightly lit; great shafts of 
rainbow-colored sunlight slanted down through the crystals in the high windows, 
and candles burned on every side, their little flames twinkling like stars. The 
Mother’s altar and the Warrior’s swam in light, but Smith and Crone and Maid 
and Father had their worshipers as well, and there were even a few flames 
dancing below the Stranger’s half-human face . . . for what was 
Stannis Baratheon, if not the Stranger come to judge them? Sansa visited each 
of the Seven in turn, lighting a candle at each altar, and then found herself a 
place on the benches between a wizened old washerwoman and a boy no older than 
Rickon, dressed in the fine linen tunic of a knight’s son. The old woman’s hand 
was bony and hard with callus, the boy’s small and soft, but it was good to 
have someone to hold on to. The air was hot and heavy, smelling of incense and 
sweat, crystal-kissed and candle-bright; it made her dizzy to breathe 
it.
She knew the hymn; her mother had taught it to her once, a long time ago in 
Winterfell. She joined her voice to theirs.
Gentle Mother, font of mercy,

save our sons from war, we pray,

stay the swords and stay the arrows,

let them know a better day.

Gentle Mother, strength of women,

help our daughters through this fray,

soothe the wrath and tame the fury,

teach us all a kinder way.
Across the city, thousands had jammed into the Great Sept of Baelor on 
Visenya’s Hill, and they would be singing too, their

voices swelling out over the city, across the river, and up into the sky. 
Surely the gods must hear us, she thought.
Sansa knew most of the hymns, and followed along on those she did not know as 
best she could. She sang along with grizzled old serving men and anxious young 
wives, with serving girls and soldiers, cooks and falconers, knights and 
knaves, squires and spit boys and nursing mothers. She sang with those inside 
the castle walls and those without, sang with all the city. She sang for mercy, 
for the living and the dead alike, for Bran and Rickon and Robb, for her sister 
Arya and her bastard brother Jon Snow, away off on the Wall. She sang for her 
mother and her father, for her grandfather Lord Hoster and her uncle Edmure 
Tully, for her friend Jeyne Poole, for old drunken King Robert, for Septa 
Mordane and Ser Dontos and Jory Cassel and Maester Luwin, for all the brave 
knights and soldiers who would die today, and for the children and the wives 
who would mourn them, and finally, toward the end, she even sang for Tyrion the 
Imp and for the Hound. He is no true knight but he saved me all the 
same, she told the Mother. Save him if you can, and gentle the rage 
inside him.
But when the septon climbed on high and called upon the gods to protect and 
defend their true and noble king, Sansa got to her feet. The aisles were jammed 
with people. She had to shoulder through while the septon called upon the Smith 
to lend strength to Joffrey’s sword and shield, the Warrior to give him 
courage, the Father to defend him in his need. Let his sword break and his 
shield shatter, Sansa thought coldly as she shoved out through the

doors, let his courage fail him and every man desert him.
A few guards paced along on the gatehouse battlements, but otherwise the castle 
seemed empty. Sansa stopped and listened. Away off, she could hear the sounds 
of battle. The singing almost drowned them out, but the sounds were there if 
you had the ears to hear: the deep moan of warhorns, the creak and thud of 
catapults flinging stones, the splashes and splinterings, the crackle of 
burning pitch and thrum of scorpions loosing their yard-long 
iron-headed shafts . . . and beneath it all, the cries of dying 
men.
It was another sort of song, a terrible song. Sansa pulled the hood of her 
cloak up over her ears, and
hurried toward Maegor’s Holdfast, the 
castle-within-a-castle where the queen had promised they would all be 
safe. At the foot of the drawbridge, she came upon Lady Tanda and her two 
daughters. Falyse had arrived yesterday from Castle Stokeworth with a small 
troop of soldiers. She was trying to coax her sister onto the bridge, but 
Lollys clung to her maid, sobbing, “I don’t want to, I don’t want to, I don’t 
want to.”
“The battle is begun,” Lady Tanda said in a brittle 
voice.
“I don’t want to, I don’t want to.”
There was no way Sansa could avoid them. She greeted them courteously. “May I 
be of help?”
Lady Tanda flushed with shame. “No, my lady, but we thank you kindly. You must 
forgive my daughter, she has not been well.”
“I don’t want to.” Lollys clutched at her maid, a slender, pretty girl with 
short dark hair who looked as though she wanted

nothing so much as to shove her mistress into the dry moat, onto those iron 
spikes. “Please, please, I don’t want to.”
Sansa spoke to her gently. “We’ll all be thrice protected inside, and there’s 
to be food and drink and song as well.”
Lollys gaped at her, mouth open. She had dull brown eyes that always seemed to 
be wet with tears. “I don’t want to.”
“You have to,” her sister Falyse said sharply, “and that is the 
end of it. Shae, help me.” They each took an elbow, and together half dragged 
and half carried Lollys across the bridge. Sansa followed with their mother. 
“She’s been sick,” Lady Tanda said. If a babe can be termed a 
sickness, Sansa thought. It was common gossip that Lollys was with 
child.
The two guards at the door wore the lion-crested helms and crimson cloaks of 
House Lannister, but Sansa knew they were only dressed-up sellswords. Another 
sat at the foot of the stair—a real guard would have been standing, not 
sitting on a step with his halberd across his knees—but he rose when he 
saw them and opened the door to usher them inside.
The Queen’s Ballroom was not a tenth the size of the castle’s Great Hall, only 
half as big as the Small Hall in the Tower of the Hand, but it could still seat 
a hundred, and it made up in grace what it lacked in space. Beaten silver 
mirrors backed every wall sconce, so the torches burned twice as bright; the 
walls were paneled in richly carved wood, and sweet-smelling rushes covered the 
floors. From the gallery above drifted down the merry strains of pipes and 
fiddle. A line of arched windows

ran along the south wall, but they had been closed off with heavy draperies. 
Thick velvet hangings admitted no thread of light, and would muffle the sound 
of prayer and war alike. It makes no matter, Sansa thought. The 
war is with us.
Almost every highborn woman in the city sat at the long trestle tables, along 
with a handful of old men and young boys. The women were wives, daughters, 
mothers, and sisters. Their men had gone out to fight Lord Stannis. Many would 
not return. The air was heavy with the knowledge. As Joffrey’s betrothed, Sansa 
had the seat of honor on the queen’s right hand. She was climbing the dais when 
she saw the man standing in the shadows by the back wall. He wore a long 
hauberk of oiled black mail, and held his sword before him: her father’s 
greatsword, Ice, near as tall as he was. Its point rested on the floor, and his 
hard bony fingers curled around the crossguard on either side of the grip. 
Sansa’s breath caught in her throat. Ser Ilyn Payne seemed to sense her stare. 
He turned his gaunt, pox-ravaged face toward her.
“What is he doing here?” she asked Osfryd Kettleblack. He captained 
the queen’s new red cloak guard.
Osfryd grinned. “Her Grace expects she’ll have need of him before the night’s 
done.”
Ser Ilyn was the King’s Justice. There was only one service he might be needed 
for. Whose head does she want?
“All rise for Her Grace, Cersei of House Lannister, Queen Regent and Protector 
of the Realm,” the royal steward cried.
Cersei’s gown was snowy linen, white as the cloaks of the

Kingsguard. Her long dagged sleeves showed a lining of gold satin. Masses of 
bright yellow hair tumbled to her bare shoulders in thick curls. Around her 
slender neck hung a rope of diamonds and emeralds. The white made her look 
strangely innocent, almost maidenly, but there were points of color on her 
cheeks.
“Be seated,” the queen said when she had taken her place on the dais, “and 
be welcome.” Osfryd Kettleblack held her chair; a page performed the same 
service for Sansa. “You look pale, Sansa,” Cersei observed. “Is your red 
flower still blooming?”
“Yes.”
“How apt. The men will bleed out there, and you in here.” The queen signaled 
for the first course to be served.
“Why is Ser Ilyn here?” Sansa blurted out.
The queen glanced at the mute headsman. “To deal with treason, and to defend 
us if need be. He was a knight before he was a headsman.” She pointed her 
spoon toward the end of the hall, where the tall wooden doors had been closed 
and barred. “When the axes smash down those doors, you may be glad of 
him.”
I would be gladder if it were the Hound, Sansa thought. Harsh as he 
was, she did not believe Sandor Clegane would let any harm come to her. “Won’t 
your guards protect us?”
“And who will protect us from my guards?” The queen gave Osfryd a sideways 
look. “Loyal sellswords are rare as virgin whores. If the battle is lost, my 
guards will trip on those crimson cloaks in their haste to rip them off. 
They’ll steal what they can and flee, along with the serving men, washerwomen, 
and

stableboys, all out to save their own worthless hides. Do you have any notion 
what happens when a city is sacked, Sansa? No, you wouldn’t, would you? All you 
know of life you learned from singers, and there’s such a dearth of good 
sacking songs.”
“True knights would never harm women and children.” The words rang hollow in 
her ears even as she said them.
“True knights.” The queen seemed to find that wonderfully amusing. “No doubt 
you’re right. So why don’t you just eat your broth like a good girl and wait 
for Symeon Star-Eyes and Prince Aemon the Dragonknight to come rescue you, 
sweetling. I’m sure it won’t be very long now.”

The torches shimmered brightly against the hammered metal of the wall 
sconces, filling the Queen’s Ballroom with silvery light. Yet there was still 
darkness in that hall. Sansa could see it in the pale eyes of Ser Ilyn Payne, 
who stood by the back door still as stone, taking neither food nor wine. She 
could hear it in Lord Gyles’s racking cough, and the whispered voice of Osney 
Kettleblack when he slipped in to bring Cersei the tidings.Sansa was finishing her broth when he came the first time, entering 
through the back. She glimpsed him talking to his brother Osfryd. Then he 
climbed the dais and knelt beside the high seat, smelling of horse, four long 
thin scratches on his cheek crusted with scabs, his hair falling down past his 
collar and into his eyes. For all his whispering, Sansa could not help but 
hear. “The fleets are locked in battle. Some archers got ashore, but the 
Hound’s cut them to pieces, Y’Grace. Your brother’s raising his chain, I heard 
the signal. Some drunkards down to Flea Bottom are smashing doors and climbing 
through windows. Lord Bywater’s sent the gold cloaks to deal with them. 
Baelor’s Sept is jammed full, everyone praying.”
“And my son?”
“The king went to Baelor’s to get the High Septon’s blessing. Now he’s walking 
the walls with the Hand, telling the

men to be brave, lifting their spirits as it were.”
Cersei beckoned to her page for another cup of wine, a golden vintage from the 
Arbor, fruity and rich. The queen was drinking heavily, but the wine only 
seemed to make her more beautiful; her cheeks were flushed, and her eyes had a 
bright, feverish heat to them as she looked down over the hall. Eyes of 
wildfire, Sansa thought.
Musicians played. Jugglers juggled. Moon Boy lurched about the hall on stilts 
making mock of everyone, while Ser Dontos chased serving girls on his 
broomstick horse. The guests laughed, but it was a joyless laughter, the sort 
of laughter that can turn into sobbing in half a heartbeat. Their bodies 
are here, but their thoughts are on the city walls, and their hearts as 
well.
After the broth came a salad of apples, nuts, and raisins. At any other time, 
it might have made a tasty dish, but tonight all the food was flavored with 
fear. Sansa was not the only one in the hall without an appetite. Lord Gyles 
was coughing more than he was eating, Lollys Stokeworth sat hunched and 
shivering, and the young bride of one of Ser Lancel’s knights began to weep 
uncontrollably. The queen commanded Maester Frenken to put her to bed with a 
cup of dreamwine. “Tears,” she said scornfully to Sansa as the woman was led 
from the hall. “The woman’s weapon, my lady mother used to call them. The 
man’s weapon is a sword. And that tells us all you need to know, doesn’t 
it?”
“Men must be very brave, though,” said Sansa. “To ride out and face swords 
and axes, everyone trying to kill you . . .”“Jaime told me once that he only feels truly alive in battle and in 
bed.” She lifted her cup and took a long swallow. Her salad was untouched. “I 
would sooner face any number of swords than sit helpless like this, pretending 
to enjoy the company of this flock of frightened hens.”
“You asked them here, Your Grace.”
“Certain things are expected of a queen. They will be expected of you should 
you ever wed Joffrey. Best learn.” The queen studied the wives, daughters, and 
mothers who filled the benches. “Of themselves the hens are nothing, but their 
cocks are important for one reason or another, and some may survive this 
battle. So it behooves me to give their women my protection. If my wretched 
dwarf of a brother should somehow manage to prevail, they will return to their 
husbands and fathers full of tales about how brave I was, how my courage 
inspired them and lifted their spirits, how I never doubted our victory even 
for a moment.”
“And if the castle should fall?”
“You’d like that, wouldn’t you?” Cersei did not wait for a denial. “If I’m 
not betrayed by my own guards, I may be able to hold here for a time. Then I 
can go to the walls and offer to yield to Lord Stannis in person. That will 
spare us the worst. But if Maegor’s Holdfast should fall before Stannis can 
come up, why then, most of my guests are in for a bit of rape, I’d say. And you 
should never rule out mutilation, torture, and murder at times like 
these.”
Sansa was horrified. “These are women, unarmed, and gently

born.”
“Their birth protects them,” Cersei admitted, “though not as much as you’d 
think. Each one’s worth a good ransom, but after the madness of battle, 
soldiers often seem to want flesh more than coin. Even so, a golden shield is 
better than none. Out in the streets, the women won’t be treated near as 
tenderly. Nor will our servants. Pretty things like that serving wench of Lady 
Tanda’s could be in for a lively night, but don’t imagine the old and the 
infirm and the ugly will be spared. Enough drink will make blind washerwomen 
and reeking pig girls seem as comely as you, sweetling.”
“Me?”
“Try not to sound so like a mouse, Sansa. You’re a woman now, remember? 
And betrothed to my firstborn.” The queen sipped at her wine. “Were it anyone 
else outside the gates, I might hope to beguile him. But this is Stannis 
Baratheon. I’d have a better chance of seducing his horse.” She noticed the 
look on Sansa’s face, and laughed. “Have I shocked you, my lady?” She leaned 
close. “You little fool. Tears are not a woman’s only weapon. You’ve 
got another one between your legs, and you’d best learn to use it. You’ll find 
men use their swords freely enough. Both kinds of swords.”
Sansa was spared the need to reply when two Kettleblacks reentered the 
hall. Ser Osmund and his brothers had become great favorites about the castle; 
they were always ready with a smile and a jest, and got on with grooms and 
huntsmen as well as they

did with knights and squires. With the serving wenches they got on best of all, 
it was gossiped. Of late Ser Osmund had taken Sandor Clegane’s place by 
Joffrey’s side, and Sansa had heard the women at the washing well saying he was 
as strong as the Hound, only younger and faster. If that was so, she wondered 
why she had never once heard of these Kettleblacks before Ser Osmund was named 
to the Kingsguard.
Osney was all smiles as he knelt beside the queen. “The hulks have gone up, 
Y’Grace. The whole Blackwater’s awash with wildfire. A hundred ships burning, 
maybe more.”
“And my son?”
“He’s at the Mud Gate with the Hand and the Kingsguard, Y’Grace. He spoke to 
the archers on the hoardings before, and gave them a few tips on handling a 
crossbow, he did. All agree, he’s a right brave boy.”
“He’d best remain a right live boy.” Cersei turned to his brother 
Osfryd, who was taller, sterner, and wore a drooping black mustache. 
“Yes?”
Osfryd had donned a steel halfhelm over his long black hair, and the look on 
his face was grim. “Y’Grace,” he said quietly, “the boys caught a groom and 
two maidservants trying to sneak out a postern with three of the king’s 
horses.”
“The night’s first traitors,” the queen said, “but not the last, I fear. 
Have Ser Ilyn see to them, and put their heads on pikes outside the stables as 
a warning.” As they left, she turned to Sansa. “Another lesson you should 
learn, if you hope to sit

beside my son. Be gentle on a night like this and you’ll have treasons popping 
up all about you like mushrooms after a hard rain. The only way to keep your 
people loyal is to make certain they fear you more than they do the 
enemy.”
“I will remember, Your Grace,” said Sansa, though she had always heard that 
love was a surer route to the people’s loyalty than fear. If I am ever a 
queen, I’ll make them love me.
Crabclaw pies followed the salad. Then came mutton roasted with leeks and 
carrots, served in trenchers of hollowed bread. Lollys ate too fast, got sick, 
and retched all over herself and her sister. Lord Gyles coughed, drank, 
coughed, drank, and passed out. The queen gazed down in disgust to where he 
sprawled with his face in his trencher and his hand in a puddle of wine. “The 
gods must have been mad to waste manhood on the likes of him, and I must have 
been mad to demand his release.”
Osfryd Kettleblack returned, crimson cloak swirling. “There’s folks gathering 
in the square, Y’Grace, asking to take refuge in the castle. Not a mob, rich 
merchants and the like.”
“Command them to return to their homes,” the queen said. “If they won’t go, 
have our crossbowmen kill a few. No sorties; I won’t have the gates opened for 
any reason.”
“As you command.” He bowed and moved off.
The queen’s face was hard and angry. “Would that I could take a sword to their 
necks myself.” Her voice was starting to slur. “When we were little, Jaime 
and I were so much alike that even our lord father could not tell us apart. 
Sometimes as a lark

we would dress in each other’s clothes and spend a whole day each as the other. 
Yet even so, when Jaime was given his first sword, there was none for me. ‘What do I get?’ I remember asking. We were so much alike, I could never 
understand why they treated us so differently. Jaime learned to fight 
with sword and lance and mace, while I was taught to smile and sing and please. 
He was heir to Casterly Rock, while I was to be sold to some stranger like a 
horse, to be ridden whenever my new owner liked, beaten whenever he liked, and 
cast aside in time for a younger filly. Jaime’s lot was to be glory and power, 
while mine was birth and moonblood.”
“But you were queen of all the Seven Kingdoms,” Sansa said.
“When it comes to swords, a queen is only a woman after all.” Cersei’s wine 
cup was empty. The page moved to fill it again, but she turned it over and 
shook her head. “No more. I must keep a clear head.”
The last course was goat cheese served with baked apples. The scent of cinnamon 
filled the hall as Osney Kettleblack slipped in to kneel once more between 
them. “Y’Grace,” he murmured. “Stannis has landed men on the tourney 
grounds, and there’s more coming across. The Mud Gate’s under attack, and 
they’ve brought a ram to the King’s Gate. The Imp’s gone out to drive them 
off.”
“That will fill them with fear,” the queen said dryly. “He hasn’t taken 
Joff, I hope.”
“No, Y’Grace, the king’s with my brother at the Whores, flinging Antler Men 
into the river.”“With the Mud Gate under assault? Folly. Tell Ser Osmund I want him out 
of there at once, it’s too dangerous. Fetch him back to the castle.”
“The Imp said—”
“It’s what I said that ought concern you.” Cersei’s eyes narrowed. 
“Your brother will do as he’s told, or I’ll see to it that he leads the next 
sortie himself, and you’ll go with him.”
After the meal had been cleared away, many of the guests asked leave to go to 
the sept. Cersei graciously granted their request. Lady Tanda and her daughters 
were among those who fled. For those who remained, a singer was brought forth 
to fill the hall with the sweet music of the high harp. He sang of Jonquil and 
Florian, of Prince Aemon the Dragonknight and his love for his brother’s queen, 
of Nymeria’s ten thousand ships. They were beautiful songs, but terribly sad. 
Several of the women began to weep, and Sansa felt her own eyes growing 
moist.
“Very good, dear.” The queen leaned close. “You want to practice those 
tears. You’ll need them for King Stannis.”
Sansa shifted nervously. “Your Grace?”
“Oh, spare me your hollow courtesies. Matters must have reached a desperate 
strait out there if they need a dwarf to lead them, so you might as well take 
off your mask. I know all about your little treasons in the 
godswood.”
“The godswood?” Don’t look at Ser Dontos, don’t, don’t, Sansa told 
herself. She doesn’t know, no one knows, Dontos promised me, my Florian 
would never fail me. “I’ve done no

treasons. I only visit the godswood to pray.”
“For Stannis. Or your brother, it’s all the same. Why else seek your father’s 
gods? You’re praying for our defeat. What would you call that, if not 
treason?”
“I pray for Joffrey,” she insisted nervously.
“Why, because he treats you so sweetly?” The queen took a flagon of sweet 
plum wine from a passing serving girl and filled Sansa’s cup. “Drink,” she 
commanded coldly. “Perhaps it will give you the courage to deal with truth for 
a change.”
Sansa lifted the cup to her lips and took a sip. The wine was cloyingly sweet, 
but very strong.
“You can do better than that,” Cersei said. “Drain the cup, Sansa. Your 
queen commands you.”
It almost gagged her, but Sansa emptied the cup, gulping down the thick sweet 
wine until her head was swimming.
“More?” Cersei asked.
“No. Please.”
The queen looked displeased. “When you asked about Ser Ilyn earlier, I lied to 
you. Would you like to hear the truth, Sansa? Would you like to know why he’s 
really here?”
She did not dare answer, but it did not matter. The queen raised a hand and 
beckoned, never waiting for a reply. Sansa had not even seen Ser Ilyn return to 
the hall, but suddenly there he was, striding from the shadows behind the dais 
as silent as a cat. He carried Ice unsheathed. Her father had always cleaned 
the blade in the godswood after he took a man’s head,

Sansa recalled, but Ser Ilyn was not so fastidious. There was blood drying on 
the rippling steel, the red already fading to brown. “Tell Lady Sansa why I 
keep you by us,” said Cersei.
Ser Ilyn opened his mouth and emitted a choking rattle. His pox-scarred face 
had no expression.
“He’s here for us, he says,” the queen said. “Stannis may take the city and 
he may take the throne, but I will not suffer him to judge me. I do not mean 
for him to have us alive.”
“Us?”
“You heard me. So perhaps you had best pray again, Sansa, and for a different 
outcome. The Starks will have no joy from the fall of House Lannister, I 
promise you.” She reached out and touched Sansa’s hair, brushing it lightly 
away from her neck.

When Ser Lancel Lannister told the queen that the battle was lost, she 
turned her empty wine cup in her hands and said, “Tell my brother, ser.” Her 
voice was distant, as if the news were of no great interest to her.
“Your brother’s likely dead.” Ser Lancel’s surcoat was soaked with the blood 
seeping out under his arm. When he had arrived in the hall, the sight of him 
had made some of the guests scream. “He was on the bridge of boats when it 
broke apart, we think. Ser Mandon’s likely gone as well, and no one can find 
the Hound. Gods be damned, Cersei, why did you have them fetch 
Joffrey back to the castle? The gold cloaks are throwing down their spears and 
running, hundreds of them. When they saw the king leaving, they lost all heart. 
The whole Blackwater’s awash with wrecks and fire and corpses, but we could 
have held if—”Osney Kettleblack pushed past him. “There’s fighting on both sides of 
the river now, Y’Grace. It may be that some of Stannis’s lords are fighting 
each other, no one’s sure, it’s all confused over there. The Hound’s gone, no 
one knows where, and Ser Balon’s fallen back inside the city. The riverside’s 
theirs. They’re ramming at the King’s Gate again, and Ser Lancel’s right, your 
men are deserting the walls and killing their own officers. There’s mobs at the 
Iron Gate and the Gate of the Gods fighting to

get out, and Flea Bottom’s one great drunken riot.”
Gods be good, Sansa thought, it is happening, Joffrey’s lost his 
head and so have I. She looked for Ser Ilyn, but the King’s Justice was 
not to be seen. I can feel him, though. He’s close, I’ll not escape him, 
he’ll have my head.
Strangely calm, the queen turned to his brother Osfryd. “Raise the drawbridge 
and bar the doors. No one enters or leaves Maegor’s without my 
leave.”
“What about them women who went to pray?”
“They chose to leave my protection. Let them pray; perhaps the gods will 
defend them. Where’s my son?”
“The castle gatehouse. He wanted to command the crossbowmen. There’s a mob 
howling outside, half of them gold cloaks who came with him when we left the 
Mud Gate.”
“Bring him inside Maegor’s now.”
“No!” Lancel was so angry he forgot to keep his voice down. Heads turned 
toward them as he shouted, “We’ll have the Mud Gate all over again. Let him 
stay where he is, he’s the king—”
“He’s my son.” Cersei Lannister rose to her feet. “You claim to be a 
Lannister as well, cousin, prove it. Osfryd, why are you standing there? 
Now means today.”
Osfryd Kettleblack hurried from the hall, his brother with him. Many of the 
guests were rushing out as well. Some of the women were weeping, some praying. 
Others simply remained at the tables and called for more wine. “Cersei,” Ser 
Lancel pleaded, “if we lose the castle, Joffrey will be killed in any case, 
you

know that. Let him stay, I’ll keep him by me, I 
swear—”
“Get out of my way.” Cersei slammed her open palm into his wound. Ser Lancel 
cried out in pain and almost fainted as the queen swept from the room. She 
spared Sansa not so much as a glance. She’s forgotten me. Ser Ilyn will 
kill me and she won’t even think about it.
“Oh, gods,” an old woman wailed. “We’re lost, the battle’s lost, she’s 
running.” Several children were crying. They can smell the fear. 
Sansa found herself alone on the dais. Should she stay here, or run after the 
queen and plead for her life?
She never knew why she got to her feet, but she did. “Don’t be afraid,” she 
told them loudly. “The queen has raised the drawbridge. This is the safest 
place in the city. There’s thick walls, the moat, the 
spikes . . .”
“What’s happened?” demanded a woman she knew slightly, the wife of a lesser 
lordling. “What did Osney tell her? Is the king hurt, has the city 
fallen?”
“Tell us,” someone else shouted. One woman asked about her father, 
another her son.
Sansa raised her hands for quiet. “Joffrey’s come back to the castle. He’s not 
hurt. They’re still fighting, that’s all I know, they’re fighting bravely. The 
queen will be back soon.” The last was a lie, but she had to soothe them. She 
noticed the fools standing under the galley. “Moon Boy, make us 
laugh.”
Moon Boy did a cartwheel, and vaulted on top of a table. He grabbed up four 
wine cups and began to juggle them. Every so

often one of them would come down and smash him in the head. A few nervous 
laughs echoed through the hall. Sansa went to Ser Lancel and knelt beside him. 
His wound was bleeding afresh where the queen had struck him. “Madness,” he 
gasped. “Gods, the Imp was right, was right . . .”
“Help him,” Sansa commanded two of the serving men. One just looked at her 
and ran, flagon and all. Other servants were leaving the hall as well, but she 
could not help that. Together, Sansa and the serving man got the wounded knight 
back on his feet. “Take him to Maester Frenken.” Lancel was one of 
them, yet somehow she still could not bring herself to wish him dead. 
I am soft and weak and stupid, just as Joffrey says. I should be killing 
him, not helping him.
The torches had begun to burn low, and one or two had flickered out. No one 
troubled to replace them. Cersei did not return. Ser Dontos climbed the dais 
while all eyes were on the other fool. “Go back to your bedchamber, sweet 
Jonquil,” he whispered. “Lock yourself in, you’ll be safer there. I’ll come 
for you when the battle’s done.”
Someone will come for me, Sansa thought, but will it be you, or 
will it be Ser Ilyn? For a mad moment she thought of begging Dontos to 
defend her. He had been a knight too, trained with the sword and sworn to 
defend the weak. No. He has not the courage, or the skill. I would only be 
killing him as well.
It took all the strength she had in her to walk slowly from the Queen’s 
Ballroom when she wanted so badly to run. When she

reached the steps, she did run, up and around until she was 
breathless and dizzy. One of the guards knocked into her on the stair. A 
jeweled wine cup and a pair of silver candlesticks spilled out of the crimson 
cloak he’d wrapped them in and went clattering down the steps. He hurried after 
them, paying Sansa no mind once he decided she was not going to try and take 
his loot.
Her bedchamber was black as pitch. Sansa barred the door and fumbled through 
the dark to the window. When she ripped back the drapes, her breath caught in 
her throat.
The southern sky was aswirl with glowing, shifting colors, the reflections of 
the great fires that burned below. Baleful green tides moved against the 
bellies of the clouds, and pools of orange light spread out across the heavens. 
The reds and yellows of common flame warred against the emeralds and jades of 
wildfire, each color flaring and then fading, birthing armies of short-lived 
shadows to die again an instant later. Green dawns gave way to orange dusks in 
half a heartbeat. The air itself smelled burnt, the way a soup kettle 
sometimes smelled if it was left on the fire too long and all the soup boiled 
away. Embers drifted through the night air like swarms of fireflies.
Sansa backed away from the window, retreating toward the safety of her bed. 
I’ll go to sleep, she told herself, and when I wake it will be a 
new day, and the sky will be blue again. The fighting will be done and someone 
will tell me whether I’m to live or die. “Lady,” she whimpered softly, 
wondering if she would meet her wolf again when she was dead.Then something stirred behind her, and a hand reached out of the dark and 
grabbed her wrist.
Sansa opened her mouth to scream, but another hand clamped down over her face, 
smothering her. His fingers were rough and callused, and sticky with blood. 
“Little bird. I knew you’d come.” The voice was a drunken rasp.
Outside, a swirling lance of jade light spit at the stars, filling the room 
with green glare. She saw him for a moment, all black and green, the blood on 
his face dark as tar, his eyes glowing like a dog’s in the sudden glare. Then 
the light faded and he was only a hulking darkness in a stained white 
cloak.
“If you scream I’ll kill you. Believe that.” He took his hand from her mouth. 
Her breath was coming ragged. The Hound had a flagon of wine on her bedside 
table. He took a long pull. “Don’t you want to ask who’s winning the battle, 
little bird?”
“Who?” she said, too frightened to defy him.
The Hound laughed. “I only know who’s lost. Me.”
He is drunker than I’ve ever seen him. He was sleeping in my bed. What 
does he want here? “What have you lost?”
“All.” The burnt half of his face was a mask of dried blood. “Bloody dwarf. 
Should have killed him. Years ago.”
“He’s dead, they say.”
“Dead? No. Bugger that. I don’t want him dead.” He cast the empty flagon 
aside. “I want him burned. If the gods are good, they’ll burn him, 
but I won’t be here to see. I’m going.”
“Going?” She tried to wriggle free, but his grasp was iron.“The little bird repeats whatever she hears. Going, 
yes.”
“Where will you go?”
“Away from here. Away from the fires. Go out the Iron Gate, I suppose. North 
somewhere, anywhere.”
“You won’t get out,” Sansa said. “The queen’s closed up Maegor’s, and the 
city gates are shut as well.”
“Not to me. I have the white cloak. And I have this.” He patted the 
pommel of his sword. “The man who tries to stop me is a dead man. Unless he’s 
on fire.” He laughed bitterly.
“Why did you come here?”
“You promised me a song, little bird. Have you forgotten?”
She didn’t know what he meant. She couldn’t sing for him now, here, with the 
sky aswirl with fire and men dying in their hundreds and their thousands. “I 
can’t,” she said. “Let me go, you’re scaring me.”
“Everything scares you. Look at me. Look at me.”
The blood masked the worst of his scars, but his eyes were white and wide and 
terrifying. The burnt corner of his mouth twitched and twitched again. Sansa 
could smell him; a stink of sweat and sour wine and stale vomit, and over it 
all the reek of blood, blood, blood.
“I could keep you safe,” he rasped. “They’re all afraid of me. No one would 
hurt you again, or I’d kill them.” He yanked her closer, and for a moment she 
thought he meant to kiss her. He was too strong to fight. She closed her eyes, 
wanting it to be over, but nothing happened. “Still can’t bear to look, can 
you?”

she heard him say. He gave her arm a hard wrench, pulling her around and 
shoving her down onto the bed. “I’ll have that song. Florian and Jonquil, you 
said.” His dagger was out, poised at her throat. “Sing, little bird. Sing for 
your little life.”
Her throat was dry and tight with fear, and every song she had ever known had 
fled from her mind. Please don’t kill me, she wanted to scream, 
please don’t. She could feel him twisting the point, pushing it into 
her throat, and she almost closed her eyes again, but then she remembered. It 
was not the song of Florian and Jonquil, but it was a song. Her voice sounded 
small and thin and tremulous in her ears.
Gentle Mother, font of mercy,

save our sons from war, we pray,

stay the swords and stay the arrows,

let them know a better day.

Gentle Mother, strength of women,

help our daughters through this fray,

soothe the wrath and tame the fury,

teach us all a kinder way.She had forgotten the other verses. When her voice trailed off, she 
feared he might kill her, but after a moment the Hound took the blade from her 
throat, never speaking.
Some instinct made her lift her hand and cup his cheek with her fingers. The 
room was too dark for her to see him, but she could feel the stickiness of the 
blood, and a wetness that was not blood. “Little bird,” he said once more, 
his voice raw and harsh as steel on stone. Then he rose from the bed. Sansa 
heard cloth ripping, followed by the softer sound of retreating 
footsteps.
When she crawled out of bed, long moments later, she was alone. She found his 
cloak on the floor, twisted up tight, the

white wool stained by blood and fire. The sky outside was darker by then, with 
only a few pale green ghosts dancing against the stars. A chill wind was 
blowing, banging the shutters. Sansa was cold. She shook out the torn cloak and 
huddled beneath it on the floor, shivering.
How long she stayed there she could not have said, but after a time she heard a 
bell ringing, far off across the city. The sound was a deep-throated bronze 
booming, coming faster with each knell. Sansa was wondering what it might mean 
when a second bell joined in, and a third, their voices calling across the 
hills and hollows, the alleys and towers, to every corner of King’s Landing. 
She threw off the cloak and went to her window.
The first faint hint of dawn was visible in the east, and the Red Keep’s own 
bells were ringing now, joining in the swelling river of sound that flowed from 
the seven crystal towers of the Great Sept of Baelor. They had rung the bells 
when King Robert died, she remembered, but this was different, no slow dolorous 
death knell but a joyful thunder. She could hear men shouting in the streets as 
well, and something that could only be cheers.
It was Ser Dontos who brought her the word. He staggered through her open door, 
wrapped her in his flabby arms, and whirled her around and around the room, 
whooping so incoherently that Sansa understood not a word of it. He was as 
drunk as the Hound had been, but in him it was a dancing happy drunk. She was 
breathless and dizzy when he let her down. “What is it?” She clutched at a 
bedpost. “What’s happened? Tell me!”“It’s done! Done! Done! The city is saved. Lord Stannis is dead, Lord 
Stannis is fled, no one knows, no one cares, his host is broken, the danger’s 
done. Slaughtered, scattered, or gone over, they say. Oh, the bright banners! 
The banners, Jonquil, the banners! Do you have any wine? We ought to drink to 
this day, yes. It means you’re safe, don’t you see?”
“Tell me what’s happened!” Sansa shook him.
Ser Dontos laughed and hopped from one leg to the other, almost falling. “They 
came up through the ashes while the river was burning. The river, Stannis was 
neck deep in the river, and they took him from the rear. Oh, to be a knight 
again, to have been part of it! His own men hardly fought, they say. Some ran 
but more bent the knee and went over, shouting for Lord Renly! What must 
Stannis have thought when he heard that? I had it from Osney Kettleblack who 
had it from Ser Osmund, but Ser Balon’s back now and his men say the same, and 
the gold cloaks as well. We’re delivered, sweetling! They came up the roseroad 
and along the riverbank, through all the fields Stannis had burned, the ashes 
puffing up around their boots and turning all their armor grey, but oh! the 
banners must have been bright, the golden rose and golden lion and 
all the others, the Marbrand tree and the Rowan, Tarly’s huntsman and Redwyne’s 
grapes and Lady Oakheart’s leaf. All the westermen, all the power of Highgarden 
and Casterly Rock! Lord Tywin himself had their right wing on the north side of 
the river, with Randyll Tarly commanding the center and Mace Tyrell the left, 
but the vanguard won the fight. They plunged through

Stannis like a lance through a pumpkin, every man of them howling like some 
demon in steel. And do you know who led the vanguard? Do you? Do you? Do 
you?”
“Robb?” It was too much to be hoped, but . . .
“It was Lord Renly! Lord Renly in his green armor, with the fires 
shimmering off his golden antlers! Lord Renly with his tall spear in his hand! 
They say he killed Ser Guyard Morrigen himself in single combat, and a dozen 
other great knights as well. It was Renly, it was Renly, it was Renly! Oh! the 
banners, darling Sansa! Oh! to be a knight!”

The throne room was a sea of jewels, furs, and bright fabrics. Lords and 
ladies filled the back of the hall and stood beneath the high windows, jostling 
like fishwives on a dock.The denizens of Joffrey’s court had striven to outdo each other today. 
Jalabhar Xho was all in feathers, a plumage so fantastic and extravagant that 
he seemed like to take flight. The High Septon’s crystal crown fired rainbows 
through the air every time he moved his head. At the council table, Queen 
Cersei shimmered in a cloth-of-gold gown slashed in burgundy velvet, while 
beside her Varys fussed and simpered in a lilac brocade. Moon Boy and Ser 
Dontos wore new suits of motley, clean as a spring morning. Even Lady Tanda and 
her daughters looked pretty in matching gowns of turquoise silk and vair, and 
Lord Gyles was coughing into a square of scarlet silk trimmed with golden lace. 
King Joffrey sat above them all, amongst the blades and barbs of the Iron 
Throne. He was in crimson samite, his black mantle studded with rubies, on his 
head his heavy golden crown.
Squirming through a press of knights, squires, and rich townfolk, Sansa reached 
the front of the gallery just as a blast of trumpets announced the entry of 
Lord Tywin Lannister.
He rode his warhorse down the length of the hall and dismounted before the Iron 
Throne. Sansa had never seen such

armor; all burnished red steel, inlaid with golden scrollwork and 
ornamentation. His rondels were sunbursts, the roaring lion that crowned his 
helm had ruby eyes, and a lioness on each shoulder fastened a cloth-of-gold 
cloak so long and heavy that it draped the hindquarters of his charger. Even 
the horse’s armor was gilded, and his bardings were shimmering crimson silk 
emblazoned with the lion of Lannister.
The Lord of Casterly Rock made such an impressive figure that it was a shock 
when his destrier dropped a load of dung right at the base of the throne. 
Joffrey had to step gingerly around it as he descended to embrace his 
grandfather and proclaim him Savior of the City. Sansa covered her mouth to 
hide a nervous smile.
Joff made a show of asking his grandfather to assume governance of the realm, 
and Lord Tywin solemnly accepted the responsibility, “until Your Grace does 
come of age.” Then squires removed his armor and Joff fastened the Hand’s 
chain of office around his neck. Lord Tywin took a seat at the council table 
beside the queen. After the destrier was led off and his homage removed, Cersei 
nodded for the ceremonies to continue.
A fanfare of brazen trumpets greeted each of the heroes as he stepped between 
the great oaken doors. Heralds cried his name and deeds for all to hear, and 
the noble knights and highborn ladies cheered as lustily as cutthroats at a 
cockfight. Pride of place was given to Mace Tyrell, the Lord of Highgarden, a 
once-powerful man gone to fat, yet still handsome. His sons followed him in; 
Ser Loras and his older brother Ser Garlan the Gallant.

The three dressed alike, in green velvet trimmed with sable.
The king descended the throne once more to greet them, a great honor. He 
fastened about the throat of each a chain of roses wrought in soft yellow gold, 
from which hung a golden disc with the lion of Lannister picked out in rubies. 
“The roses support the lion, as the might of Highgarden supports the realm,” 
proclaimed Joffrey. “If there is any boon you would ask of me, ask and it 
shall be yours.”
And now it comes, thought Sansa.
“Your Grace,” said Ser Loras, “I beg the honor of serving in your 
Kingsguard, to defend you against your enemies.”
Joffrey drew the Knight of Flowers to his feet and kissed him on his cheek. 
“Done, brother.”
Lord Tyrell bowed his head. “There is no greater pleasure than to serve the 
King’s Grace. If I was deemed worthy to join your royal council, you would find 
none more loyal or true.”
Joff put a hand on Lord Tyrell’s shoulder and kissed him when he stood. “Your 
wish is granted.”
Ser Garlan Tyrell, five years senior to Ser Loras, was a taller bearded version 
of his more famous younger brother. He was thicker about the chest and broader 
at the shoulders, and though his face was comely enough, he lacked Ser Loras’s 
startling beauty. “Your Grace,” Garlan said when the king approached him, “I 
have a maiden sister, Margaery, the delight of our House. She was wed to Renly 
Baratheon, as you know, but Lord Renly went to war before the marriage could be 
consummated, so she remains

innocent. Margaery has heard tales of your wisdom, courage, and chivalry, and 
has come to love you from afar. I beseech you to send for her, to take her hand 
in marriage, and to wed your House to mine for all time.”
King Joffrey made a show of looking surprised. “Ser Garlan, your sister’s 
beauty is famed throughout the Seven Kingdoms, but I am promised to another. A 
king must keep his word.”
Queen Cersei got to her feet in a rustle of skirts. “Your Grace, in the 
judgment of your small council, it would be neither proper nor wise for you to 
wed the daughter of a man beheaded for treason, a girl whose brother is in open 
rebellion against the throne even now. Sire, your councillors beg you, for the 
good of your realm, set Sansa Stark aside. The Lady Margaery will make you a 
far more suitable queen.”
Like a pack of trained dogs, the lords and ladies in the hall began to shout 
their pleasure. “Margaery,” they called. “Give us Margaery!” and 
“No traitor queens! Tyrell! Tyrell!”
Joffrey raised a hand. “I would like to heed the wishes of my people, Mother, 
but I took a holy vow.”
The High Septon stepped forward. “Your Grace, the gods hold bethrothal solemn, 
but your father, King Robert of blessed memory, made this pact before the 
Starks of Winterfell had revealed their falseness. Their crimes against the 
realm have freed you from any promise you might have made. So far as the Faith 
is concerned, there is no valid marriage contract ’twixt you and Sansa 
Stark.”
A tumult of cheering filled the throne room, and cries of

“Margaery, Margaery” erupted all around her. Sansa leaned forward, 
her hands tight around the gallery’s wooden rail. She knew what came next, but 
she was still frightened of what Joffrey might say, afraid that he would refuse 
to release her even now, when his whole kingdom depended upon it. She felt as 
if she were back again on the marble steps outside the Great Sept of Baelor, 
waiting for her prince to grant her father mercy, and instead hearing him 
command Ilyn Payne to strike off his head. Please, she prayed 
fervently, make him say it, make him say it.
Lord Tywin was looking at his grandson. Joff gave him a sullen glance, shifted 
his feet, and helped Ser Garlan Tyrell to rise. “The gods are good. I am free 
to heed my heart. I will wed your sweet sister, and gladly, ser.” He kissed 
Ser Garlan on a bearded cheek as the cheers rose all around them.
Sansa felt curiously light-headed. I am free. She could feel eyes 
upon her. I must not smile, she reminded herself. The queen had 
warned her; no matter what she felt inside, the face she showed the world must 
look distraught. “I will not have my son humiliated,” Cersei said. “Do you 
hear me?”
“Yes. But if I’m not to be queen, what will become of me?”
“That will need to be determined. For the moment, you shall remain here at 
court, as our ward.”
“I want to go home.”
The queen was irritated by that. “You should have learned by now, none of us 
get the things we want.”
I have, though, Sansa thought. I am free of Joffrey. I will

not have to kiss him, nor give him my maidenhood, nor bear him children. Let 
Margaery Tyrell have all that, poor girl.
By the time the outburst died down, the Lord of Highgarden had been seated at 
the council table, and his sons had joined the other knights and lordlings 
beneath the windows. Sansa tried to look forlorn and abandoned as other heroes 
of the Battle of the Blackwater were summoned forth to receive their 
rewards.
Paxter Redwyne, Lord of the Arbor, marched down the length of the hall flanked 
by his twin sons Horror and Slobber, the former limping from a wound taken in 
the battle. After them followed Lord Mathis Rowan in a snowy doublet with a 
great tree worked upon the breast in gold thread; Lord Randyll Tarly, lean and 
balding, a greatsword across his back in a jeweled scabbard; Ser Kevan 
Lannister, a thickset balding man with a close-trimmed beard; Ser Addam 
Marbrand, coppery hair streaming to his shoulders; the great western lords 
Lydden, Crakehall, and Brax.
Next came four of lesser birth who had distinguished themselves in the 
fighting: the one-eyed knight Ser Philip Foote, who had slain Lord Bryce Caron 
in single combat; the freerider Lothor Brune, who’d cut his way through half a 
hundred Fossoway men-at-arms to capture Ser Jon of the green apple and kill Ser 
Bryan and Ser Edwyd of the red, thereby winning himself the name Lothor 
Apple-Eater; Willit, a grizzled man-at-arms in the service of Ser Harys Swyft, 
who’d pulled his master from beneath his dying horse and defended him against a 
dozen attackers; and a downy-cheeked squire named Josmyn Peckledon, who had 
killed two knights,

wounded a third, and captured two more, though he could not have been more than 
fourteen. Willit was borne in on a litter, so grievous were his 
wounds.
Ser Kevan had taken a seat beside his brother Lord Tywin. When the heralds had 
finished telling of each hero’s deeds, he rose. “It is His Grace’s wish that 
these good men be rewarded for their valor. By his decree, Ser Philip shall 
henceforth be Lord Philip of House Foote, and to him shall go all the lands, 
rights, and incomes of House Caron. Lothor Brune to be raised to the estate of 
knighthood, and granted land and keep in the riverlands at war’s end. To Josmyn 
Peckledon, a sword and suit of plate, his choice of any warhorse in the royal 
stables, and knighthood as soon as he shall come of age. And lastly, for 
Goodman Willit, a spear with a silver-banded haft, a hauberk of new-forged 
ringmail, and a full helm with visor. Further, the goodman’s sons shall be 
taken into the service of House Lannister at Casterly Rock, the elder as a 
squire and the younger as a page, with the chance to advance to knighthood if 
they serve loyally and well. To all this, the King’s Hand and the small council 
consent.”
The captains of the king’s warships Wildwind, Prince Aemon, and 
River Arrow were honored next, along with some under officers from 
Godsgrace, Lance, Lady of Silk, and Ramshead. As near as 
Sansa could tell, their chief accomplishment had been surviving the battle on 
the river, a feat that few enough could boast. Hallyne the Pyromancer and the 
masters of the Alchemists’ Guild received the king’s thanks as well, and 
Hallyne was raised to the

style of lord, though Sansa noted that neither lands nor castle accompanied the 
title, which made the alchemist no more a true lord than Varys was. A 
more significant lordship by far was granted to Ser Lancel Lannister. Joffrey 
awarded him the lands, castle, and rights of House Darry, whose last child lord 
had perished during the fighting in the riverlands, “leaving no trueborn heirs 
of lawful Darry blood, but only a bastard cousin.”
Ser Lancel did not appear to accept the title; the talk was, his wound might 
cost him his arm or even his life. The Imp was said to be dying as well, from a 
terrible cut to the head.
When the herald called, “Lord Petyr Baelish,” he came forth dressed 
all in shades of rose and plum, his cloak patterned with mockingbirds. She 
could see him smiling as he knelt before the Iron Throne. He looks so 
pleased. Sansa had not heard of Littlefinger doing anything especially 
heroic during the battle, but it seemed he was to be rewarded all the 
same.
Ser Kevan got back to his feet. “It is the wish of the King’s Grace that his 
loyal councillor Petyr Baelish be rewarded for faithful service to crown and 
realm. Be it known that Lord Baelish is granted the castle of Harrenhal with 
all its attendant lands and incomes, there to make his seat and rule henceforth 
as Lord Paramount of the Trident. Petyr Baelish and his sons and grandsons 
shall hold and enjoy these honors until the end of time, and all the lords of 
the Trident shall do him homage as their rightful liege. The King’s Hand and 
the small council consent.”
On his knees, Littlefinger raised his eyes to King Joffrey.

“I thank you humbly, Your Grace. I suppose this means I’ll need to see about 
getting some sons and grandsons.”
Joffrey laughed, and the court with him. Lord Paramount of the 
Trident, Sansa thought, and Lord of Harrenhal as well. She did 
not understand why that should make him so happy; the honors were as empty as 
the title granted to Hallyne the Pyromancer. Harrenhal was cursed, everyone 
knew that, and the Lannisters did not even hold it at present. Besides, the 
lords of the Trident were sworn to Riverrun and House Tully, and to the King in 
the North; they would never accept Littlefinger as their liege. Unless 
they are made to. Unless my brother and my uncle and my grandfather are all 
cast down and killed. The thought made Sansa anxious, but she told herself 
she was being silly. Robb has beaten them every time. He’ll beat Lord 
Baelish too, if he must.
More than six hundred new knights were made that day. They had held their vigil 
in the Great Sept of Baelor all through the night and crossed the city barefoot 
that morning to prove their humble hearts. Now they came forward dressed in 
shifts of undyed wool to receive their knighthoods from the Kingsguard. It took 
a long time, since only three of the Brothers of the White Sword were on hand 
to dub them. Mandon Moore had perished in the battle, the Hound had vanished, 
Aerys Oakheart was in Dorne with Princess Myrcella, and Jaime Lannister was 
Robb’s captive, so the Kingsguard had been reduced to Balon Swann, Meryn Trant, 
and Osmund Kettleblack. Once knighted, each man rose, buckled on his swordbelt, 
and stood beneath the windows. Some had bloody feet

from their walk through the city, but they stood tall and proud all the same, 
it seemed to Sansa.
By the time all the new knights had been given their sers the hall 
was growing restive, and none more so than Joffrey. Some of those in the 
gallery had begun to slip quietly away, but the notables on the floor were 
trapped, unable to depart without the king’s leave. Judging by the way he was 
fidgeting atop the Iron Throne, Joff would willingly have granted it, but the 
day’s work was far from done. For now the coin was turned over, and the 
captives were ushered in.
There were great lords and noble knights in that company too: sour old Lord 
Celtigar, the Red Crab; Ser Bonifer the Good; Lord Estermont, more ancient even 
than Celtigar; Lord Varner, who hobbled the length of the hall on a shattered 
knee, but would accept no help; Ser Mark Mullendore, grey-faced, his left arm 
gone to the elbow; fierce Red Ronnet of Griffin Roost; Ser Dermot of the 
Rainwood; Lord Willum and his sons Josua and Elyas; Ser Jon Fossoway; Ser Timon 
the Scrapesword; Aurane, the bastard of Driftmark; Lord Staedmon, called 
Pennylover; hundreds of others.
Those who had changed their allegiance during the battle needed only to swear 
fealty to Joffrey, but the ones who had fought for Stannis until the bitter end 
were compelled to speak. Their words decided their fate. If they begged 
forgiveness for their treasons and promised to serve loyally henceforth, 
Joffrey welcomed them back into the king’s peace and restored them to all their 
lands and rights. A handful remained defiant, however. “Do

not imagine this is done, boy,” warned one, the bastard son of some Florent or 
other. “The Lord of Light protects King Stannis, now and always. All your 
swords and all your scheming shall not save you when his hour 
comes.”
“Your hour is come right now.” Joffrey beckoned to Ser Ilyn Payne 
to take the man out and strike his head off. But no sooner had that one been 
dragged away than a knight of solemn mien with a fiery heart on his surcoat 
shouted out, “Stannis is the true king! A monster sits the Iron Throne, an 
abomination born of incest!”
“Be silent,” Ser Kevan Lannister bellowed.
The knight raised his voice instead. “Joffrey is the black worm eating the 
heart of the realm! Darkness was his father, and death his mother! Destroy him 
before he corrupts you all! Destroy them all, queen whore and king worm, vile 
dwarf and whispering spider, the false flowers. Save yourselves!” One of the 
gold cloaks knocked the man off his feet, but he continued to shout. “The 
scouring fire will come! King Stannis will return!”
Joffrey lurched to his feet. “I’m king! Kill him! Kill him now! I 
command it.” He chopped down with his hand, a furious, angry 
gesture . . . and screeched in pain when his arm brushed 
against one of the sharp metal fangs that surrounded him. The bright crimson 
samite of his sleeve turned a darker shade of red as his blood soaked through 
it. “Mother!” he wailed.
With every eye on the king, somehow the man on the floor wrested a spear away 
from one of the gold cloaks, and used it to push himself back to his feet. 
“The throne denies him!” he cried.

“He is no king!”
Cersei was running toward the throne, but Lord Tywin remained still as stone. 
He had only to raise a finger, and Ser Meryn Trant moved forward with drawn 
sword. The end was quick and brutal. The gold cloaks seized the knight by the 
arms. “No king!” he cried again as Ser Meryn drove the point of his 
longsword through his chest.
Joff fell into his mother’s arms. Three maesters came hurrying forward, to 
bundle him out through the king’s door. Then everyone began talking at once. 
When the gold cloaks dragged off the dead man, he left a trail of bright blood 
across the stone floor. Lord Baelish stroked his beard while Varys whispered in 
his ear. Will they dismiss us now? Sansa wondered. A score of 
captives still waited, though whether to pledge fealty or shout curses, who 
could say?
Lord Tywin rose to his feet. “We continue,” he said in a clear strong voice 
that silenced the murmurs. “Those who wish to ask pardon for their treasons 
may do so. We will have no more follies.” He moved to the Iron Throne and 
there seated himself on a step, a mere three feet off the floor.
The light outside the windows was fading by the time the session drew to a 
close. Sansa felt limp with exhaustion as she made her way down from the 
gallery. She wondered how badly Joffrey had cut himself. They say the Iron 
Throne can be perilous cruel to those who were not meant to sit 
it.
Back in the safety of her own chambers, she hugged a pillow

to her face to muffle a squeal of joy. Oh, gods be good, he did it, he put 
me aside in front of everyone. When a serving girl brought her supper, she 
almost kissed her. There was hot bread and fresh-churned butter, a thick beef 
soup, capon and carrots, and peaches in honey. Even the food tastes 
sweeter, she thought.
Come dark, she slipped into a cloak and left for the godswood. Ser Osmund 
Kettleblack was guarding the drawbridge in his white armor. Sansa tried her 
best to sound miserable as she bid him a good evening. From the way he leered 
at her, she was not sure she had been wholly convincing.
Dontos waited in the leafy moonlight. “Why so sadface?” Sansa asked him 
gaily. “You were there, you heard. Joff put me aside, he’s done with me, 
he’s . . .”
He took her hand. “Oh, Jonquil, my poor Jonquil, you do not understand. Done 
with you? They’ve scarcely begun.”
Her heart sank. “What do you mean?”
“The queen will never let you go, never. You are too valuable a hostage. And 
Joffrey . . . sweetling, he is still king. If he wants you in 
his bed, he will have you, only now it will be bastards he plants in your womb 
instead of trueborn sons.”
“No,” Sansa said, shocked. “He let me go, 
he . . .”
Ser Dontos planted a slobbery kiss on her ear. “Be brave. I swore to see you 
home, and now I can. The day has been chosen.”
“When?” Sansa asked. “When will we go?”
“The night of Joffrey’s wedding. After the feast. All the necessary 
arrangements have been made. The Red Keep will be full

of strangers. Half the court will be drunk and the other half will be helping 
Joffrey bed his bride. For a little while, you will be forgotten, and the 
confusion will be our friend.”
“The wedding won’t be for a moon’s turn yet. Margaery Tyrell is at Highgarden, 
they’ve only now sent for her.”
“You’ve waited so long, be patient awhile longer. Here, I have something for 
you.” Ser Dontos fumbled in his pouch and drew out a silvery spiderweb, 
dangling it between his thick fingers.
It was a hair net of fine-spun silver, the strands so thin and delicate the net 
seemed to weigh no more than a breath of air when Sansa took it in her fingers. 
Small gems were set wherever two strands crossed, so dark they drank the 
moonlight. “What stones are these?”
“Black amethysts from Asshai. The rarest kind, a deep true purple by 
daylight.”
“It’s very lovely,” Sansa said, thinking, It is a ship I need, not a net 
for my hair.
“Lovelier than you know, sweet child. It’s magic, you see. It’s justice you 
hold. It’s vengeance for your father.” Dontos leaned close and kissed her 
again. “It’s home.”

The invitation seemed innocent enough, but every time Sansa read it her tummy tightened into a knot. She’s to be queen now, she’s beautiful and rich and everyone loves her, why would she want to sup with a traitor’s daughter? It could be curiosity, she supposed; perhaps Margaery Tyrell wanted to get the measure of the rival she’d displaced. Does she resent me, I wonder? Does she think I bear her ill will . . . 
Sansa had watched from the castle walls as Margaery Tyrell and her escort made their way up Aegon’s High Hill. Joffrey had met his new bride-to-be at the King’s Gate to welcome her to the city, and they rode side by side through cheering crowds, Joff glittering in gilded armor and the Tyrell girl splendid in green with a cloak of autumn flowers blowing from her shoulders. She was sixteen, brown-haired and brown-eyed, slender and beautiful. The people called out her name as she passed, held up their children for her blessing, and scattered flowers under the hooves of her horse. Her mother and grandmother followed close behind, riding in a tall wheelhouse whose sides were carved into the shape of a hundred twining roses, every one gilded and shining. The smallfolk cheered them as well.
The same smallfolk who pulled me from my horse and would have killed me, if not for the Hound. Sansa had done nothing to make the commons hate her, no more than Margaery Tyrell had done to win their love. Does she want me to love her too? She studied the invitation, which looked to be written in Margaery’s own hand. Does she want my blessing? Sansa wondered if Joffrey knew of this supper. For all she knew, it might be his doing. That thought made her fearful. If Joff was behind the invitation, he would have some cruel jape planned to shame her in the older girl’s eyes. Would he command his Kingsguard to strip her naked once again? The last time he had done that his uncle Tyrion had stopped him, but the Imp could not save her now.
No one can save me but my Florian. Ser Dontos had promised he would help her escape, but not until the night of Joffrey’s wedding. The plans had been well laid, her dear devoted knight-turned-fool assured her; there was nothing to do until then but endure, and count the days.
And sup with my replacement . . . 
Perhaps she was doing Margaery Tyrell an injustice. Perhaps the invitation was no more than a simple kindness, an act of courtesy. It might be just a supper. But this was the Red Keep, this was King’s Landing, this was the court of King Joffrey Baratheon, the First of His Name, and if there was one thing that Sansa Stark had learned here, it was mistrust.
Even so, she must accept. She was nothing now, the discarded daughter of a traitor and disgraced sister of a rebel lord. She could scarcely refuse Joffrey’s queen-to-be.
I wish the Hound were here. The night of the battle, Sandor Clegane had come to her chambers to take her from the city, but Sansa had refused. Sometimes she lay awake at night, wondering if she’d been wise. She had his stained white cloak hidden in a cedar chest beneath her summer silks. She could not say why she’d kept it. The Hound had turned craven, she heard it said; at the height of the battle, he got so drunk the Imp had to take his men. But Sansa understood. She knew the secret of his burned face. It was only the fire he feared. That night, the wildfire had set the river itself ablaze, and filled the very air with green flame. Even in the castle, Sansa had been afraid. Outside . . . she could scarcely imagine it.
Sighing, she got out quill and ink, and wrote Margaery Tyrell a gracious note of acceptance.
When the appointed night arrived, another of the Kingsguard came for her, a man as different from Sandor Clegane as . . . well, as a flower from a dog. The sight of Ser Loras Tyrell standing on her threshold made Sansa’s heart beat a little faster. This was the first time she had been so close to him since he had returned to King’s Landing, leading the vanguard of his father’s host. For a moment she did not know what to say. “Ser Loras,” she finally managed, “you . . . you look so lovely.”
He gave her a puzzled smile. “My lady is too kind. And beautiful besides. My sister awaits you eagerly.”
“I have so looked forward to our supper.”
“As has Margaery, and my lady grandmother as well.” He took her arm and led her toward the steps.
“Your grandmother?” Sansa was finding it hard to walk and talk and think all at the same time, with Ser Loras touching her arm. She could feel the warmth of his hand through the silk.
“Lady Olenna. She is to sup with you as well.”
“Oh,” said Sansa. I am talking to him, and he’s touching me, he’s holding my arm and touching me. “The Queen of Thorns, she’s called. Isn’t that right?”
“It is.” Ser Loras laughed. He has the warmest laugh, she thought as he went on, “You’d best not use that name in her presence, though, or you’re like to get pricked.”
Sansa reddened. Any fool would have realized that no woman would be happy about being called “the Queen of Thorns.” Maybe I truly am as stupid as Cersei Lannister says. Desperately she tried to think of something clever and charming to say to him, but her wits had deserted her. She almost told him how beautiful he was, until she remembered that she’d already done that.
He was beautiful, though. He seemed taller than he’d been when she’d first met him, but still so lithe and graceful, and Sansa had never seen another boy with such wonderful eyes. He’s no boy, though, he’s a man grown, a knight of the Kingsguard. She thought he looked even finer in white than in the greens and golds of House Tyrell. The only spot of color on him now was the brooch that clasped his cloak; the rose of Highgarden wrought in soft yellow gold, nestled in a bed of delicate green jade leaves.
Ser Balon Swann held the door of Maegor’s for them to pass. He was all in white as well, though he did not wear it half so well as Ser Loras. Beyond the spiked moat, two dozen men were taking their practice with sword and shield. With the castle so crowded, the outer ward had been given over to guests to raise their tents and pavilions, leaving only the smaller inner yards for training. One of the Redwyne twins was being driven backward by Ser Tallad, with the eyes on his shield. Chunky Ser Kennos of Kayce, who chuffed and puffed every time he raised his longsword, seemed to be holding his own against Osney Kettleblack, but Osney’s brother Ser Osfryd was savagely punishing the frog-faced squire Morros Slynt. Blunted swords or no, Slynt would have a rich crop of bruises by the morrow. It made Sansa wince just to watch. They have scarcely finished burying the dead from the last battle, and already they are practicing for the next one.
On the edge of the yard, a lone knight with a pair of golden roses on his shield was holding off three foes. Even as they watched, he caught one of them alongside the head, knocking him senseless. “Is that your brother?” Sansa asked.
“It is, my lady,” said Ser Loras. “Garlan often trains against three men, or even four. In battle it is seldom one against one, he says, so he likes to be prepared.”
“He must be very brave.”
“He is a great knight,” Ser Loras replied. “A better sword than me, in truth, though I’m the better lance.”
“I remember,” said Sansa. “You ride wonderfully, ser.”
“My lady is gracious to say so. When has she seen me ride?”
“At the Hand’s tourney, don’t you remember? You rode a white courser, and your armor was a hundred different kinds of flowers. You gave me a rose. A red rose. You threw white roses to the other girls that day.” It made her flush to speak of it. “You said no victory was half as beautiful as me.”
Ser Loras gave her a modest smile. “I spoke only a simple truth, that any man with eyes could see.”
He doesn’t remember, Sansa realized, startled. He is only being kind to me, he doesn’t remember me or the rose or any of it. She had been so certain that it meant something, that it meant everything. A red rose, not a white. “It was after you unhorsed Ser Robar Royce,” she said, desperately.
He took his hand from her arm. “I slew Robar at Storm’s End, my lady.” It was not a boast; he sounded sad.
Him, and another of King Renly’s Rainbow Guard as well, yes. Sansa had heard the women talking of it round the well, but for a moment she’d forgotten. “That was when Lord Renly was killed, wasn’t it? How terrible for your poor sister.”
“For Margaery?” His voice was tight. “To be sure. She was at Bitterbridge, though. She did not see.”
“Even so, when she heard . . .”
Ser Loras brushed the hilt of his sword lightly with his hand. Its grip was white leather, its pommel a rose in alabaster. “Renly is dead. Robar as well. What use to speak of them?”
The sharpness in his tone took her aback. “I . . . my lord, I . . . I did not mean to give offense, ser.”
“Nor could you, Lady Sansa,” Ser Loras replied, but all the warmth had gone from his voice. Nor did he take her arm again.
They ascended the serpentine steps in a deepening silence.
Oh, why did I have to mention Ser Robar? Sansa thought. I’ve ruined everything. He is angry with me now. She tried to think of something she might say to make amends, but all the words that came to her were lame and weak. Be quiet, or you will only make it worse, she told herself.
Lord Mace Tyrell and his entourage had been housed behind the royal sept, in the long slate-roofed keep that had been called the Maidenvault since King Baelor the Blessed had confined his sisters therein, so the sight of them might not tempt him into carnal thoughts. Outside its tall carved doors stood two guards in gilded halfhelms and green cloaks edged in gold satin, the golden rose of Highgarden sewn on their breasts. Both were seven-footers, wide of shoulder and narrow of waist, magnificently muscled. When Sansa got close enough to see their faces, she could not tell one from the other. They had the same strong jaws, the same deep blue eyes, the same thick red mustaches. “Who are they?” she asked Ser Loras, her discomfit forgotten for a moment.
“My grandmother’s personal guard,” he told her. “Their mother named them Erryk and Arryk, but Grandmother can’t tell them apart, so she calls them Left and Right.”
Left and Right opened the doors, and Margaery Tyrell herself emerged and swept down the short flight of steps to greet them. “Lady Sansa,” she called, “I’m so pleased you came. Be welcome.”
Sansa knelt at the feet of her future queen. “You do me great honor, Your Grace.”
“Won’t you call me Margaery? Please, rise. Loras, help the Lady Sansa to her feet. Might I call you Sansa?”
“If it please you.” Ser Loras helped her up.
Margaery dismissed him with a sisterly kiss, and took Sansa by the hand. “Come, my grandmother awaits, and she is not the most patient of ladies.”
A fire was crackling in the hearth, and sweet-swelling rushes had been scattered on the floor. Around the long trestle table a dozen women were seated.
Sansa recognized only Lord Tyrell’s tall, dignified wife, Lady Alerie, whose long silvery braid was bound with jeweled rings. Margaery performed the other introductions. There were three Tyrell cousins, Megga and Alla and Elinor, all close to Sansa’s age. Buxom Lady Janna was Lord Tyrell’s sister, and wed to one of the green-apple Fossoways; dainty, bright-eyed Lady Leonette was a Fossoway as well, and wed to Ser Garlan. Septa Nysterica had a homely pox-scarred face but seemed jolly. Pale, elegant Lady Graceford was with child, and Lady Bulwer was a child, no more than eight. And “Merry” was what she was to call boisterous plump Meredyth Crane, but most definitely not Lady Merryweather, a sultry black-eyed Myrish beauty.
Last of all, Margaery brought her before the wizened white-haired doll of a woman at the head of the table. “I am honored to present my grandmother the Lady Olenna, widow to the late Luthor Tyrell, Lord of Highgarden, whose memory is a comfort to us all.”
The old woman smelled of rosewater. Why, she’s just the littlest bit of a thing. There was nothing the least bit thorny about her. “Kiss me, child,” Lady Olenna said, tugging at Sansa’s wrist with a soft spotted hand. “It is so kind of you to sup with me and my foolish flock of hens.”
Dutifully, Sansa kissed the old woman on the cheek. “It is kind of you to have me, my lady.”
“I knew your grandfather, Lord Rickard, though not well.”
“He died before I was born.”
“I am aware of that, child. It’s said that your Tully grandfather is dying too. Lord Hoster, surely they told you? An old man, though not so old as me. Still, night falls for all of us in the end, and too soon for some. You would know that more than most, poor child. You’ve had your share of grief, I know. We are sorry for your losses.”
Sansa glanced at Margaery. “I was saddened when I heard of Lord Renly’s death, Your Grace. He was very gallant.”
“You are kind to say so,” answered Margaery.
Her grandmother snorted. “Gallant, yes, and charming, and very clean. He knew how to dress and he knew how to smile and he knew how to bathe, and somehow he got the notion that this made him fit to be king. The Baratheons have always had some queer notions, to be sure. It comes from their Targaryen blood, I should think.” She sniffed. “They tried to marry me to a Targaryen once, but I soon put an end to that.”
“Renly was brave and gentle, Grandmother,” said Margaery. “Father liked him as well, and so did Loras.”
“Loras is young,” Lady Olenna said crisply, “and very good at knocking men off horses with a stick. That does not make him wise. As to your father, would that I’d been born a peasant woman with a big wooden spoon, I might have been able to beat some sense into his fat head.”
“Mother,” Lady Alerie scolded.
“Hush, Alerie, don’t take that tone with me. And don’t call me Mother. If I’d given birth to you, I’m sure I’d remember. I’m only to blame for your husband, the lord oaf of Highgarden.”
“Grandmother,” Margaery said, “mind your words, or what will Sansa think of us?”
“She might think we have some wits about us. One of us, at any rate.” The old woman turned back to Sansa. “It’s treason, I warned them, Robert has two sons, and Renly has an older brother, how can he possibly have any claim to that ugly iron chair? Tut-tut, says my son, don’t you want your sweetling to be queen? You Starks were kings once, the Arryns and the Lannisters as well, and even the Baratheons through the female line, but the Tyrells were no more than stewards until Aegon the Dragon came along and cooked the rightful King of the Reach on the Field of Fire. If truth be told, even our claim to Highgarden is a bit dodgy, just as those dreadful Florents are always whining. ‘What does it matter?’ you ask, and of course it doesn’t, except to oafs like my son. The thought that one day he may see his grandson with his arse on the Iron Throne makes Mace puff up like . . . now, what do you call it? Margaery, you’re clever, be a dear and tell your poor old half-daft grandmother the name of that queer fish from the Summer Isles that puffs up to ten times its own size when you poke it.”
“They call them puff fish, Grandmother.”
“Of course they do. Summer Islanders have no imagination. My son ought to take the puff fish for his sigil, if truth be told. He could put a crown on it, the way the Baratheons do their stag, mayhap that would make him happy. We should have stayed well out of all this bloody foolishness if you ask me, but once the cow’s been milked there’s no squirting the cream back up her udder. After Lord Puff Fish put that crown on Renly’s head, we were into the pudding up to our knees, so here we are to see things through. And what do you say to that, Sansa?”
Sansa’s mouth opened and closed. She felt very like a puff fish herself. “The Tyrells can trace their descent back to Garth Greenhand,” was the best she could manage at short notice.
The Queen of Thorns snorted. “So can the Florents, the Rowans, the Oakhearts, and half the other noble houses of the south. Garth liked to plant his seed in fertile ground, they say. I shouldn’t wonder that more than his hands were green.”
“Sansa,” Lady Alerie broke in, “you must be very hungry. Shall we have a bite of boar together, and some lemon cakes?”
“Lemon cakes are my favorite,” Sansa admitted.
“So we have been told,” declared Lady Olenna, who obviously had no intention of being hushed. “That Varys creature seemed to think we should be grateful for the information. I’ve never been quite sure what the point of a eunuch is, if truth be told. It seems to me they’re only men with the useful bits cut off. Alerie, will you have them bring the food, or do you mean to starve me to death? Here, Sansa, sit here next to me, I’m much less boring than these others. I hope that you’re fond of fools.”
Sansa smoothed down her skirts and sat. “I think . . . fools, my lady? You mean . . . the sort in motley?”
“Feathers, in this case. What did you imagine I was speaking of? My son? Or these lovely ladies? No, don’t blush, with your hair it makes you look like a pomegranate. All men are fools, if truth be told, but the ones in motley are more amusing than ones with crowns. Margaery, child, summon Butterbumps, let us see if we can’t make Lady Sansa smile. The rest of you be seated, do I have to tell you everything? Sansa must think that my granddaughter is attended by a flock of sheep.”
Butterbumps arrived before the food, dressed in a jester’s suit of green and yellow feathers with a floppy coxcomb. An immense round fat man, as big as three Moon Boys, he came cartwheeling into the hall, vaulted onto the table, and laid a gigantic egg right in front of Sansa. “Break it, my lady,” he commanded. When she did, a dozen yellow chicks escaped and began running in all directions. “Catch them!” Butterbumps exclaimed. Little Lady Bulwer snagged one and handed it to him, whereby he tilted back his head, popped it into his huge rubbery mouth, and seemed to swallow it whole. When he belched, tiny yellow feathers flew out his nose. Lady Bulwer began to wail in distress, but her tears turned into a sudden squeal of delight when the chick came squirming out of the sleeve of her gown and ran down her arm.
As the servants brought out a broth of leeks and mushrooms, Butterbumps began to juggle and Lady Olenna pushed herself forward to rest her elbows on the table. “Do you know my son, Sansa? Lord Puff Fish of Highgarden?”
“A great lord,” Sansa answered politely.
“A great oaf,” said the Queen of Thorns. “His father was an oaf as well. My husband, the late Lord Luthor. Oh, I loved him well enough, don’t mistake me. A kind man, and not unskilled in the bedchamber, but an appalling oaf all the same. He managed to ride off a cliff whilst hawking. They say he was looking up at the sky and paying no mind to where his horse was taking him.
“And now my oaf son is doing the same, only he’s riding a lion instead of a palfrey. It is easy to mount a lion and not so easy to get off, I warned him, but he only chuckles. Should you ever have a son, Sansa, beat him frequently so he learns to mind you. I only had the one boy and I hardly beat him at all, so now he pays more heed to Butterbumps than he does to me. A lion is not a lap cat, I told him, and he gives me a ‘tut-tut-Mother.’ There is entirely too much tut-tutting in this realm, if you ask me. All these kings would do a deal better if they would put down their swords and listen to their mothers.”
Sansa realized that her mouth was open again. She filled it with a spoon of broth while Lady Alerie and the other women were giggling at the spectacle of Butterbumps bouncing oranges off his head, his elbows, and his ample rump.
“I want you to tell me the truth about this royal boy,” said Lady Olenna abruptly. “This Joffrey.”
Sansa’s fingers tightened round her spoon. The truth? I can’t. Don’t ask it, please, I can’t. “I . . . I . . . I . . .”
“You, yes. Who would know better? The lad seems kingly enough, I’ll grant you. A bit full of himself, but that would be his Lannister blood. We have heard some troubling tales, however. Is there any truth to them? Has this boy mistreated you?”
Sansa glanced about nervously. Butterbumps popped a whole orange into his mouth, chewed and swallowed, slapped his cheek, and blew seeds out of his nose. The women giggled and laughed. Servants were coming and going, and the Maidenvault echoed to the clatter of spoons and plates. One of the chicks hopped back onto the table and ran through Lady Graceford’s broth. No one seemed to be paying them any mind, but even so, she was frightened.
Lady Olenna was growing impatient. “Why are you gaping at Butterbumps? I asked a question, I expect an answer. Have the Lannisters stolen your tongue, child?”
Ser Dontos had warned her to speak freely only in the godswood. “Joff . . . King Joffrey, he’s . . . His Grace is very fair and handsome, and . . . and as brave as a lion.”
“Yes, all the Lannisters are lions, and when a Tyrell breaks wind it smells just like a rose,” the old woman snapped. “But how kind is he? How clever? Has he a good heart, a gentle hand? Is he chivalrous as befits a king? Will he cherish Margaery and treat her tenderly, protect her honor as he would his own?”
“He will,” Sansa lied. “He is very . . . very comely.”
“You said that. You know, child, some say that you are as big a fool as Butterbumps here, and I am starting to believe them. Comely? I have taught my Margaery what comely is worth, I hope. Somewhat less than a mummer’s fart. Aerion Brightfire was comely enough, but a monster all the same. The question is, what is Joffrey?” She reached to snag a passing servant. “I am not fond of leeks. Take this broth away, and bring me some cheese.”
“The cheese will be served after the cakes, my lady.”
“The cheese will be served when I want it served, and I want it served now.” The old woman turned back to Sansa. “Are you frightened, child? No need for that, we’re only women here. Tell me the truth, no harm will come to you.”
“My father always told the truth.” Sansa spoke quietly, but even so, it was hard to get the words out.
“Lord Eddard, yes, he had that reputation, but they named him traitor and took his head off even so.” The old woman’s eyes bore into her, sharp and bright as the points of swords.
“Joffrey,” Sansa said. “Joffrey did that. He promised me he would be merciful, and cut my father’s head off. He said that was mercy, and he took me up on the walls and made me look at it. The head. He wanted me to weep, but . . .” She stopped abruptly, and covered her mouth. I’ve said too much, oh gods be good, they’ll know, they’ll hear, someone will tell on me.
“Go on.” It was Margaery who urged. Joffrey’s own queen-to-be. Sansa did not know how much she had heard.
“I can’t.” What if she tells him, what if she tells? He’ll kill me for certain then, or give me to Ser Ilyn. “I never meant . . . my father was a traitor, my brother as well, I have the traitor’s blood, please, don’t make me say more.”
“Calm yourself, child,” the Queen of Thorns commanded.
“She’s terrified, Grandmother, just look at her.”
The old woman called to Butterbumps. “Fool! Give us a song. A long one, I should think. ‘The Bear and the Maiden Fair’ will do nicely.”
“It will!” the huge jester replied. “It will do nicely indeed! Shall I sing it standing on my head, my lady?”
“Will that make it sound better?”
“No.”
“Stand on your feet, then. We wouldn’t want your hat to fall off. As I recall, you never wash your hair.”
“As my lady commands.” Butterbumps bowed low, let loose of an enormous belch, then straightened, threw out his belly, and bellowed. “A bear there was, a bear, a BEAR! All black and brown, and covered with hair . . .”
Lady Olenna squirmed forward. “Even when I was a girl younger than you, it was well known that in the Red Keep the very walls have ears. Well, they will be the better for a song, and meanwhile we girls shall speak freely.”
“But,” Sansa said, “Varys . . . he knows, he always . . .”
“Sing louder!” the Queen of Thorns shouted at Butterbumps. “These old ears are almost deaf, you know. Are you whispering at me, you fat fool? I don’t pay you for whispers. Sing!”
“. . . THE BEAR!” thundered Butterbumps, his great deep voice echoing off the rafters. “OH, COME, THEY SAID, OH COME TO THE FAIR! THE FAIR? SAID HE, BUT I’M A BEAR! ALL BLACK AND BROWN, AND COVERED WITH HAIR!”
The wrinkled old lady smiled. “At Highgarden we have many spiders amongst the flowers. So long as they keep to themselves we let them spin their little webs, but if they get underfoot we step on them.” She patted Sansa on the back of the hand. “Now, child, the truth. What sort of man is this Joffrey, who calls himself Baratheon but looks so very Lannister?”
“AND DOWN THE ROAD FROM HERE TO THERE. FROM HERE! TO THERE! THREE BOYS, A GOAT, AND A DANCING BEAR!”
Sansa felt as though her heart had lodged in her throat. The Queen of Thorns was so close she could smell the old woman’s sour breath. Her gaunt thin fingers were pinching her wrist. To her other side, Margaery was listening as well. A shiver went through her. “A monster,” she whispered, so tremulously she could scarcely hear her own voice. “Joffrey is a monster. He lied about the butcher’s boy and made Father kill my wolf. When I displease him, he has the Kingsguard beat me. He’s evil and cruel, my lady, it’s so. And the queen as well.”
Lady Olenna Tyrell and her granddaughter exchanged a look. “Ah,” said the old woman, “that’s a pity.”
Oh, gods, thought Sansa, horrified. If Margaery won’t marry him, Joff will know that I’m to blame. “Please,” she blurted, “don’t stop the wedding . . .”
“Have no fear, Lord Puff Fish is determined that Margaery shall be queen. And the word of a Tyrell is worth more than all the gold in Casterly Rock. At least it was in my day. Even so, we thank you for the truth, child.”
“. . . DANCED AND SPUN, ALL THE WAY TO THE FAIR! THE FAIR! THE FAIR!” Butterbumps hopped and roared and stomped his feet.
“Sansa, would you like to visit Highgarden?” When Margaery Tyrell smiled, she looked very like her brother Loras. “All the autumn flowers are in bloom just now, and there are groves and fountains, shady courtyards, marble colonnades. My lord father always keeps singers at court, sweeter ones than Butters here, and pipers and fiddlers and harpers as well. We have the best horses, and pleasure boats to sail along the Mander. Do you hawk, Sansa?”
“A little,” she admitted.
“OH, SWEET SHE WAS, AND PURE, AND FAIR! THE MAID WITH HONEY IN HER HAIR!”
“You will love Highgarden as I do, I know it.” Margaery brushed back a loose strand of Sansa’s hair. “Once you see it, you’ll never want to leave. And perhaps you won’t have to.”
“HER HAIR! HER HAIR! THE MAID WITH HONEY IN HER HAIR!”
“Shush, child,” the Queen of Thorns said sharply. “Sansa hasn’t even told us that she would like to come for a visit.”
“Oh, but I would,” Sansa said. Highgarden sounded like the place she had always dreamed of, like the beautiful magical court she had once hoped to find at King’s Landing.
“. . . SMELLED THE SCENT ON THE SUMMER AIR. THE BEAR! THE BEAR! ALL BLACK AND BROWN AND COVERED WITH HAIR.”
“But the queen,” Sansa went on, “she won’t let me go . . .”
“She will. Without Highgarden, the Lannisters have no hope of keeping Joffrey on his throne. If my son the lord oaf asks, she will have no choice but to grant his request.”
“Will he?” asked Sansa. “Will he ask?”
Lady Olenna frowned. “I see no need to give him a choice. Of course, he has no hint of our true purpose.”
“HE SMELLED THE SCENT ON THE SUMMER AIR!”
Sansa wrinkled her brow. “Our true purpose, my lady?”
“HE SNIFFED AND ROARED AND SMELLED IT THERE! HONEY ON THE SUMMER AIR!”
“To see you safely wed, child,” the old woman said, as Butterbumps bellowed out the old, old song, “to my grandson.”
Wed to Ser Loras, oh . . . Sansa’s breath caught in her throat. She remembered Ser Loras in his sparkling sapphire armor, tossing her a rose. Ser Loras in white silk, so pure, innocent, beautiful. The dimples at the corner of his mouth when he smiled. The sweetness of his laugh, the warmth of his hand. She could only imagine what it would be like to pull up his tunic and caress the smooth skin underneath, to stand on her toes and kiss him, to run her fingers through those thick brown curls and drown in his deep brown eyes. A flush crept up her neck.
“OH, I’M A MAID, AND I’M PURE AND FAIR! I’LL NEVER DANCE WITH A HAIRY BEAR! A BEAR! A BEAR! I’LL NEVER DANCE WITH A HAIRY BEAR!”
“Would you like that, Sansa?” asked Margaery. “I’ve never had a sister, only brothers. Oh, please say yes, please say that you will consent to marry my brother.”
The words came tumbling out of her. “Yes. I will. I would like that more than anything. To wed Ser Loras, to love him . . .”
“Loras?” Lady Olenna sounded annoyed. “Don’t be foolish, child. Kingsguard never wed. Didn’t they teach you anything in Winterfell? We were speaking of my grandson Willas. He is a bit old for you, to be sure, but a dear boy for all that. Not the least bit oafish, and heir to Highgarden besides.”
Sansa felt dizzy; one instant her head was full of dreams of Loras, and the next they had all been snatched away. Willas? Willas? “I,” she said stupidly. Courtesy is a lady’s armor. You must not offend them, be careful what you say. “I do not know Ser Willas. I have never had the pleasure, my lady. Is he . . . is he as great a knight as his brothers?”
“. . . LIFTED HER HIGH INTO THE AIR! THE BEAR! THE BEAR!”
“No,” Margaery said. “He has never taken vows.”
Her grandmother frowned. “Tell the girl the truth. The poor lad is crippled, and that’s the way of it.”
“He was hurt as a squire, riding in his first tourney,” Margaery confided. “His horse fell and crushed his leg.”
“That snake of a Dornishman was to blame, that Oberyn Martell. And his maester as well.”
“I CALLED FOR A KNIGHT, BUT YOU’RE A BEAR! A BEAR! A BEAR! ALL BLACK AND BROWN AND COVERED WITH HAIR!”
“Willas has a bad leg but a good heart,” said Margaery. “He used to read to me when I was a little girl, and draw me pictures of the stars. You will love him as much as we do, Sansa.”
“SHE KICKED AND WAILED, THE MAID SO FAIR, BUT HE LICKED THE HONEY FROM HER HAIR. HER HAIR! HER HAIR! HE LICKED THE HONEY FROM HER HAIR!”
“When might I meet him?” asked Sansa, hesitantly.
“Soon,” promised Margaery. “When you come to Highgarden, after Joffrey and I are wed. My grandmother will take you.”
“I will,” said the old woman, patting Sansa’s hand and smiling a soft wrinkly smile. “I will indeed.”
“THEN SHE SIGHED AND SQUEALED AND KICKED THE AIR! MY BEAR! SHE SANG. MY BEAR SO FAIR! AND OFF THEY WENT, FROM HERE TO THERE, THE BEAR, THE BEAR, AND THE MAIDEN FAIR.” Butterbumps roared the last line, leapt into the air, and came down on both feet with a crash that shook the wine cups on the table. The women laughed and clapped.
“I thought that dreadful song would never end,” said the Queen of Thorns. “But look, here comes my cheese.”

A new gown?” she said, as wary as she was astonished.
“More lovely than any you have worn, my lady,” the old woman promised. She measured Sansa’s hips with a length of knotted string. “All silk and Myrish lace, with satin linings. You will be very beautiful. The queen herself has commanded it.”
“Which queen?” Margaery was not yet Joff’s queen, but she had been Renly’s. Or did she mean the Queen of Thorns? Or . . . 
“The Queen Regent, to be sure.”
“Queen Cersei?”
“None other. She has honored me with her custom for many a year.” The old woman laid her string along the inside of Sansa’s leg. “Her Grace said to me that you are a woman now, and should not dress like a little girl. Hold out your arm.”
Sansa lifted her arm. She needed a new gown, that was true. She had grown three inches in the past year, and most of her old wardrobe had been ruined by the smoke when she’d tried to burn her mattress on the day of her first flowering
“Your bosom will be as lovely as the queen’s,” the old woman said as she looped her string around Sansa’s chest. “You should not hide it so.”
The comment made her blush. Yet the last time she’d gone riding, she could not lace her jerkin all the way to the top, and the stableboy gaped at her as he helped her mount. Sometimes she caught grown men looking at her chest as well, and some of her tunics were so tight she could scarce breathe in them.
“What color will it be?” she asked the seamstress.
“Leave the colors to me, my lady. You will be pleased, I know you will. You shall have smallclothes and hose as well, kirtles and mantles and cloaks, and all else befitting a . . . a lovely young lady of noble birth.”
“Will they be ready in time for the king’s wedding?”
“Oh, sooner, much sooner, Her Grace insists. I have six seamstresses and twelve apprentice girls, and we have set all our other work aside for this. Many ladies will be cross with us, but it was the queen’s command.”
“Thank Her Grace kindly for her thoughtfulness,” Sansa said politely. “She is too good to me.”
“Her Grace is most generous,” the seamstress agreed, as she gathered up her things and took her leave.
But why? Sansa wondered when she was alone. It made her uneasy. I’ll wager this gown is Margaery’s doing somehow, or her grandmother’s.
Margaery’s kindness had been unfailing, and her presence changed everything. Her ladies welcomed Sansa as well. It had been so long since she had enjoyed the company of other women, she had almost forgotten how pleasant it could be. Lady Leonette gave her lessons on the high harp, and Lady Janna shared all the choice gossip. Merry Crane always had an amusing story, and little Lady Bulwer reminded her of Arya, though not so fierce.
Closest to Sansa’s own age were the cousins Elinor, Alla, and Megga, Tyrells from junior branches of the House. “Roses from lower on the bush,” quipped Elinor, who was witty and willowy. Megga was round and loud, Alla shy and pretty, but Elinor ruled the three by right of womanhood; she was a maiden flowered, whereas Megga and Alla were mere girls.
The cousins took Sansa into their company as if they had known her all their lives. They spent long afternoons doing needlework and talking over lemon cakes and honeyed wine, played at tiles of an evening, sang together in the castle sept . . . and often one or two of them would be chosen to share Margaery’s bed, where they would whisper half the night away. Alla had a lovely voice, and when coaxed would play the woodharp and sing songs of chivalry and lost loves. Megga couldn’t sing, but she was mad to be kissed. She and Alla played a kissing game sometimes, she confessed, but it wasn’t the same as kissing a man, much less a king. Sansa wondered what Megga would think about kissing the Hound, as she had. He’d come to her the night of the battle stinking of wine and blood. He kissed me and threatened to kill me, and made me sing him a song.
“King Joffrey has such beautiful lips,” Megga gushed, oblivious, “oh, poor Sansa, how your heart must have broken when you lost him. Oh, how you must have wept!”
Joffrey made me weep more often than you know, she wanted to say, but Butterbumps was not on hand to drown out her voice, so she pressed her lips together and held her tongue.
As for Elinor, she was promised to a young squire, a son of Lord Ambrose; they would be wed as soon as he won his spurs. He had worn her favor in the Battle of the Blackwater, where he’d slain a Myrish crossbowman and a Mullendore man-at-arms. “Alyn said her favor made him fearless,” said Megga. “He says he shouted her name for his battle cry, isn’t that ever so gallant? Someday I want some champion to wear my favor, and kill a hundred men.” Elinor told her to hush, but looked pleased all the same.
They are children, Sansa thought. They are silly little girls, even Elinor. They’ve never seen a battle, they’ve never seen a man die, they know nothing. Their dreams were full of songs and stories, the way hers had been before Joffrey cut her father’s head off. Sansa pitied them. Sansa envied them.
Margaery was different, though. Sweet and gentle, yet there was a little of her grandmother in her, too. The day before last she’d taken Sansa hawking. It was the first time she had been outside the city since the battle. The dead had been burned or buried, but the Mud Gate was scarred and splintered where Lord Stannis’s rams had battered it, and the hulls of smashed ships could be seen along both sides of the Blackwater, charred masts poking from the shallows like gaunt black fingers. The only traffic was the flat-bottomed ferry that took them across the river, and when they reached the kingswood they found a wilderness of ash and charcoal and dead trees. But the waterfowl teemed in the marshes along the bay, and Sansa’s merlin brought down three ducks while Margaery’s peregrine took a heron in full flight.
“Willas has the best birds in the Seven Kingdoms,” Margaery said when the two of them were briefly alone. “He flies an eagle sometimes. You will see, Sansa.” She took her by the hand and gave it a squeeze. “Sister.”
Sister. Sansa had once dreamt of having a sister like Margaery; beautiful and gentle, with all the world’s graces at her command. Arya had been entirely unsatisfactory as sisters went. How can I let my sister marry Joffrey? she thought, and suddenly her eyes were full of tears. “Margaery, please,” she said, “you mustn’t.” It was hard to get the words out. “You mustn’t marry him. He’s not like he seems, he’s not. He’ll hurt you.”
“I shouldn’t think so.” Margaery smiled confidently. “It’s brave of you to warn me, but you need not fear. Joff’s spoiled and vain and I don’t doubt that he’s as cruel as you say, but Father forced him to name Loras to his Kingsguard before he would agree to the match. I shall have the finest knight in the Seven Kingdoms protecting me night and day, as Prince Aemon protected Naerys. So our little lion had best behave, hadn’t he?” She laughed, and said, “Come, sweet sister, let’s race back to the river. It will drive our guards quite mad.” And without waiting for an answer, she put her heels into her horse and flew.
She is so brave, Sansa thought, galloping after her . . . and yet, her doubts still gnawed at her. Ser Loras was a great knight, all agreed. But Joffrey had other Kingsguard, and gold cloaks and red cloaks besides, and when he was older he would command armies of his own. Aegon the Unworthy had never harmed Queen Naerys, perhaps for fear of their brother the Dragonknight . . . but when another of his Kingsguard fell in love with one of his mistresses, the king had taken both their heads.
Ser Loras is a Tyrell, Sansa reminded herself. That other knight was only a Toyne. His brothers had no armies, no way to avenge him but with swords. Yet the more she thought about it all, the more she wondered. Joff might restrain himself for a few turns, perhaps as long as a year, but soon or late he will show his claws, and when he does . . . The realm might have a second Kingslayer, and there would be war inside the city, as the men of the lion and the men of the rose made the gutters run red.
Sansa was surprised that Margaery did not see it too. She is older than me, she must be wiser. And her father, Lord Tyrell, he knows what he is doing, surely. I am just being silly.
When she told Ser Dontos that she was going to Highgarden to marry Willas Tyrell, she thought he would be relieved and pleased for her. Instead he had grabbed her arm and said, “You cannot!” in a voice as thick with horror as with wine. “I tell you, these Tyrells are only Lannisters with flowers. I beg of you, forget this folly, give your Florian a kiss, and promise you’ll go ahead as we have planned. The night of Joffrey’s wedding, that’s not so long, wear the silver hair net and do as I told you, and afterward we make our escape.” He tried to plant a kiss on her cheek.
Sansa slipped from his grasp and stepped away from him. “I won’t. I can’t. Something would go wrong. When I wanted to escape you wouldn’t take me, and now I don’t need to.”
Dontos stared at her stupidly. “But the arrangements are made, sweetling. The ship to take you home, the boat to take you to the ship, your Florian did it all for his sweet Jonquil.”
“I am sorry for all the trouble I put you to,” she said, “but I have no need of boats and ships now.”
“But it’s all to see you safe.”
“I will be safe in Highgarden. Willas will keep me safe.”
“But he does not know you,” Dontos insisted, “and he will not love you. Jonquil, Jonquil, open your sweet eyes, these Tyrells care nothing for you. It’s your claim they mean to wed.”
“My claim?” She was lost for a moment.
“Sweetling,” he told her, “you are heir to Winterfell.” He grabbed her again, pleading that she must not do this thing, and Sansa wrenched free and left him swaying beneath the heart tree. She had not visited the godswood since.
But she had not forgotten his words, either. The heir to Winterfell, she would think as she lay abed at night. It’s your claim they mean to wed. Sansa had grown up with three brothers. She never thought to have a claim, but with Bran and Rickon dead . . . It doesn’t matter, there’s still Robb, he’s a man grown now, and soon he’ll wed and have a son. Anyway, Willas Tyrell will have Highgarden, what would he want with Winterfell?
Sometimes she would whisper his name into her pillow just to hear the sound of it. “Willas, Willas, Willas.” Willas was as good a name as Loras, she supposed. They even sounded the same, a little. What did it matter about his leg? Willas would be Lord of Highgarden and she would be his lady.
She pictured the two of them sitting together in a garden with puppies in their laps, or listening to a singer strum upon a lute while they floated down the Mander on a pleasure barge. If I give him sons, he may come to love me. She would name them Eddard and Brandon and Rickon, and raise them all to be as valiant as Ser Loras. And to hate Lannisters, too. In Sansa’s dreams, her children looked just like the brothers she had lost. Sometimes there was even a girl who looked like Arya.
She could never hold a picture of Willas long in her head, though; her imaginings kept turning him back into Ser Loras, young and graceful and beautiful. You must not think of him like that, she told herself. Or else he may see the disappointment in your eyes when you meet, and how could he marry you then, knowing it was his brother you loved? Willas Tyrell was twice her age, she reminded herself constantly, and lame as well, and perhaps even plump and red-faced like his father. But comely or no, he might be the only champion she would ever have.
Once she dreamed it was still her marrying Joff, not Margaery, and on their wedding night he turned into the headsman Ilyn Payne. She woke trembling. She did not want Margaery to suffer as she had, but she dreaded the thought that the Tyrells might refuse to go ahead with the wedding. I warned her, I did, I told her the truth of him. Perhaps Margaery did not believe her. Joff always played the perfect knight with her, as once he had with Sansa. She will see his true nature soon enough. After the wedding if not before. Sansa decided that she would light a candle to the Mother Above the next time she visited the sept, and ask her to protect Margaery from Joffrey’s cruelty. And perhaps a candle to the Warrior as well, for Loras.
She would wear her new gown for the ceremony at the Great Sept of Baelor, she decided as the seamstress took her last measurement. That must be why Cersei is having it made for me, so I will not look shabby at the wedding. She really ought to have a different gown for the feast afterward but she supposed one of her old ones would do. She did not want to risk getting food or wine on the new one. I must take it with me to Highgarden. She wanted to look beautiful for Willas Tyrell. Even if Dontos was right, and it is Winterfell he wants and not me, he still may come to love me for myself. Sansa hugged herself tightly, wondering how long it would be before the gown was ready. She could scarcely wait to wear it.

On the morning her new gown was to be ready, the serving girls filled Sansa’s tub with steaming hot water and scrubbed her head to toe until she glowed pink. Cersei’s own bedmaid trimmed her nails and brushed and curled her auburn hair so it fell down her back in soft ringlets. She brought a dozen of the queen’s favorite scents as well. Sansa chose a sharp sweet fragrance with a hint of lemon in it under the smell of flowers. The maid dabbed some on her finger and touched Sansa behind each ear, and under her chin, and then lightly on her nipples.
Cersei herself arrived with the seamstress, and watched as they dressed Sansa in her new clothes. The smallclothes were all silk, but the gown itself was ivory samite and cloth-of-silver, and lined with silvery satin. The points of the long dagged sleeves almost touched the ground when she lowered her arms. And it was a woman’s gown, not a little girl’s, there was no doubt of that. The bodice was slashed in front almost to her belly, the deep vee covered over with a panel of ornate Myrish lace in dove-grey. The skirts were long and full, the waist so tight that Sansa had to hold her breath as they laced her into it. They brought her new shoes as well, slippers of soft grey doeskin that hugged her feet like lovers. “You are very beautiful, my lady,” the seamstress said when she was dressed.
“I am, aren’t I?” Sansa giggled, and spun, her skirts swirling around her. “Oh, I am.” She could not wait for Willas to see her like this. He will love me, he will, he must . . . he will forget Winterfell when he sees me, I’ll see that he does.
Queen Cersei studied her critically. “A few gems, I think. The moonstones Joffrey gave her.”
“At once, Your Grace,” her maid replied.
When the moonstones hung from Sansa’s ears and about her neck, the queen nodded. “Yes. The gods have been kind to you, Sansa. You are a lovely girl. It seems almost obscene to squander such sweet innocence on that gargoyle.”
“What gargoyle?” Sansa did not understand. Did she mean Willas? How could she know? No one knew, but her and Margaery and the Queen of Thorns . . . oh, and Dontos, but he didn’t count.
Cersei Lannister ignored the question. “The cloak,” she commanded, and the women brought it out: a long cloak of white velvet heavy with pearls. A fierce direwolf was embroidered upon it in silver thread. Sansa looked at it with sudden dread. “Your father’s colors,” said Cersei, as they fastened it about her neck with a slender silver chain.
A maiden’s cloak. Sansa’s hand went to her throat. She would have torn the thing away if she had dared.
“You’re prettier with your mouth closed, Sansa,” Cersei told her. “Come along now, the septon is waiting. And the wedding guests as well.”
“No,” Sansa blurted. “No.”
“Yes. You are a ward of the crown. The king stands in your father’s place, since your brother is an attainted traitor. That means he has every right to dispose of your hand. You are to marry my brother Tyrion.”
My claim, she thought, sickened. Dontos the Fool was not so foolish after all; he had seen the truth of it. Sansa backed away from the queen. “I won’t.” I’m to marry Willas, I’m to be the lady of Highgarden, please . . . 
“I understand your reluctance. Cry if you must. In your place, I would likely rip my hair out. He’s a loathsome little imp, no doubt of it, but marry him you shall.”
“You can’t make me.”
“Of course we can. You may come along quietly and say your vows as befits a lady, or you may struggle and scream and make a spectacle for the stableboys to titter over, but you will end up wedded and bedded all the same.” The queen opened the door. Ser Meryn Trant and Ser Osmund Kettleblack were waiting without, in the white scale armor of the Kingsguard. “Escort Lady Sansa to the sept,” she told them. “Carry her if you must, but try not to tear the gown, it was very costly.”
Sansa tried to run, but Cersei’s handmaid caught her before she’d gone a yard. Ser Meryn Trant gave her a look that made her cringe, but Kettleblack touched her almost gently and said, “Do as you’re told, sweetling, it won’t be so bad. Wolves are supposed to be brave, aren’t they?”
Brave. Sansa took a deep breath. I am a Stark, yes, I can be brave. They were all looking at her, the way they had looked at her that day in the yard when Ser Boros Blount had torn her clothes off. It had been the Imp who saved her from a beating that day, the same man who was waiting for her now. He is not so bad as the rest of them, she told herself. “I’ll go.”
Cersei smiled. “I knew you would.”
Afterward, she could not remember leaving the room or descending the steps or crossing the yard. It seemed to take all her attention just to put one foot down in front of the other. Ser Meryn and Ser Osmund walked beside her, in cloaks as pale as her own, lacking only the pearls and the direwolf that had been her father’s. Joffrey himself was waiting for her on the steps of the castle sept. The king was resplendent in crimson and gold, his crown on his head. “I’m your father today,” he announced.
“You’re not,” she flared. “You’ll never be.”
His face darkened. “I am. I’m your father, and I can marry you to whoever I like. To anyone. You’ll marry the pig boy if I say so, and bed down with him in the sty.” His green eyes glittered with amusement. “Or maybe I should give you to Ilyn Payne, would you like him better?”
Her heart lurched. “Please, Your Grace,” she begged. “If you ever loved me even a little bit, don’t make me marry your—”
“—uncle?” Tyrion Lannister stepped through the doors of the sept. “Your Grace,” he said to Joffrey. “Grant me a moment alone with Lady Sansa, if you would be so kind?”
The king was about to refuse, but his mother gave him a sharp look. They drew off a few feet.
Tyrion wore a doublet of black velvet covered with golden scrollwork, thigh-high boots that added three inches to his height, a chain of rubies and lions’ heads. But the gash across his face was raw and red, and his nose was a hideous scab. “You are very beautiful, Sansa,” he told her.
“It is good of you to say so, my lord.” She did not know what else to say. Should I tell him he is handsome? He’ll think me a fool or a liar. She lowered her gaze and held her tongue.
“My lady, this is no way to bring you to your wedding. I am sorry for that. And for making this so sudden, and so secret. My lord father felt it necessary, for reasons of state. Else I would have come to you sooner, as I wished.” He waddled closer. “You did not ask for this marriage, I know. No more than I did. If I had refused you, however, they would have wed you to my cousin Lancel. Perhaps you would prefer that. He is nearer your age, and fairer to look upon. If that is your wish, say so, and I will end this farce.”
I don’t want any Lannister, she wanted to say. I want Willas, I want Highgarden and the puppies and the barge, and sons named Eddard and Bran and Rickon. But then she remembered what Dontos had told her in the godswood. Tyrell or Lannister, it makes no matter, it’s not me they want, only my claim. “You are kind, my lord,” she said, defeated. “I am a ward of the throne and my duty is to marry as the king commands.”
He studied her with his mismatched eyes. “I know I am not the sort of husband young girls dream of, Sansa,” he said softly, “but neither am I Joffrey.”
“No,” she said. “You were kind to me. I remember.”
Tyrion offered her a thick, blunt-fingered hand. “Come, then. Let us do our duty.”
So she put her hand in his, and he led her to the marriage altar, where the septon waited between the Mother and the Father to join their lives together. She saw Dontos in his fool’s motley, looking at her with big round eyes. Ser Balon Swann and Ser Boros Blount were there in Kings-guard white, but not Ser Loras. None of the Tyrells are here, she realized suddenly. But there were other witnesses aplenty; the eunuch Varys, Ser Addam Marbrand, Lord Philip Foote, Ser Bronn, Jalabhar Xho, a dozen others. Lord Gyles was coughing, Lady Ermesande was at the breast, and Lady Tanda’s pregnant daughter was sobbing for no apparent reason. Let her sob, Sansa thought. Perhaps I shall do the same before this day is done.
The ceremony passed as in a dream. Sansa did all that was required of her. There were prayers and vows and singing, and tall candles burning, a hundred dancing lights that the tears in her eyes transformed into a thousand. Thankfully no one seemed to notice that she was crying as she stood there, wrapped in her father’s colors; or if they did, they pretended not to. In what seemed no time at all, they came to the changing of the cloaks.
As father of the realm, Joffrey took the place of Lord Eddard Stark. Sansa stood stiff as a lance as his hands came over her shoulders to fumble with the clasp of her cloak. One of them brushed her breast and lingered to give it a little squeeze. Then the clasp opened, and Joff swept her maiden’s cloak away with a kingly flourish and a grin.
His uncle’s part went less well. The bride’s cloak he held was huge and heavy, crimson velvet richly worked with lions and bordered with gold satin and rubies. No one had thought to bring a stool, however, and Tyrion stood a foot and a half shorter than his bride. As he moved behind her, Sansa felt a sharp tug on her skirt. He wants me to kneel, she realized, blushing. She was mortified. It was not supposed to be this way. She had dreamed of her wedding a thousand times, and always she had pictured how her betrothed would stand behind her tall and strong, sweep the cloak of his protection over her shoulders, and tenderly kiss her cheek as he leaned forward to fasten the clasp.
She felt another tug at her skirt, more insistent. I won’t. Why should I spare his feelings, when no one cares about mine?
The dwarf tugged at her a third time. Stubbornly she pressed her lips together and pretended not to notice. Someone behind them tittered. The queen, she thought, but it didn’t matter. They were all laughing by then, Joffrey the loudest. “Dontos, down on your hands and knees,” the king commanded. “My uncle needs a boost to climb his bride.”
And so it was that her lord husband cloaked her in the colors of House Lannister whilst standing on the back of a fool.
When Sansa turned, the little man was gazing up at her, his mouth tight, his face as red as her cloak. Suddenly she was ashamed of her stubbornness. She smoothed her skirts and knelt in front of him, so their heads were on the same level. “With this kiss I pledge my love, and take you for my lord and husband.”
“With this kiss I pledge my love,” the dwarf replied hoarsely, “and take you for my lady and wife.” He leaned forward, and their lips touched briefly.
He is so ugly, Sansa thought when his face was close to hers. He is even uglier than the Hound.
The septon raised his crystal high, so the rainbow light fell down upon them. “Here in the sight of gods and men,” he said, “I do solemnly proclaim Tyrion of House Lannister and Sansa of House Stark to be man and wife, one flesh, one heart, one soul, now and forever, and cursed be the one who comes between them.”
She had to bite her lip to keep from sobbing.
The wedding feast was held in the Small Hall. There were perhaps fifty guests; Lannister retainers and allies for the most part, joining those who had been at the wedding. And here Sansa found the Tyrells. Margaery gave her such a sad look, and when the Queen of Thorns tottered in between Left and Right, she never looked at her at all. Elinor, Alla, and Megga seemed determined not to know her. My friends, Sansa thought bitterly.
Her husband drank heavily and ate but little. He listened whenever someone rose to make a toast and sometimes nodded a curt acknowledgment, but otherwise his face might have been made of stone. The feast seemed to go on forever, though Sansa tasted none of the food. She wanted it to be done, and yet she dreaded its end. For after the feast would come the bedding. The men would carry her up to her wedding bed, undressing her on the way and making rude jokes about the fate that awaited her between the sheets, while the women did Tyrion the same honors. Only after they had been bundled naked into bed would they be left alone, and even then the guests would stand outside the bridal chamber, shouting ribald suggestions through the door. The bedding had seemed wonderfully wicked and exciting when Sansa was a girl, but now that the moment was upon her she felt only dread. She did not think she could bear for them to rip off her clothes, and she was certain she would burst into tears at the first randy jape.
When the musicians began to play, she timidly laid her hand on Tyrion’s and said, “My lord, should we lead the dance?”
His mouth twisted. “I think we have already given them sufficent amusement for one day, don’t you?”
“As you say, my lord.” She pulled her hand back.
Joffrey and Margaery led in their place. How can a monster dance so beautifully? Sansa wondered. She had often daydreamed of how she would dance at her wedding, with every eye upon her and her handsome lord. In her dreams they had all been smiling. Not even my husband is smiling.
Other guests soon joined the king and his betrothed on the floor. Elinor danced with her young squire, and Megga with Prince Tommen. Lady Merryweather, the Myrish beauty with the black hair and the big dark eyes, spun so provocatively that every man in the hall was soon watching her. Lord and Lady Tyrell moved more sedately. Ser Kevan Lannister begged the honor of Lady Janna Fossoway, Lord Tyrell’s sister. Merry Crane took the floor with the exile prince Jalabhar Xho, gorgeous in his feathered finery. Cersei Lannister partnered first Lord Redwyne, then Lord Rowan, and finally her own father, who danced with smooth unsmiling grace.
Sansa sat with her hands in her lap, watching how the queen moved and laughed and tossed her blonde curls. She charms them all, she thought dully. How I hate her. She looked away, to where Moon Boy danced with Dontos.
“Lady Sansa.” Ser Garlan Tyrell stood beside the dais. “Would you honor me? If your lord consents?”
The Imp’s mismatched eyes narrowed. “My lady can dance with whomever she pleases.”
Perhaps she ought to have remained beside her husband, but she wanted to dance so badly . . . and Ser Garlan was brother to Margaery, to Willas, to her Knight of Flowers. “I see why they name you Garlan the Gallant, ser,” she said, as she took his hand.
“My lady is gracious to say so. My brother Willas gave me that name, as it happens. To protect me.”
“To protect you?” She gave him a puzzled look.
Ser Garlan laughed. “I was a plump little boy, I fear, and we do have an uncle called Garth the Gross. So Willas struck first, though not before threatening me with Garlan the Greensick, Garlan the Galling, and Garlan the Gargoyle.”
It was so sweet and silly that Sansa had to laugh, despite everything. Afterward she was absurdly grateful. Somehow the laughter made her hopeful again, if only for a little while. Smiling, she let the music take her, losing herself in the steps, in the sound of flute and pipes and harp, in the rhythm of the drum . . . and from time to time in Ser Garlan’s arms, when the dance brought them together. “My lady wife is most concerned for you,” he said quietly, one such time.
“Lady Leonette is too sweet. Tell her I am well.”
“A bride at her wedding should be more than well.” His voice was not unkind. “You seemed close to tears.”
“Tears of joy, ser.”
“Your eyes give the lie to your tongue.” Ser Garlan turned her, drew her close to his side. “My lady, I have seen how you look at my brother. Loras is valiant and handsome, and we all love him dearly . . . but your Imp will make a better husband. He is a bigger man than he seems, I think.”
The music spun them apart before Sansa could think of a reply. It was Mace Tyrell opposite her, red-faced and sweaty, and then Lord Merryweather, and then Prince Tommen. “I want to be married too,” said the plump little princeling, who was all of nine. “I’m taller than my uncle!”
“I know you are,” said Sansa, before the partners changed again. Ser Kevan told her she was beautiful, Jalabhar Xho said something she did not understand in the Summer Tongue, and Lord Redwyne wished her many fat children and long years of joy. And then the dance brought her face-to-face with Joffrey.
Sansa stiffened as his hand touched hers, but the king tightened his grip and drew her closer. “You shouldn’t look so sad. My uncle is an ugly little thing, but you’ll still have me.”
“You’re to marry Margaery!”
“A king can have other women. Whores. My father did. One of the Aegons did too. The third one, or the fourth. He had lots of whores and lots of bastards.” As they whirled to the music, Joff gave her a moist kiss. “My uncle will bring you to my bed whenever I command it.”
Sansa shook her head. “He won’t.”
“He will, or I’ll have his head. That King Aegon, he had any woman he wanted, whether they were married or no.”
Thankfully, it was time to change again. Her legs had turned to wood, though, and Lord Rowan, Ser Tallad, and Elinor’s squire all must have thought her a very clumsy dancer. And then she was back with Ser Garlan once more, and soon, blessedly, the dance was over.
Her relief was short-lived. No sooner had the music died than she heard Joffrey say, “It’s time to bed them! Let’s get the clothes off her, and have a look at what the she-wolf’s got to give my uncle!” Other men took up the cry, loudly.
Her dwarf husband lifted his eyes slowly from his wine cup. “I’ll have no bedding.”
Joffrey seized Sansa’s arm. “You will if I command it.”
The Imp slammed his dagger down in the table, where it stood quivering. “Then you’ll service your own bride with a wooden prick. I’ll geld you, I swear it.”
A shocked silence fell. Sansa pulled away from Joffrey, but he had a grip on her, and her sleeve ripped. No one even seemed to hear. Queen Cersei turned to her father. “Did you hear him?”
Lord Tywin rose from his seat. “I believe we can dispense with the bedding. Tyrion, I am certain you did not mean to threaten the king’s royal person.”
Sansa saw a spasm of rage pass across her husband’s face. “I misspoke,” he said. “It was a bad jape, sire.”
“You threatened to geld me!” Joffrey said shrilly.
“I did, Your Grace,” said Tyrion, “but only because I envied your royal manhood. Mine own is so small and stunted.” His face twisted into a leer. “And if you take my tongue, you will leave me no way at all to pleasure this sweet wife you gave me.”
Laughter burst from the lips of Ser Osmund Kettleblack. Someone else sniggered. But Joff did not laugh, nor Lord Tywin. “Your Grace,” he said, “my son is drunk, you can see that.”
“I am,” the Imp confessed, “but not so drunk that I cannot attend to my own bedding.” He hopped down from the dais and grabbed Sansa roughly. “Come, wife, time to smash your portcullis. I want to play come-into-the-castle.”
Red-faced, Sansa went with him from the Small Hall. What choice do I have? Tyrion waddled when he walked, especially when he walked as quickly as he did now. The gods were merciful, and neither Joffrey nor any of the others moved to follow.
For their wedding night, they had been granted the use of an airy bedchamber high in the Tower of the Hand. Tyrion kicked the door shut behind them. “There is a flagon of good Arbor gold on the sideboard, Sansa. Will you be so kind as to pour me a cup?”
“Is that wise, my lord?”
“Nothing was ever wiser. I am not truly drunk, you see. But I mean to be.”
Sansa filled a goblet for each of them. It will be easier if I am drunk as well. She sat on the edge of the great curtained bed and drained half her cup in three long swallows. No doubt it was very fine wine, but she was too nervous to taste it. It made her head swim. “Would you have me undress, my lord?”
“Tyrion.” He cocked his head. “My name is Tyrion, Sansa.”
“Tyrion. My lord. Should I take off my gown, or do you want to undress me?” She took another swallow of wine.
The Imp turned away from her. “The first time I wed, there was us and a drunken septon, and some pigs to bear witness. We ate one of our witnesses at our wedding feast. Tysha fed me crackling and I licked the grease off her fingers, and we were laughing when we fell into bed.”
“You were wed before? I . . . I had forgotten.”
“You did not forget. You never knew.”
“Who was she, my lord?” Sansa was curious despite herself.
“Lady Tysha.” His mouth twisted. “Of House Silverfist. Their arms have one gold coin and a hundred silver, upon a bloody sheet. Ours was a very short marriage . . . as befits a very short man, I suppose.”
Sansa stared down at her hands and said nothing.
“How old are you, Sansa?” asked Tyrion, after a moment.
“Thirteen,” she said, “when the moon turns.”
“Gods have mercy.” The dwarf took another swallow of wine. “Well, talk won’t make you older. Shall we get on with this, my lady? If it please you?”
“It will please me to please my lord husband.”
That seemed to anger him. “You hide behind courtesy as if it were a castle wall.”
“Courtesy is a lady’s armor,” Sansa said. Her septa had always told her that.
“I am your husband. You can take off your armor now.”
“And my clothing?”
“That too.” He waved his wine cup at her. “My lord father has commanded me to consummate this marriage.”
Her hands trembled as she began fumbling at her clothes. She had ten thumbs instead of fingers, and all of them were broken. Yet somehow she managed the laces and buttons, and her cloak and gown and girdle and undersilk slid to the floor, until finally she was stepping out of her smallclothes. Gooseprickles covered her arms and legs. She kept her eyes on the floor, too shy to look at him, but when she was done she glanced up and found him staring. There was hunger in his green eye, it seemed to her, and fury in the black. Sansa did not know which scared her more.
“You’re a child,” he said.
She covered her breasts with her hands. “I’ve flowered.”
“A child,” he repeated, “but I want you. Does that frighten you, Sansa?”
“Yes.”
“Me as well. I know I am ugly—”
“No, my—”
He pushed himself to his feet. “Don’t lie, Sansa. I am malformed, scarred, and small, but . . .” she could see him groping “. . . abed, when the candles are blown out, I am made no worse than other men. In the dark, I am the Knight of Flowers.” He took a draught of wine. “I am generous. Loyal to those who are loyal to me. I’ve proven I’m no craven. And I am cleverer than most, surely wits count for something. I can even be kind. Kindness is not a habit with us Lannisters, I fear, but I know I have some somewhere. I could be . . . I could be good to you.”
He is as frightened as I am, Sansa realized. Perhaps that should have made her feel more kindly toward him, but it did not. All she felt was pity, and pity was death to desire. He was looking at her, waiting for her to say something, but all her words had withered. She could only stand there trembling.
When he finally realized that she had no answer for him, Tyrion Lannister drained the last of his wine. “I understand,” he said bitterly. “Get in the bed, Sansa. We need to do our duty.”
She climbed onto the featherbed, conscious of his stare. A scented beeswax candle burned on the bedside table and rose petals had been strewn between the sheets. She had started to pull up a blanket to cover herself when she heard him say, “No.”
The cold made her shiver, but she obeyed. Her eyes closed, and she waited. After a moment she heard the sound of her husband pulling off his boots, and the rustle of clothing as he undressed himself. When he hopped up on the bed and put his hand on her breast, Sansa could not help but shudder. She lay with her eyes closed, every muscle tense, dreading what might come next. Would he touch her again? Kiss her? Should she open her legs for him now? She did not know what was expected of her.
“Sansa.” The hand was gone. “Open your eyes.”
She had promised to obey; she opened her eyes. He was sitting by her feet, naked. Where his legs joined, his man’s staff poked up stiff and hard from a thicket of coarse yellow hair, but it was the only thing about him that was straight.
“My lady,” Tyrion said, “you are lovely, make no mistake, but . . . I cannot do this. My father be damned. We will wait. The turn of a moon, a year, a season, however long it takes. Until you have come to know me better, and perhaps to trust me a little.” His smile might have been meant to be reassuring, but without a nose it only made him look more grotesque and sinister.
Look at him, Sansa told herself, look at your husband, at all of him, Septa Mordane said all men are beautiful, find his beauty, try. She stared at the stunted legs, the swollen brutish brow, the green eye and the black one, the raw stump of his nose and crooked pink scar, the coarse tangle of black and gold hair that passed for his beard. Even his manhood was ugly, thick and veined, with a bulbous purple head. This is not right, this is not fair, how have I sinned that the gods would do this to me, how?
“On my honor as a Lannister,” the Imp said, “I will not touch you until you want me to.”
It took all the courage that was in her to look in those mismatched eyes and say, “And if I never want you to, my lord?”
His mouth jerked as if she had slapped him. “Never?”
Her neck was so tight she could scarcely nod.
“Why,” he said, “that is why the gods made whores for imps like me.” He closed his short blunt fingers into a fist, and climbed down off the bed.

That was such a sweet dream, Sansa thought drowsily. She had been back in Winterfell, running through the godswood with her Lady. Her father had been there, and her brothers, all of them warm and safe. If only dreaming could make it so . . . 
She threw back the coverlets. I must be brave. Her torments would soon be ended, one way or the other. If Lady was here, I would not be afraid. Lady was dead, though; Robb, Bran, Rickon, Arya, her father, her mother, even Septa Mordane. All of them are dead but me. She was alone in the world now.
Her lord husband was not beside her, but she was used to that. Tyrion was a bad sleeper and often rose before the dawn. Usually she found him in the solar, hunched beside a candle, lost in some old scroll or leatherbound book. Sometimes the smell of the morning bread from the ovens took him to the kitchens, and sometimes he would climb up to the roof garden or wander all alone down Traitor’s Walk.
She threw back the shutters and shivered as gooseprickles rose along her arms. There were clouds massing in the eastern sky, pierced by shafts of sunlight. They look like two huge castles afloat in the morning sky. Sansa could see their walls of tumbled stone, their mighty keeps and barbicans. Wispy banners swirled from atop their towers and reached for the fast-fading stars. The sun was coming up behind them, and she watched them go from black to grey to a thousand shades of rose and gold and crimson. Soon the wind mushed them together, and there was only one castle where there had been two.
She heard the door open as her maids brought the hot water for her bath. They were both new to her service; Tyrion said the women who’d tended to her previously had all been Cersei’s spies, just as Sansa had always suspected. “Come see,” she told them. “There’s a castle in the sky.”
They came to have a look. “It’s made of gold.” Shae had short dark hair and bold eyes. She did all that was asked of her, but sometimes she gave Sansa the most insolent looks. “A castle all of gold, there’s a sight I’d like to see.”
“A castle, is it?” Brella had to squint. “That tower’s tumbling over, looks like. It’s all ruins, that is.”
Sansa did not want to hear about falling towers and ruined castles. She closed the shutters and said, “We are expected at the queen’s breakfast. Is my lord husband in the solar?”
“No, m’lady,” said Brella. “I have not seen him.”
“Might be he went to see his father,” Shae declared. “Might be the King’s Hand had need of his counsel.”
Brella gave a sniff. “Lady Sansa, you’ll be wanting to get into the tub before the water gets too cool.”
Sansa let Shae pull her shift up over her head and climbed into the big wooden tub. She was tempted to ask for a cup of wine, to calm her nerves. The wedding was to be at midday in the Great Sept of Baelor across the city. And come evenfall the feast would be held in the throne room; a thousand guests and seventy-seven courses, with singers and jugglers and mummers. But first came breakfast in the Queen’s Ballroom, for the Lannisters and the Tyrell men—the Tyrell women would be breaking their fast with Margaery—and a hundred odd knights and lordlings. They have made me a Lannister, Sansa thought bitterly.
Brella sent Shae to fetch more hot water while she washed Sansa’s back. “You are trembling, m’lady.”
“The water is not hot enough,” Sansa lied.
Her maids were dressing her when Tyrion appeared, Podrick Payne in tow. “You look lovely, Sansa.” He turned to his squire. “Pod, be so good as to pour me a cup of wine.”
“There will be wine at the breakfast, my lord,” Sansa said.
“There’s wine here. You don’t expect me to face my sister sober, surely? It’s a new century, my lady. The three hundredth year since Aegon’s Conquest.” The dwarf took a cup of red from Podrick and raised it high. “To Aegon. What a fortunate fellow. Two sisters, two wives, and three big dragons, what more could a man ask for?” He wiped his mouth with the back of his hand.
The Imp’s clothing was soiled and unkempt, Sansa noticed; it looked as though he’d slept in it. “Will you be changing into fresh garb, my lord? Your new doublet is very handsome.”
“The doublet is handsome, yes.” Tyrion put the cup aside. “Come, Pod, let us see if we can find some garments to make me look less dwarfish. I would not want to shame my lady wife.”
When the Imp returned a short time later, he was presentable enough, and even a little taller. Podrick Payne had changed as well, and looked almost a proper squire for once, although a rather large red pimple in the fold beside his nose spoiled the effect of his splendid purple, white, and gold raiment. He is such a timid boy. Sansa had been wary of Tyrion’s squire at first; he was a Payne, cousin to Ser Ilyn Payne who had taken her father’s head off. However, she’d soon come to realize that Pod was as frightened of her as she was of his cousin. Whenever she spoke to him, he turned the most alarming shade of red.
“Are purple, gold, and white the colors of House Payne, Podrick?” she asked him politely.
“No. I mean, yes.” He blushed. “The colors. Our arms are purple and white chequy, my lady. With gold coins. In the checks. Purple and white. Both.” He studied her feet.
“There’s a tale behind those coins,” said Tyrion. “No doubt Pod will confide it to your toes one day. Just now we are expected at the Queen’s Ballroom, however. Shall we?”
Sansa was tempted to beg off. I could tell him that my tummy was upset, or that my moon’s blood had come. She wanted nothing more than to crawl back in bed and pull the drapes. I must be brave, like Robb, she told herself, as she took her lord husband stiffly by the arm.
In the Queen’s Ballroom they broke their fast on honeycakes baked with blackberries and nuts, gammon steaks, bacon, fingerfish crisped in breadcrumbs, autumn pears, and a Dornish dish of onions, cheese, and chopped eggs cooked up with fiery peppers. “Nothing like a hearty breakfast to whet one’s appetite for the seventy-seven-course feast to follow,” Tyrion commented as their plates were filled. There were flagons of milk and flagons of mead and flagons of a light sweet golden wine to wash it down. Musicians strolled among the tables, piping and fluting and fiddling, while Ser Dontos galloped about on his broomstick horse and Moon Boy made farting sounds with his cheeks and sang rude songs about the guests.
Tyrion scarce touched his food, Sansa noticed, though he drank several cups of the wine. For herself, she tried a little of the Dornish eggs, but the peppers burned her mouth. Otherwise she only nibbled at the fruit and fish and honeycakes. Every time Joffrey looked at her, her tummy got so fluttery that she felt as though she’d swallowed a bat.
When the food had been cleared away, the queen solemnly presented Joff with the wife’s cloak that he would drape over Margaery’s shoulders. “It is the cloak I donned when Robert took me for his queen, the same cloak my mother Lady Joanna wore when wed to my lord father.” Sansa thought it looked threadbare, if truth be told, but perhaps because it was so used.
Then it was time for gifts. It was traditional in the Reach to give presents to bride and groom on the morning of their wedding; on the morrow they would receive more presents as a couple, but today’s tokens were for their separate persons.
From Jalabhar Xho, Joffrey received a great bow of golden wood and quiver of long arrows fletched with green and scarlet feathers; from Lady Tanda a pair of supple riding boots; from Ser Kevan a magnificent red leather jousting saddle; a red gold brooch wrought in the shape of a scorpion from the Dornishman, Prince Oberyn; silver spurs from Ser Addam Marbrand; a red silk tourney pavilion from Lord Mathis Rowan. Lord Paxter Redwyne brought forth a beautiful wooden model of the war galley of two hundred oars being built even now on the Arbor. “If it please Your Grace, she will be called King Joffrey’s Valor,” he said, and Joff allowed that he was very pleased indeed. “I will make it my flagship when I sail to Dragonstone to kill my traitor uncle Stannis,” he said.
He plays the gracious king today. Joffrey could be gallant when it suited him, Sansa knew, but it seemed to suit him less and less. Indeed, all his courtesy vanished at once when Tyrion presented him with their own gift: a huge old book called Lives of Four Kings, bound in leather and gorgeously illuminated. The king leafed through it with no interest. “And what is this, Uncle?”
A book. Sansa wondered if Joffrey moved those fat wormy lips of his when he read.
“Grand Maester Kaeth’s history of the reigns of Daeron the Young Dragon, Baelor the Blessed, Aegon the Unworthy, and Daeron the Good,” her small husband answered.
“A book every king should read, Your Grace,” said Ser Kevan.
“My father had no time for books.” Joffrey shoved the tome across the table. “If you read less, Uncle Imp, perhaps Lady Sansa would have a baby in her belly by now.” He laughed . . . and when the king laughs, the court laughs with him. “Don’t be sad, Sansa, once I’ve gotten Queen Margaery with child I’ll visit your bedchamber and show my little uncle how it’s done.”
Sansa reddened. She glanced nervously at Tyrion, afraid of what he might say. This could turn as nasty as the bedding had at their own feast. But for once the dwarf filled his mouth with wine instead of words.
Lord Mace Tyrell came forward to present his gift: a golden chalice three feet tall, with two ornate curved handles and seven faces glittering with gemstones. “Seven faces for Your Grace’s seven kingdoms,” the bride’s father explained. He showed them how each face bore the sigil of one of the great houses: ruby lion, emerald rose, onyx stag, silver trout, blue jade falcon, opal sun, and pearl direwolf.
“A splendid cup,” said Joffrey, “but we’ll need to chip the wolf off and put a squid in its place, I think.”
Sansa pretended that she had not heard.
“Margaery and I shall drink deep at the feast, good father.” Joffrey lifted the chalice above his head, for everyone to admire.
“The damned thing’s as tall as I am,” Tyrion muttered in a low voice. “Half a chalice and Joff will be falling down drunk.”
Good, she thought. Perhaps he’ll break his neck.
Lord Tywin waited until last to present the king with his own gift: a longsword. Its scabbard was made of cherrywood, gold, and oiled red leather, studded with golden lions’ heads. The lions had ruby eyes, she saw. The ballroom fell silent as Joffrey unsheathed the blade and thrust the sword above his head. Red and black ripples in the steel shimmered in the morning light.
“Magnificent,” declared Mathis Rowan.
“A sword to sing of, sire,” said Lord Redwyne.
“A king’s sword,” said Ser Kevan Lannister.
King Joffrey looked as if he wanted to kill someone right then and there, he was so excited. He slashed at the air and laughed. “A great sword must have a great name, my lords! What shall I call it?”
Sansa remembered Lion’s Tooth, the sword Arya had flung into the Trident, and Hearteater, the one he’d made her kiss before the battle. She wondered if he’d want Margaery to kiss this one.
The guests were shouting out names for the new blade. Joff dismissed a dozen before he heard one he liked. “Widow’s Wail!” he cried. “Yes! It shall make many a widow, too!” He slashed again. “And when I face my uncle Stannis it will break his magic sword clean in two.” Joff tried a downcut, forcing Ser Balon Swann to take a hasty step backward. Laughter rang through the hall at the look on Ser Balon’s face.
“Have a care, Your Grace,” Ser Addam Marbrand warned the king. “Valyrian steel is perilously sharp.”
“I remember.” Joffrey brought Widow’s Wail down in a savage two-handed slice, onto the book that Tyrion had given him. The heavy leather cover parted at a stroke. “Sharp! I told you, I am no stranger to Valyrian steel.” It took him half a dozen further cuts to hack the thick tome apart, and the boy was breathless by the time he was done. Sansa could feel her husband struggling with his fury as Ser Osmund Kettleblack shouted, “I pray you never turn that wicked edge on me, sire.”
“See that you never give me cause, ser.” Joffrey flicked a chunk of Lives of Four Kings off the table at swordpoint, then slid Widow’s Wail back into its scabbard.
“Your Grace,” Ser Garlan Tyrell said. “Perhaps you did not know. In all of Westeros there were but four copies of that book illuminated in Kaeth’s own hand.”
“Now there are three.” Joffrey undid his old swordbelt to don his new one. “You and Lady Sansa owe me a better present, Uncle Imp. This one is all chopped to pieces.”
Tyrion was staring at his nephew with his mismatched eyes. “Perhaps a knife, sire. To match your sword. A dagger of the same fine Valyrian steel . . . with a dragonbone hilt, say?”
Joff gave him a sharp look. “You . . . yes, a dagger to match my sword, good.” He nodded. “A . . . a gold hilt with rubies in it. Dragonbone is too plain.”
“As you wish, Your Grace.” Tyrion drank another cup of wine. He might have been all alone in his solar for all the attention he paid Sansa. But when the time came to leave for the wedding, he took her by the hand.
As they were crossing the yard, Prince Oberyn of Dorne fell in beside them, his black-haired paramour on his arm. Sansa glanced at the woman curiously. She was baseborn and unwed, and had borne two bastard daughters for the prince, but she did not fear to look even the queen in the eye. Shae had told her that this Ellaria worshiped some Lysene love goddess. “She was almost a whore when he found her, m’lady,” her maid confided, “and now she’s near a princess.” Sansa had never been this close to the Dornishwoman before. She is not truly beautiful, she thought, but something about her draws the eye.
“I once had the great good fortune to see the Citadel’s copy of Lives of Four Kings,” Prince Oberyn was telling her lord husband. “The illuminations were wondrous to behold, but Kaeth was too kind by half to King Viserys.”
Tyrion gave him a sharp look. “Too kind? He scants Viserys shamefully, in my view. It should have been Lives of Five Kings.”
The prince laughed. “Viserys hardly reigned a fortnight.”
“He reigned more than a year,” said Tyrion.
Oberyn gave a shrug. “A year or a fortnight, what does it matter? He poisoned his own nephew to gain the throne and then did nothing once he had it.”
“Baelor starved himself to death, fasting,” said Tyrion. “His uncle served him loyally as Hand, as he had served the Young Dragon before him. Viserys might only have reigned a year, but he ruled for fifteen, while Daeron warred and Baelor prayed.” He made a sour face. “And if he did remove his nephew, can you blame him? Someone had to save the realm from Baelor’s follies.”
Sansa was shocked. “But Baelor the Blessed was a great king. He walked the Boneway barefoot to make peace with Dorne, and rescued the Dragonknight from a snakepit. The vipers refused to strike him because he was so pure and holy.”
Prince Oberyn smiled. “If you were a viper, my lady, would you want to bite a bloodless stick like Baelor the Blessed? I’d sooner save my fangs for someone juicier . . .”
“My prince is playing with you, Lady Sansa,” said the woman Ellaria Sand. “The septons and singers like to say that the snakes did not bite Baelor, but the truth is very different. He was bitten half a hundred times, and should have died from it.”
“If he had, Viserys would have reigned a dozen years,” said Tyrion, “and the Seven Kingdoms might have been better served. Some believe Baelor was deranged by all that venom.”
“Yes,” said Prince Oberyn, “but I’ve seen no snakes in this Red Keep of yours. So how do you account for Joffrey?”
“I prefer not to.” Tyrion inclined his head stiffly. “If you will excuse us. Our litter awaits.” The dwarf helped Sansa up inside and clambered awkwardly after her. “Close the curtains, my lady, if you’d be so good.”
“Must we, my lord?” Sansa did not want to be shut behind the curtains. “The day is so lovely.”
“The good people of King’s Landing are like to throw dung at the litter if they see me inside it. Do us both a kindness, my lady. Close the curtains.”
She did as he bid her. They sat for a time, as the air grew warm and stuffy around them. “I was sorry about your book, my lord,” she made herself say.
“It was Joffrey’s book. He might have learned a thing or two if he’d read it.” He sounded distracted. “I should have known better. I should have seen . . . a good many things.”
“Perhaps the dagger will please him more.”
When the dwarf grimaced, his scar tightened and twisted. “The boy’s earned himself a dagger, wouldn’t you say?” Thankfully Tyrion did not wait for her reply. “Joff quarreled with your brother Robb at Winterfell. Tell me, was there ill feeling between Bran and His Grace as well?”
“Bran?” The question confused her. “Before he fell, you mean?” She had to try and think back. It was all so long ago. “Bran was a sweet boy. Everyone loved him. He and Tommen fought with wooden swords, I remember, but just for play.”
Tyrion lapsed back into moody silence. Sansa heard the distant clank of chains from outside; the portcullis was being drawn up. A moment later there was a shout, and their litter swayed into motion. Deprived of the passing scenery, she chose to stare at her folded hands, uncomfortably aware of her husband’s mismatched eyes. Why is he looking at me that way?
“You loved your brothers, much as I love Jaime.”
Is this some Lannister trap to make me speak treason? “My brothers were traitors, and they’ve gone to traitors’ graves. It is treason to love a traitor.”
Her little husband snorted. “Robb rose in arms against his rightful king. By law, that made him a traitor. The others died too young to know what treason was.” He rubbed his nose. “Sansa, do you know what happened to Bran at Winterfell?”
“Bran fell. He was always climbing things, and finally he fell. We always feared he would. And Theon Greyjoy killed him, but that was later.”
“Theon Greyjoy.” Tyrion sighed. “Your lady mother once accused me . . . well, I will not burden you with the ugly details. She accused me falsely. I never harmed your brother Bran. And I mean no harm to you.”
What does he want me to say? “That is good to know, my lord.” He wanted something from her, but Sansa did not know what it was. He looks like a starving child, but I have no food to give him. Why won’t he leave me be?
Tyrion rubbed at his scarred, scabby nose yet again, an ugly habit that drew the eye to his ugly face. “You have never asked me how Robb died, or your lady mother.”
“I . . . would sooner not know. It would give me bad dreams.”
“Then I will say no more.”
“That . . . that’s kind of you.”
“Oh, yes,” said Tyrion. “I am the very soul of kindness. And I know about bad dreams.”

Far across the city, a bell began to toll.
Sansa felt as though she were in a dream. “Joffrey is dead,” she told the trees, to see if that would wake her.
He had not been dead when she left the throne room. He had been on his knees, though, clawing at his throat, tearing at his own skin as he fought to breathe. The sight of it had been too terrible to watch, and she had turned and fled, sobbing. Lady Tanda had been fleeing as well. “You have a good heart, my lady,” she said to Sansa. “Not every maid would weep so for a man who set her aside and wed her to a dwarf.”
A good heart. I have a good heart. Hysterical laughter rose up her gullet, but Sansa choked it back down. The bells were ringing, slow and mournful. Ringing, ringing, ringing. They had rung for King Robert the same way. Joffrey was dead, he was dead, he was dead, dead, dead. Why was she crying, when she wanted to dance? Were they tears of joy?
She found her clothes where she had hidden them, the night before last. With no maids to help her, it took her longer than it should have to undo the laces of her gown. Her hands were strangely clumsy, though she was not as frightened as she ought to have been. “The gods are cruel to take him so young and handsome, at his own wedding feast,” Lady Tanda had said to her.
The gods are just, thought Sansa. Robb had died at a wedding feast as well. It was Robb she wept for. Him and Margaery. Poor Margaery, twice wed and twice widowed. Sansa slid her arm from a sleeve, pushed down the gown, and wriggled out of it. She balled it up and shoved it into the bole of an oak, shook out the clothing she had hidden there. Dress warmly, Ser Dontos had told her, and dress dark. She had no blacks, so she chose a dress of thick brown wool. The bodice was decorated with freshwater pearls, though. The cloak will cover them. The cloak was a deep green, with a large hood. She slipped the dress over her head, and donned the cloak, though she left the hood down for the moment. There were shoes as well, simple and sturdy, with flat heels and square toes. The gods heard my prayer, she thought. She felt so numb and dreamy. My skin has turned to porcelain, to ivory, to steel. Her hands moved stiffly, awkwardly, as if they had never let down her hair before. For a moment she wished Shae was there, to help her with the net.
When she pulled it free, her long auburn hair cascaded down her back and across her shoulders. The web of spun silver hung from her fingers, the fine metal glimmering softly, the stones black in the moonlight. Black amethysts from Asshai. One of them was missing. Sansa lifted the net for a closer look. There was a dark smudge in the silver socket where the stone had fallen out.
A sudden terror filled her. Her heart hammered against her ribs, and for an instant she held her breath. Why am I so scared, it’s only an amethyst, a black amethyst from Asshai, no more than that. It must have been loose in the setting, that’s all. It was loose and it fell out, and now it’s lying somewhere in the throne room, or in the yard, unless . . . 
Ser Dontos had said the hair net was magic, that it would take her home. He told her she must wear it tonight at Joffrey’s wedding feast. The silver wire stretched tight across her knuckles. Her thumb rubbed back and forth against the hole where the stone had been. She tried to stop, but her fingers were not her own. Her thumb was drawn to the hole as the tongue is drawn to a missing tooth. What kind of magic? The king was dead, the cruel king who had been her gallant prince a thousand years ago. If Dontos had lied about the hair net, had he lied about the rest as well? What if he never comes? What if there is no ship, no boat on the river, no escape? What would happen to her then?
She heard a faint rustle of leaves, and stuffed the silver hair net down deep in the pocket of her cloak. “Who’s there?” she cried. “Who is it?” The godswood was dim and dark, and the bells were ringing Joff into his grave.
“Me.” He staggered out from under the trees, reeling drunk. He caught her arm to steady himself. “Sweet Jonquil, I’ve come. Your Florian has come, don’t be afraid.”
Sansa pulled away from his touch. “You said I must wear the hair net. The silver net with . . . what sort of stones are those?”
“Amethysts. Black amethysts from Asshai, my lady.”
“They’re no amethysts. Are they? Are they? You lied.”
“Black amethysts,” he swore. “There was magic in them.”
“There was murder in them!”
“Softly, my lady, softly. No murder. He choked on his pigeon pie.” Dontos chortled. “Oh, tasty tasty pie. Silver and stones, that’s all it was, silver and stone and magic.”
The bells were tolling, and the wind was making a noise like he had made as he tried to suck a breath of air. “You poisoned him. You did. You took a stone from my hair . . .”
“Hush, you’ll be the death of us. I did nothing. Come, we must away, they’ll search for you. Your husband’s been arrested.”
“Tyrion?” she said, shocked.
“Do you have another husband? The Imp, the dwarf uncle, she thinks he did it.” He grabbed her hand and pulled at her. “This way, we must away, quickly now, have no fear.”
Sansa followed unresisting. I could never abide the weeping of women, Joff once said, but his mother was the only woman weeping now. In Old Nan’s stories the grumkins crafted magic things that could make a wish come true. Did I wish him dead? she wondered, before she remembered that she was too old to believe in grumkins. “Tyrion poisoned him?” Her dwarf husband had hated his nephew, she knew. Could he truly have killed him? Did he know about my hair net, about the black amethysts? He brought Joff wine. How could you make someone choke by putting an amethyst in their wine? If Tyrion did it, they will think I was part of it as well, she realized with a start of fear. How not? They were man and wife, and Joff had killed her father and mocked her with her brother’s death. One flesh, one heart, one soul.
“Be quiet now, my sweetling,” said Dontos. “Outside the godswood, we must make no sound. Pull up your hood and hide your face.” Sansa nodded, and did as he said.
He was so drunk that sometimes Sansa had to lend him her arm to keep him from falling. The bells were ringing out across the city, more and more of them joining in. She kept her head down and stayed in the shadows, close behind Dontos. While descending the serpentine steps he stumbled to his knees and retched. My poor Florian, she thought, as he wiped his mouth with a floppy sleeve. Dress dark, he’d said, yet under his brown hooded cloak he was wearing his old surcoat; red and pink horizontal stripes beneath a black chief bearing three gold crowns, the arms of House Hollard. “Why are you wearing your surcoat? Joff decreed it was death if you were caught dressed as a knight again, he . . . oh . . .” Nothing Joff had decreed mattered any longer.
“I wanted to be a knight. For this, at least.” Dontos lurched back to his feet and took her arm. “Come. Be quiet now, no questions.”
They continued down the serpentine and across a small sunken courtyard. Ser Dontos shoved open a heavy door and lit a taper. They were inside a long gallery. Along the walls stood empty suits of armor, dark and dusty, their helms crested with rows of scales that continued down their backs. As they hurried past, the taper’s light made the shadows of each scale stretch and twist. The hollow knights are turning into dragons, she thought.
One more stair took them to an oaken door banded with iron. “Be strong now, my Jonquil, you are almost there.” When Dontos lifted the bar and pulled open the door, Sansa felt a cold breeze on her face. She passed through twelve feet of wall, and then she was outside the castle, standing at the top of the cliff. Below was the river, above the sky, and one was as black as the other.
“We must climb down,” Ser Dontos said. “At the bottom, a man is waiting to row us out to the ship.”
“I’ll fall.” Bran had fallen, and he had loved to climb.
“No you won’t. There’s a sort of ladder, a secret ladder, carved into the stone. Here, you can feel it, my lady.” He got down on his knees with her and made her lean over the edge of the cliff, groping with her fingers until she found the handhold cut into the face of the bluff. “Almost as good as rungs.”
Even so, it was a long way down. “I can’t.”
“You must.”
“Isn’t there another way?”
“This is the way. It won’t be so hard for a strong young girl like you. Hold on tight and never look down and you’ll be at the bottom in no time at all.” His eyes were shiny. “Your poor Florian is fat and old and drunk, I’m the one should be afraid. I used to fall off my horse, don’t you remember? That was how we began. I was drunk and fell off my horse and Joffrey wanted my fool head, but you saved me. You saved me, sweetling.”
He’s weeping, she realized. “And now you have saved me.”
“Only if you go. If not, I have killed us both.”
It was him, she thought. He killed Joffrey. She had to go, for him as much as for herself. “You go first, ser.” If he did fall, she did not want him falling down on her head and knocking both of them off the cliff.
“As you wish, my lady.” He gave her a sloppy kiss and swung his legs clumsily over the precipice, kicking about until he found a foothold. “Let me get down a bit, and come after. You will come now? You must swear it.”
“I’ll come,” she promised.
Ser Dontos disappeared. She could hear him huffing and puffing as he began the descent. Sansa listened to the tolling of the bell, counting each ring. At ten, gingerly, she eased herself over the edge of the cliff, poking with her toes until they found a place to rest. The castle walls loomed large above her, and for a moment she wanted nothing so much as to pull herself up and run back to her warm rooms in the Kitchen Keep. Be brave, she told herself. Be brave, like a lady in a song.
Sansa dared not look down. She kept her eyes on the face of the cliff, making certain of each step before reaching for the next. The stone was rough and cold. Sometimes she could feel her fingers slipping, and the handholds were not as evenly spaced as she would have liked. The bells would not stop ringing. Before she was halfway down her arms were trembling and she knew that she was going to fall. One more step, she told herself, one more step. She had to keep moving. If she stopped, she would never start again, and dawn would find her still clinging to the cliff, frozen in fear. One more step, and one more step.
The ground took her by surprise. She stumbled and fell, her heart pounding. When she rolled onto her back and stared up at from where she had come, her head swam dizzily and her fingers clawed at the dirt. I did it. I did it, I didn’t fall, I made the climb and now I’m going home.
Ser Dontos pulled her back onto her feet. “This way. Quiet now, quiet, quiet.” He stayed close to the shadows that lay black and thick beneath the cliffs. Thankfully they did not have to go far. Fifty yards downriver, a man sat in a small skiff, half-hidden by the remains of a great galley that had gone aground there and burned. Dontos limped up to him, puffing. “Oswell?”
“No names,” the man said. “In the boat.” He sat hunched over his oars, an old man, tall and gangling, with long white hair and a great hooked nose, with eyes shaded by a cowl. “Get in, be quick about it,” he muttered. “We need to be away.”
When both of them were safe aboard, the cowled man slid the blades into the water and put his back into the oars, rowing them out toward the channel. Behind them the bells were still tolling the boy king’s death. They had the dark river all to themselves.
With slow, steady, rhythmic strokes, they threaded their way downstream, sliding above the sunken galleys, past broken masts, burned hulls, and torn sails. The oarlocks had been muffled, so they moved almost soundlessly. A mist was rising over the water. Sansa saw the embattled ramparts of one of the Imp’s winch towers looming above, but the great chain had been lowered, and they rowed unimpeded past the spot where a thousand men had burned. The shore fell away, the fog grew thicker, the sound of the bells began to fade. Finally even the lights were gone, lost somewhere behind them. They were out in Blackwater Bay, and the world shrank to dark water, blowing mist, and their silent companion stooped over the oars. “How far must we go?” she asked.
“No talk.” The oarsman was old, but stronger than he looked, and his voice was fierce. There was something oddly familiar about his face, though Sansa could not say what it was.
“Not far.” Ser Dontos took her hand in his own and rubbed it gently. “Your friend is near, waiting for you.”
“No talk!” the oarsman growled again. “Sound carries over water, Ser Fool.”
Abashed, Sansa bit her lip and huddled down in silence. The rest was rowing, rowing, rowing.
The eastern sky was vague with the first hint of dawn when Sansa finally saw a ghostly shape in the darkness ahead; a trading galley, her sails furled, moving slowly on a single bank of oars. As they drew closer, she saw the ship’s figurehead, a merman with a golden crown blowing on a great seashell horn. She heard a voice cry out, and the galley swung slowly about.
As they came alongside, the galley dropped a rope ladder over the rail. The rower shipped the oars and helped Sansa to her feet. “Up now. Go on, girl, I got you.” Sansa thanked him for his kindness, but received no answer but a grunt. It was much easier going up the rope ladder than it had been coming down the cliff. The oarsman Oswell followed close behind her, while Ser Dontos remained in the boat.
Two sailors were waiting by the rail to help her onto the deck. Sansa was trembling. “She’s cold,” she heard someone say. He took off his cloak and put it around her shoulders. “There, is that better, my lady? Rest easy, the worst is past and done.”
She knew the voice. But he’s in the Vale, she thought. Ser Lothor Brune stood beside him with a torch.
“Lord Petyr,” Dontos called from the boat. “I must needs row back, before they think to look for me.”
Petyr Baelish put a hand on the rail. “But first you’ll want your payment. Ten thousand dragons, was it?”
“Ten thousand.” Dontos rubbed his mouth with the back of his hand. “As you promised, my lord.”
“Ser Lothor, the reward.”
Lothor Brune dipped his torch. Three men stepped to the gunwale, raised crossbows, fired. One bolt took Dontos in the chest as he looked up, punching through the left crown on his surcoat. The others ripped into throat and belly. It happened so quickly neither Dontos nor Sansa had time to cry out. When it was done, Lothor Brune tossed the torch down on top of the corpse. The little boat was blazing fiercely as the galley moved away.
“You killed him.” Clutching the rail, Sansa turned away and retched. Had she escaped the Lannisters to tumble into worse?
“My lady,” Littlefinger murmured, “your grief is wasted on such a man as that. He was a sot, and no man’s friend.”
“But he saved me.”
“He sold you for a promise of ten thousand dragons. Your disappearance will make them suspect you in Joffrey’s death. The gold cloaks will hunt, and the eunuch will jingle his purse. Dontos . . . well, you heard him. He sold you for gold, and when he’d drunk it up he would have sold you again. A bag of dragons buys a man’s silence for a while, but a well-placed quarrel buys it forever.” He smiled sadly. “All he did he did at my behest. I dared not befriend you openly. When I heard how you saved his life at Joff’s tourney, I knew he would be the perfect catspaw.”
Sansa felt sick. “He said he was my Florian.”
“Do you perchance recall what I said to you that day your father sat the Iron Throne?”
The moment came back to her vividly. “You told me that life was not a song. That I would learn that one day, to my sorrow.” She felt tears in her eyes, but whether she wept for Ser Dontos Hollard, for Joff, for Tyrion, or for herself, Sansa could not say. “Is it all lies, forever and ever, everyone and everything?”
“Almost everyone. Save you and I, of course.” He smiled. “Come to the godswood tonight if you want to go home.”
“The note . . . it was you?”
“It had to be the godswood. No other place in the Red Keep is safe from the eunuch’s little birds . . . or little rats, as I call them. There are trees in the godswood instead of walls. Sky above instead of ceiling. Roots and dirt and rock in place of floor. The rats have no place to scurry. Rats need to hide, lest men skewer them with swords.” Lord Petyr took her arm. “Let me show you to your cabin. You have had a long and trying day, I know. You must be weary.”
Already the little boat was no more than a swirl of smoke and fire behind them, almost lost in the immensity of the dawn sea. There was no going back; her only road was forward. “Very weary,” she admitted.
As he led her below, he said, “Tell me of the feast. The queen took such pains. The singers, the jugglers, the dancing bear . . . did your little lord husband enjoy my jousting dwarfs?”
“Yours?”
“I had to send to Braavos for them and hide them away in a brothel until the wedding. The expense was exceeded only by the bother. It is surprisingly difficult to hide a dwarf, and Joffrey . . . you can lead a king to water, but with Joff one had to splash it about before he realized he could drink it. When I told him about my little surprise, His Grace said, ‘Why would I want some ugly dwarfs at my feast? I hate dwarfs.’ I had to take him by the shoulder and whisper, ‘Not as much as your uncle will.’”
The deck rocked beneath her feet, and Sansa felt as if the world itself had grown unsteady. “They think Tyrion poisoned Joffrey. Ser Dontos said they seized him.”
Littlefinger smiled. “Widowhood will become you, Sansa.”
The thought made her tummy flutter. She might never need to share a bed with Tyrion again. That was what she’d wanted . . . wasn’t it?
The cabin was low and cramped, but a featherbed had been laid upon the narrow sleeping shelf to make it more comfortable, and thick furs piled atop it. “It will be snug, I know, but you shouldn’t be too uncomfortable.” Littlefinger pointed out a cedar chest under the porthole. “You’ll find fresh garb within. Dresses, smallclothes, warm stockings, a cloak. Wool and linen only, I fear. Unworthy of a maid so beautiful, but they’ll serve to keep you dry and clean until we can find you something finer.”
He had this all prepared for me. “My lord, I . . . I do not understand . . . Joffrey gave you Harrenhal, made you Lord Paramount of the Trident . . . why . . .”
“Why should I wish him dead?” Littlefinger shrugged. “I had no motive. Besides, I am a thousand leagues away in the Vale. Always keep your foes confused. If they are never certain who you are or what you want, they cannot know what you are like to do next. Sometimes the best way to baffle them is to make moves that have no purpose, or even seem to work against you. Remember that, Sansa, when you come to play the game.”
“What . . . what game?”
“The only game. The game of thrones.” He brushed back a strand of her hair. “You are old enough to know that your mother and I were more than friends. There was a time when Cat was all I wanted in this world. I dared to dream of the life we might make and the children she would give me . . . but she was a daughter of Riverrun, and Hoster Tully. Family, Duty, Honor, Sansa. Family, Duty, Honor meant I could never have her hand. But she gave me something finer, a gift a woman can give but once. How could I turn my back upon her daughter? In a better world, you might have been mine, not Eddard Stark’s. My loyal loving daughter . . . Put Joffrey from your mind, sweetling. Dontos, Tyrion, all of them. They will never trouble you again. You are safe now, that’s all that matters. You are safe with me, and sailing home.”

The ladder to the forecastle was steep and splintery, so Sansa accepted a hand up from Lothor Brune. Ser Lothor, she had to remind herself; the man had been knighted for his valor in the Battle of the Blackwater. Though no proper knight would wear those patched brown breeches and scuffed boots, nor that cracked and water-stained leather jerkin. A square-faced stocky man with a squashed nose and a mat of nappy grey hair, Brune spoke seldom. He is stronger than he looks, though. She could tell by the ease with which he lifted her, as if she weighed nothing at all.
Off the bow of the Merling King stretched a bare and stony strand, windswept, treeless, and uninviting. Even so, it made a welcome sight. They had been a long while clawing their way back on course. The last storm had swept them out of sight of land, and sent such waves crashing over the sides of the galley that Sansa had been certain they were all going to drown. Two men had been swept overboard, she had heard old Oswell saying, and another had fallen from the mast and broken his neck.
She had seldom ventured out on deck herself. Her little cabin was dank and cold, but Sansa had been sick for most of the voyage . . . sick with terror, sick with fever, or seasick . . . she could keep nothing down, and even sleep came hard. Whenever she closed her eyes she saw Joffrey tearing at his collar, clawing at the soft skin of his throat, dying with flakes of pie crust on his lips and wine stains on his doublet. And the wind keening in the lines reminded her of the terrible thin sucking sound he’d made as he fought to draw in air. Sometimes she dreamed of Tyrion as well. “He did nothing,” she told Littlefinger once, when he paid a visit to her cabin to see if she were feeling any better.
“He did not kill Joffrey, true, but the dwarf’s hands are far from clean. He had a wife before you, did you know that?”
“He told me.”
“And did he tell you that when he grew bored with her, he made a gift of her to his father’s guardsmen? He might have done the same to you, in time. Shed no tears for the Imp, my lady.”
The wind ran salty fingers through her hair, and Sansa shivered. Even this close to shore, the rolling of the ship made her tummy queasy. She desperately needed a bath and a change of clothes. I must look as haggard as a corpse, and smell of vomit.
Lord Petyr came up beside her, cheerful as ever. “Good morrow. The salt air is bracing, don’t you think? It always sharpens my appetite.” He put a sympathetic arm about her shoulders. “Are you quite well? You look so pale.”
“It’s only my tummy. The seasickness.”
“A little wine will be good for that. We’ll get you a cup, as soon as we’re ashore.” Petyr pointed to where an old flint tower stood outlined against a bleak grey sky, the breakers crashing on the rocks beneath it. “Cheerful, is it not? I fear there’s no safe anchorage here. We’ll put ashore in a boat.”
“Here?” She did not want to go ashore here. The Fingers were a dismal place, she’d heard, and there was something forlorn and desolate about the little tower. “Couldn’t I stay on the ship until we make sail for White Harbor?”
“From here the King turns east for Braavos. Without us.”
“But . . . my lord, you said . . . you said we were sailing home.”
“And there it stands, miserable as it is. My ancestral home. It has no name, I fear. A great lord’s seat ought to have a name, wouldn’t you agree? Winterfell, the Eyrie, Riverrun, those are castles. Lord of Harrenhal now, that has a sweet ring to it, but what was I before? Lord of Sheepshit and Master of the Drearfort? It lacks a certain something.” His grey-green eyes regarded her innocently. “You look distraught. Did you think we were making for Winterfell, sweetling? Winterfell has been taken, burned, and sacked. All those you knew and loved are dead. What northmen who have not fallen to the ironmen are warring amongst themselves. Even the Wall is under attack. Winterfell was the home of your childhood, Sansa, but you are no longer a child. You’re a woman grown, and you need to make your own home.”
“But not here,” she said, dismayed. “It looks so . . .”
“. . . small and bleak and mean? It’s all that, and less. The Fingers are a lovely place, if you happen to be a stone. But have no fear, we shan’t stay more than a fortnight. I expect your aunt is already riding to meet us.” He smiled. “The Lady Lysa and I are to be wed.”
“Wed?” Sansa was stunned. “You and my aunt?”
“The Lord of Harrenhal and the Lady of the Eyrie.”
You said it was my mother you loved. But of course Lady Catelyn was dead, so even if she had loved Petyr secretly and given him her maidenhood, it made no matter now.
“So silent, my lady?” said Petyr. “I was certain you would wish to give me your blessing. It is a rare thing for a boy born heir to stones and sheep pellets to wed the daughter of Hoster Tully and the widow of Jon Arryn.”
“I . . . I pray you will have long years together, and many children, and be very happy in one another.” It had been years since Sansa last saw her mother’s sister. She will be kind to me for my mother’s sake, surely. She’s my own blood. And the Vale of Arryn was beautiful, all the songs said so. Perhaps it would not be so terrible to stay here for a time.
Lothor and old Oswell rowed them ashore. Sansa huddled in the bow under her cloak with the hood drawn up against the wind, wondering what awaited her. Servants emerged from the tower to meet them; a thin old woman and a fat middle-aged one, two ancient white-haired men, and a girl of two or three with a sty on one eye. When they recognized Lord Petyr they knelt on the rocks. “My household,” he said. “I don’t know the child. Another of Kella’s bastards, I suppose. She pops one out every few years.”
The two old men waded out up to their thighs to lift Sansa from the boat so she would not get her skirts wet. Oswell and Lothor splashed their way ashore, as did Littlefinger himself. He gave the old woman a kiss on the cheek and grinned at the younger one. “Who fathered this one, Kella?”
The fat woman laughed. “I can’t rightly say, m’lord. I’m not one for telling them no.”
“And all the local lads are grateful, I am quite sure.”
“It is good to have you home, my lord,” said one old man. He looked to be at least eighty, but he wore a studded brigantine and a longsword at his side. “How long will you be in residence?”
“As short a time as possible, Bryen, have no fear. Is the place habitable just now, would you say?”
“If we knew you was coming we would have laid down fresh rushes, m’lord,” said the crone. “There’s a dung fire burning.”
“Nothing says home like the smell of burning dung.” Petyr turned to Sansa. “Grisel was my wet nurse, but she keeps my castle now. Umfred’s my steward, and Bryen—didn’t I name you captain of the guard the last time I was here?”
“You did, my lord. You said you’d be getting some more men too, but you never did. Me and the dogs stand all the watches.”
“And very well, I’m sure. No one has made off with any of my rocks or sheep pellets, I see that plainly.” Petyr gestured toward the fat woman. “Kella minds my vast herds. How many sheep do I have at present, Kella?”
She had to think a moment. “Three and twenty, m’lord. There was nine and twenty, but Bryen’s dogs killed one and we butchered some others and salted down the meat.”
“Ah, cold salt mutton. I must be home. When I break my fast on gulls’ eggs and seaweed soup, I’ll be certain of it.”
“If you like, m’lord,” said the old woman Grisel.
Lord Petyr made a face. “Come, let’s see if my hall is as dreary as I recall.” He led them up the strand over rocks slick with rotting seaweed. A handful of sheep were wandering about the base of the flint tower, grazing on the thin grass that grew between the sheepfold and thatched stable. Sansa had to step carefully; there were pellets everywhere.
Within, the tower seemed even smaller. An open stone stair wound round the inside wall, from undercroft to roof. Each floor was but a single room. The servants lived and slept in the kitchen at ground level, sharing the space with a huge brindled mastiff and a half-dozen sheep-dogs. Above that was a modest hall, and higher still the bedchamber. There were no windows, but arrowslits were embedded in the outer wall at intervals along the curve of the stair. Above the hearth hung a broken longsword and a battered oaken shield, its paint cracked and flaking.
The device painted on the shield was one Sansa did not know; a grey stone head with fiery eyes, upon a light green field. “My grandfather’s shield,” Petyr explained when he saw her gazing at it. “His own father was born in Braavos and came to the Vale as a sellsword in the hire of Lord Corbray, so my grandfather took the head of the Titan as his sigil when he was knighted.”
“It’s very fierce,” said Sansa.
“Rather too fierce, for an amiable fellow like me,” said Petyr. “I much prefer my mockingbird.”
Oswell made two more trips out to the Merling King to offload provisions. Among the loads he brought ashore were several casks of wine. Petyr poured Sansa a cup, as promised. “Here, my lady, that should help your tummy, I would hope.”
Having solid ground beneath her feet had helped already, but Sansa dutifully lifted the goblet with both hands and took a sip. The wine was very fine; an Arbor vintage, she thought. It tasted of oak and fruit and hot summer nights, the flavors blossoming in her mouth like flowers opening to the sun. She only prayed that she could keep it down. Lord Petyr was being so kind, she did not want to spoil it all by retching on him.
He was studying her over his own goblet, his bright grey-green eyes full of . . . was it amusement? Or something else? Sansa was not certain. “Grisel,” he called to the old woman, “bring some food up. Nothing too heavy, my lady has a tender tummy. Some fruit might serve, perhaps. Oswell’s brought some oranges and pomegranates from the King.”
“Yes, m’lord.”
“Might I have a hot bath as well?” asked Sansa.
“I’ll have Kella draw some water, m’lady.”
Sansa took another sip of wine and tried to think of some polite conversation, but Lord Petyr saved her the effort. When Grisel and the other servants had gone, he said, “Lysa will not come alone. Before she arrives, we must be clear on who you are.”
“Who I . . . I don’t understand.”
“Varys has informers everywhere. If Sansa Stark should be seen in the Vale, the eunuch will know within a moon’s turn, and that would create unfortunate . . . complications. It is not safe to be a Stark just now. So we shall tell Lysa’s people that you are my natural daughter.”
“Natural?” Sansa was aghast. “You mean, a bastard?”
“Well, you can scarcely be my trueborn daughter. I’ve never taken a wife, that’s well known. What should you be called?”
“I . . . I could call myself after my mother . . .”
“Catelyn? A bit too obvious . . . but after my mother, that would serve. Alayne. Do you like it?”
“Alayne is pretty.” Sansa hoped she would remember. “But couldn’t I be the trueborn daughter of some knight in your service? Perhaps he died gallantly in the battle, and . . .”
“I have no gallant knights in my service, Alayne. Such a tale would draw unwanted questions as a corpse draws crows. It is rude to pry into the origins of a man’s natural children, however.” He cocked his head. “So, who are you?”
“Alayne . . . Stone, would it be?” When he nodded, she said, “But who is my mother?”
“Kella?”
“Please no,” she said, mortified.
“I was teasing. Your mother was a gentlewoman of Braavos, daughter of a merchant prince. We met in Gulltown when I had charge of the port. She died giving you birth, and entrusted you to the Faith. I have some devotional books you can look over. Learn to quote from them. Nothing discourages unwanted questions as much as a flow of pious bleating. In any case, at your flowering you decided you did not wish to be a septa and wrote to me. That was the first I knew of your existence.” He fingered his beard. “Do you think you can remember all that?”
“I hope. It will be like playing a game, won’t it?”
“Are you fond of games, Alayne?”
The new name would take some getting used to. “Games? I . . . I suppose it would depend . . .”
Grisel reappeared before he could say more, balancing a large platter. She set it down between them. There were apples and pears and pomegranates, some sad-looking grapes, a huge blood orange. The old woman had brought a round of bread as well, and a crock of butter. Petyr cut a pomegranate in two with his dagger, offering half to Sansa. “You should try and eat, my lady.”
“Thank you, my lord.” Pomegranate seeds were so messy; Sansa chose a pear instead, and took a small delicate bite. It was very ripe. The juice ran down her chin.
Lord Petyr loosened a seed with the point of his dagger. “You must miss your father terribly, I know. Lord Eddard was a brave man, honest and loyal . . . but quite a hopeless player.” He brought the seed to his mouth with the knife. “In King’s Landing, there are two sorts of people. The players and the pieces.”
“And I was a piece?” She dreaded the answer.
“Yes, but don’t let that trouble you. You’re still half a child. Every man’s a piece to start with, and every maid as well. Even some who think they are players.” He ate another seed. “Cersei, for one. She thinks herself sly, but in truth she is utterly predictable. Her strength rests on her beauty, birth, and riches. Only the first of those is truly her own, and it will soon desert her. I pity her then. She wants power, but has no notion what to do with it when she gets it. Everyone wants something, Alayne. And when you know what a man wants you know who he is, and how to move him.”
“As you moved Ser Dontos to poison Joffrey?” It had to have been Dontos, she had concluded.
Littlefinger laughed. “Ser Dontos the Red was a skin of wine with legs. He could never have been trusted with a task of such enormity. He would have bungled it or betrayed me. No, all Dontos had to do was lead you from the castle . . . and make certain you wore your silver hair net.”
The black amethysts. “But . . . if not Dontos, who? Do you have other . . . pieces?”
“You could turn King’s Landing upside down and not find a single man with a mockingbird sewn over his heart, but that does not mean I am friendless.” Petyr went to the steps. “Oswell, come up here and let the Lady Sansa have a look at you.”
The old man appeared a few moments later, grinning and bowing. Sansa eyed him uncertainly. “What am I supposed to see?”
“Do you know him?” asked Petyr.
“No.”
“Look closer.”
She studied the old man’s lined windburnt face, hook nose, white hair, and huge knuckly hands. There was something familiar about him, yet Sansa had to shake her head. “I don’t. I never saw Oswell before I got into his boat, I’m certain.”
Oswell grinned, showing a mouth of crooked teeth. “No, but m’lady might of met my three sons.”
It was the “three sons,” and that smile too. “Kettleblack!” Sansa’s eyes went wide. “You’re a Kettleblack!”
“Aye, m’lady, as it please you.”
“She’s beside herself with joy.” Lord Petyr dismissed him with a wave, and returned to the pomegranate again as Oswell shuffled down the steps. “Tell me, Alayne—which is more dangerous, the dagger brandished by an enemy, or the hidden one pressed to your back by someone you never even see?”
“The hidden dagger.”
“There’s a clever girl.” He smiled, his thin lips bright red from the pomegranate seeds. “When the Imp sent off her guards, the queen had Ser Lancel hire sellswords for her. Lancel found her the Kettleblacks, which delighted your little lord husband, since the lads were in his pay through his man Bronn.” He chuckled. “But it was me who told Oswell to get his sons to King’s Landing when I learned that Bronn was looking for swords. Three hidden daggers, Alayne, now perfectly placed.”
“So one of the Kettleblacks put the poison in Joff’s cup?” Ser Osmund had been near the king all night, she remembered.
“Did I say that?” Lord Petyr cut the blood orange in two with his dagger and offered half to Sansa. “The lads are far too treacherous to be part of any such scheme . . . and Osmund has become especially unreliable since he joined the Kingsguard. That white cloak does things to a man, I find. Even a man like him.” He tilted his chin back and squeezed the blood orange, so the juice ran down into his mouth. “I love the juice but I loathe the sticky fingers,” he complained, wiping his hands. “Clean hands, Sansa. Whatever you do, make certain your hands are clean.”
Sansa spooned up some juice from her own orange. “But if it wasn’t the Kettleblacks and it wasn’t Ser Dontos . . . you weren’t even in the city, and it couldn’t have been Tyrion . . .”
“No more guesses, sweetling?”
She shook her head. “I don’t . . .”
Petyr smiled. “I will wager you that at some point during the evening someone told you that your hair net was crooked and straightened it for you.”
Sansa raised a hand to her mouth. “You cannot mean . . . she wanted to take me to Highgarden, to marry me to her grandson . . .”
“Gentle, pious, good-hearted Willas Tyrell. Be grateful you were spared, he would have bored you spitless. The old woman is not boring, though, I’ll grant her that. A fearsome old harridan, and not near as frail as she pretends. When I came to Highgarden to dicker for Margaery’s hand, she let her lord son bluster while she asked pointed questions about Joffrey’s nature. I praised him to the skies, to be sure . . . whilst my men spread disturbing tales amongst Lord Tyrell’s servants. That is how the game is played.
“I also planted the notion of Ser Loras taking the white. Not that I suggested it, that would have been too crude. But men in my party supplied grisly tales about how the mob had killed Ser Preston Greenfield and raped the Lady Lollys, and slipped a few silvers to Lord Tyrell’s army of singers to sing of Ryam Redwyne, Serwyn of the Mirror Shield, and Prince Aemon the Dragonknight. A harp can be as dangerous as a sword, in the right hands.
“Mace Tyrell actually thought it was his own idea to make Ser Loras’s inclusion in the Kingsguard part of the marriage contract. Who better to protect his daughter than her splendid knightly brother? And it relieved him of the difficult task of trying to find lands and a bride for a third son, never easy, and doubly difficult in Ser Loras’s case.
“Be that as it may. Lady Olenna was not about to let Joff harm her precious darling granddaughter, but unlike her son she also realized that under all his flowers and finery, Ser Loras is as hot-tempered as Jaime Lannister. Toss Joffrey, Margaery, and Loras in a pot, and you’ve got the makings for kingslayer stew. The old woman understood something else as well. Her son was determined to make Margaery a queen, and for that he needed a king . . . but he did not need Joffrey. We shall have another wedding soon, wait and see. Margaery will marry Tommen. She’ll keep her queenly crown and her maidenhead, neither of which she especially wants, but what does that matter? The great western alliance will be preserved . . . for a time, at least.”
Margaery and Tommen. Sansa did not know what to say. She had liked Margaery Tyrell, and her small sharp grandmother as well. She thought wistfully of Highgarden with its courtyards and musicians, and the pleasure barges on the Mander; a far cry from this bleak shore. At least I am safe here. Joffrey is dead, he cannot hurt me anymore, and I am only a bastard girl now. Alayne Stone has no husband and no claim. And her aunt would soon be here as well. The long nightmare of King’s Landing was behind her, and her mockery of a marriage as well. She could make herself a new home here, just as Petyr said.
It was eight long days until Lysa Arryn arrived. On five of them it rained, while Sansa sat bored and restless by the fire, beside the old blind dog. He was too sick and toothless to walk guard with Bryen anymore, and mostly all he did was sleep, but when she patted him he whined and licked her hand, and after that they were fast friends. When the rains let up, Petyr walked with her around his holdings, which took less than half a day. He owned a lot of rocks, just as he had said. There was one place where the tide came jetting up out of a blowhole to shoot thirty feet into the air, and another where someone had chiseled the seven-pointed star of the new gods upon a boulder. Petyr said that marked one of the places the Andals had landed, when they came across the sea to wrest the Vale from the First Men.
Farther inland a dozen families lived in huts of piled stone beside a peat bog. “Mine own smallfolk,” Petyr said, though only the oldest seemed to know him. There was a hermit’s cave on his land as well, but no hermit. “He’s dead now, but when I was a boy my father took me to see him. The man had not washed in forty years, so you can imagine how he smelled, but supposedly he had the gift of prophecy. He groped me a bit and said I would be a great man, and for that my father gave him a skin of wine.” Petyr snorted. “I would have told him the same thing for half a cup.”
Finally, on a grey windy afternoon, Bryen came running back to the tower with his dogs barking at his heels, to announce that riders were approaching from the southwest. “Lysa,” Lord Petyr said. “Come, Alayne, let us greet her.”
They put on their cloaks and waited outside. The riders numbered no more than a score; a very modest escort, for the Lady of the Eyrie. Three maids rode with her, and a dozen household knights in mail and plate. She brought a septon as well, and a handsome singer with a wisp of a mustache and long sandy curls.
Could that be my aunt? Lady Lysa was two years younger than Mother, but this woman looked ten years older. Thick auburn tresses fell down past her waist, but beneath the costly velvet gown and jeweled bodice her body sagged and bulged. Her face was pink and painted, her breasts heavy, her limbs thick. She was taller than Littlefinger, and heavier; nor did she show any grace in the clumsy way she climbed down off her horse.
Petyr knelt to kiss her fingers. “The king’s small council commanded me to woo and win you, my lady. Do you think you might have me for your lord and husband?”
Lady Lysa pooched her lips and pulled him up to plant a kiss upon his cheek. “Oh, mayhaps I could be persuaded.” She giggled. “Have you brought gifts to melt my heart?”
“The king’s peace.”
“Oh, poo to the peace, what else have you brought me?”
“My daughter.” Littlefinger beckoned Sansa forward with a hand. “My lady, allow me to present you Alayne Stone.”
Lysa Arryn did not seem greatly pleased to see her. Sansa did a deep curtsy, her head bowed. “A bastard?” she heard her aunt say. “Petyr, have you been wicked? Who was her mother?”
“The wench is dead. I’d hoped to take Alayne to the Eyrie.”
“What am I to do with her there?”
“I have a few notions,” said Lord Petyr. “But just now I am more interested in what I might do with you, my lady.”
All the sternness melted off her aunt’s round pink face, and for a moment Sansa thought Lysa Arryn was about to cry. “Sweet Petyr, I’ve missed you so, you don’t know, you can’t know. Yohn Royce has been stirring up all sorts of trouble, demanding that I call my banners and go to war. And the others all swarm around me, Hunter and Corbray and that dreadful Nestor Royce, all wanting to wed me and take my son to ward, but none of them truly love me. Only you, Petyr. I’ve dreamed of you so long.”
“And I of you, my lady.” He slid an arm around behind her and kissed her on the neck. “How soon can we be wed?”
“Now,” said Lady Lysa, sighing. “I’ve brought my own septon, and a singer, and mead for the wedding feast.”
“Here?” That did not please him. “I’d sooner wed you at the Eyrie, with your whole court in attendance.”
“Poo to my court. I have waited so long, I could not bear to wait another moment.” She put her arms around him. “I want to share your bed tonight, my sweet. I want us to make another child, a brother for Robert or a sweet little daughter.”
“I dream of that as well, sweetling. Yet there is much to be gained from a great public wedding, with all the Vale—”
“No.” She stamped a foot. “I want you now, this very night. And I must warn you, after all these years of silence and whisperings, I mean to scream when you love me. I am going to scream so loud they’ll hear me in the Eyrie!”
“Perhaps I could bed you now, and wed you later?”
The Lady Lysa giggled like a girl. “Oh, Petyr Baelish, you are so wicked. No, I say no, I am the Lady of the Eyrie, and I command you to wed me this very moment!”
Petyr gave a shrug. “As my lady commands, then. I am helpless before you, as ever.”
They said their vows within the hour, standing beneath a sky-blue canopy as the sun sank in the west. Afterward trestle tables were set up beneath the small flint tower, and they feasted on quail, venison, and roast boar, washing it down with a fine light mead. Torches were lit as dusk crept in. Lysa’s singer played “The Vow Unspoken” and “Seasons of My Love” and “Two Hearts That Beat as One.” Several younger knights even asked Sansa to dance. Her aunt danced as well, her skirts whirling when Petyr spun her in his arms. Mead and marriage had taken years off Lady Lysa. She laughed at everything so long as she held her husband’s hand, and her eyes seemed to glow whenever she looked at him.
When it was time for the bedding, her knights carried her up to the tower, stripping her as they went and shouting bawdy jests. Tyrion spared me that, Sansa remembered. It would not have been so bad being undressed for a man she loved, by friends who loved them both. By Joffrey, though . . . She shuddered.
Her aunt had brought only three ladies with her, so they pressed Sansa to help them undress Lord Petyr and march him up to his marriage bed. He submitted with good grace and a wicked tongue, giving as good as he got. By the time they had gotten him into the tower and out of his clothes, the other women were flushed, with laces unlaced, kirtles crooked, and skirts in disarray. But Littlefinger only smiled at Sansa as they marched him up to the bedchamber where his lady wife was waiting.
Lady Lysa and Lord Petyr had the third-story bedchamber to themselves, but the tower was small . . . and true to her word, her aunt screamed. It had begun to rain outside, driving the feasters into the hall one floor below, so they heard most every word. “Petyr,” her aunt moaned. “Oh, Petyr, Petyr, sweet Petyr, oh oh oh. There, Petyr, there. That’s where you belong.” Lady Lysa’s singer launched into a bawdy version of “Milady’s Supper,” but even his singing and playing could not drown out Lysa’s cries. “Make me a baby, Petyr,” she screamed, “make me another sweet little baby. Oh, Petyr, my precious, my precious, PEEEEEETYR!” Her last shriek was so loud that it set the dogs to barking, and two of her aunt’s ladies could scarce contain their mirth.
Sansa went down the steps and out into the night. A light rain was falling on the remains of the feast, but the air smelled fresh and clean. The memory of her own wedding night with Tyrion was much with her. In the dark, I am the Knight of Flowers, he had said. I could be good to you. But that was only another Lannister lie. A dog can smell a lie, you know, the Hound had told her once. She could almost hear the rough rasp of his voice. Look around you, and take a good whiff. They’re all liars here, and every one better than you. She wondered what had become of Sandor Clegane. Did he know that they’d killed Joffrey? Would he care? He had been the prince’s sworn shield for years.
She stayed outside for a long time. When at last she sought her own bed, wet and chilled, only the dim glow of a peat fire lit the darkened hall. There was no sound from above. The young singer sat in a corner, playing a slow song to himself. One of her aunt’s maids was kissing a knight in Lord Petyr’s chair, their hands busy beneath each other’s clothing. Several men had drunk themselves to sleep, and one was in the privy, being noisily sick. Sansa found Bryen’s old blind dog in her little alcove beneath the steps, and lay down next to him. He woke and licked her face. “You sad old hound,” she said, ruffling his fur.
“Alayne.” Her aunt’s singer stood over her. “Sweet Alayne. I am Marillion. I saw you come in from the rain. The night is chill and wet. Let me warm you.”
The old dog raised his head and growled, but the singer gave him a cuff and sent him slinking off, whimpering.
“Marillion?” she said, uncertain. “You are . . . kind to think of me, but . . . pray forgive me. I am very tired.”
“And very beautiful. All night I have been making songs for you in my head. A lay for your eyes, a ballad for your lips, a duet to your breasts. I will not sing them, though. They were poor things, unworthy of such beauty.” He sat on her bed and put his hand on her leg. “Let me sing to you with my body instead.”
She caught a whiff of his breath. “You’re drunk.”
“I never get drunk. Mead only makes me merry. I am on fire.” His hand slipped up to her thigh. “And you as well.”
“Unhand me. You forget yourself.”
“Mercy. I have been singing love songs for hours. My blood is stirred. And yours, I know . . . there’s no wench half so lusty as one bastard born. Are you wet for me?”
“I’m a maiden,” she protested.
“Truly? Oh, Alayne, Alayne, my fair maid, give me the gift of your innocence. You will thank the gods you did. I’ll have you singing louder than the Lady Lysa.”
Sansa jerked away from him, frightened. “If you don’t leave me, my au—my father will hang you. Lord Petyr.”
“Littlefinger?” He chuckled. “Lady Lysa loves me well, and I am Lord Robert’s favorite. If your father offends me, I will destroy him with a verse.” He put a hand on her breast, and squeezed. “Let’s get you out of these wet clothes. You wouldn’t want them ripped, I know. Come, sweet lady, heed your heart—”
Sansa heard the soft sound of steel on leather. “Singer,” a rough voice said, “best go, if you want to sing again.” The light was dim, but she saw a faint glimmer of a blade.
The singer saw it too. “Find your own wench—” The knife flashed, and he cried out. “You cut me!”
“I’ll do worse, if you don’t go.”
And quick as that, Marillion was gone. The other remained, looming over Sansa in the darkness. “Lord Petyr said watch out for you.” It was Lothor Brune’s voice, she realized. Not the Hound’s, no, how could it be? Of course it had to be Lothor . . . 
That night Sansa scarcely slept at all, but tossed and turned just as she had aboard the Merling King. She dreamt of Joffrey dying, but as he clawed at his throat and the blood ran down across his fingers she saw with horror that it was her brother Robb. And she dreamed of her wedding night too, of Tyrion’s eyes devouring her as she undressed. Only then he was bigger than Tyrion had any right to be, and when he climbed into the bed his face was scarred only on one side. “I’ll have a song from you,” he rasped, and Sansa woke and found the old blind dog beside her once again. “I wish that you were Lady,” she said.
Come the morning, Grisel climbed up to the bedchamber to serve the lord and lady a tray of morning bread, with butter, honey, fruit, and cream. She returned to say that Alayne was wanted. Sansa was still drowsy from sleep. It took her a moment to remember that she was Alayne.
Lady Lysa was still abed, but Lord Petyr was up and dressed. “Your aunt wishes to speak with you,” he told Sansa, as he pulled on a boot. “I’ve told her who you are.”
Gods be good. “I . . . I thank you, my lord.”
Petyr yanked on the other boot. “I’ve had about as much home as I can stomach. We’ll leave for the Eyrie this afternoon.” He kissed his lady wife and licked a smear of honey off her lips, then headed down the steps.
Sansa stood by the foot of the bed while her aunt ate a pear and studied her. “I see it now,” the Lady Lysa said, as she set the core aside. “You look so much like Catelyn.”
“It’s kind of you to say so.”
“It was not meant as flattery. If truth be told, you look too much like Catelyn. Something must be done. We shall darken your hair before we bring you back to the Eyrie, I think.”
Darken my hair? “If it please you, Aunt Lysa.”
“You must not call me that. No word of your presence here must be allowed to reach King’s Landing. I do not mean to have my son endangered.” She nibbled the corner of a honeycomb. “I have kept the Vale out of this war. Our harvest has been plentiful, the mountains protect us, and the Eyrie is impregnable. Even so, it would not do to draw Lord Tywin’s wroth down upon us.” Lysa set the comb down and licked honey from her fingers. “You were wed to Tyrion Lannister, Petyr says. That vile dwarf.”
“They made me marry him. I never wanted it.”
“No more than I did,” her aunt said. “Jon Arryn was no dwarf, but he was old. You may not think so to see me now, but on the day we wed I was so lovely I put your mother to shame. But all Jon desired was my father’s swords, to aid his darling boys. I should have refused him, but he was such an old man, how long could he live? Half his teeth were gone, and his breath smelled like bad cheese. I cannot abide a man with foul breath. Petyr’s breath is always fresh . . . he was the first man I ever kissed, you know. My father said he was too lowborn, but I knew how high he’d rise. Jon gave him the customs for Gulltown to please me, but when he increased the incomes tenfold my lord husband saw how clever he was and gave him other appointments, even brought him to King’s Landing to be master of coin. That was hard, to see him every day and still be wed to that old cold man. Jon did his duty in the bedchamber, but he could no more give me pleasure than he could give me children. His seed was old and weak. All my babies died but Robert, three girls and two boys. All my sweet little babies dead, and that old man just went on and on with his stinking breath. So you see, I have suffered too.” Lady Lysa sniffed. “You do know that your poor mother is dead?”
“Tyrion told me,” said Sansa. “He said the Freys murdered her at The Twins, with Robb.”
Tears welled suddenly in Lady Lysa’s eyes. “We are women alone now, you and I. Are you afraid, child? Be brave. I would never turn away Cat’s daughter. We are bound by blood.” She beckoned Sansa closer. “You may come kiss my cheek, Alayne.”
Dutifully she approached and knelt beside the bed. Her aunt was drenched in sweet scent, though under that was a sour milky smell. Her cheek tasted of paint and powder.
As Sansa stepped back, Lady Lysa caught her wrist. “Now tell me,” she said sharply. “Are you with child? The truth now, I will know if you lie.”
“No,” she said, startled by the question.
“You are a woman flowered, are you not?”
“Yes.” Sansa knew the truth of her flowering could not be long hidden in the Eyrie. “Tyrion didn’t . . . he never . . .” She could feel the blush creeping up her cheeks. “I am still a maid.”
“Was the dwarf incapable?”
“No. He was only . . . he was . . .” Kind? She could not say that, not here, not to this aunt who hated him so. “He . . . he had whores, my lady. He told me so.”
“Whores.” Lysa released her wrist. “Of course he did. What woman would bed such a creature, but for gold? I should have killed the Imp when he was in my power, but he tricked me. He is full of low cunning, that one. His sellsword slew my good Ser Vardis Egen. Catelyn should not have brought him here, I told her that. She made off with our uncle too. That was wrong of her. The Blackfish was my Knight of the Gate, and since he left us the mountain clans are growing very bold. Petyr will soon set all that to rights, though. I shall make him Lord Protector of the Vale.” Her aunt smiled for the first time, almost warmly. “He may not look as tall or strong as some, but he is worth more than all of them. Trust in him and do as he says.”
“I shall, Aunt . . . my lady.”
Lady Lysa seemed pleased by that. “I knew that boy Joffrey. He used to call my Robert cruel names, and once he slapped him with a wooden sword. A man will tell you poison is dishonorable, but a woman’s honor is different. The Mother shaped us to protect our children, and our only dishonor is in failure. You’ll know that, when you have a child.”
“A child?” said Sansa, uncertainly.
Lysa waved a hand negligently. “Not for many years. You are too young to be a mother. One day you shall want children, though. Just as you will want to marry.”
“I . . . I am married, my lady.”
“Yes, but soon a widow. Be glad the Imp preferred his whores. It would not be fitting for my son to take that dwarf’s leavings, but as he never touched you . . . How would you like to marry your cousin, the Lord Robert?”
The thought made Sansa weary. All she knew of Robert Arryn was that he was a little boy, and sickly. It is not me she wants her son to marry, it is my claim. No one will ever marry me for love. But lying came easy to her now. “I . . . can scarcely wait to meet him, my lady. But he is still a child, is he not?”
“He is eight. And not robust. But such a good boy, so bright and clever. He will be a great man, Alayne. The seed is strong, my lord husband said before he died. His last words. The gods sometimes let us glimpse the future as we lay dying. I see no reason why you should not be wed as soon as we know that your Lannister husband is dead. A secret wedding, to be sure. The Lord of the Eyrie could scarcely be thought to have married a bastard, that would not be fitting. The ravens should bring us the word from King’s Landing once the Imp’s head rolls. You and Robert can be wed the next day, won’t that be joyous? It will be good for him to have a little companion. He played with Vardis Egen’s boy when we first returned to the Eyrie, and my steward’s sons as well, but they were much too rough and I had no choice but to send them away. Do you read well, Alayne?”
“Septa Mordane was good enough to say so.”
“Robert has weak eyes, but he loves to be read to,” Lady Lysa confided. “He likes stories about animals the best. Do you know the little song about the chicken who dressed as a fox? I sing him that all the time, he never grows tired of it. And he likes to play hopfrog and spin-the-sword and come-into-my-castle, but you must always let him win. That’s only proper, don’t you think? He is the Lord of the Eyrie, after all, you must never forget that. You are well born, and the Starks of Winterfell were always proud, but Winterfell has fallen and you are really just a beggar now, so put that pride aside. Gratitude will better become you, in your present circumstances. Yes, and obedience. My son will have a grateful and obedient wife.”

She awoke all at once, every nerve atingle. For a moment she did not remember where she was. She had dreamt that she was little, still sharing a bedchamber with her sister Arya. But it was her maid she heard tossing in sleep, not her sister, and this was not Winterfell, but the Eyrie. And I am Alayne Stone, a bastard girl. The room was cold and black, though she was warm beneath the blankets. Dawn had not yet come. Sometimes she dreamed of Ser Ilyn Payne and woke with her heart thumping, but this dream had not been like that. Home. It was a dream of home.
The Eyrie was no home. It was no bigger than Maegor’s Holdfast, and outside its sheer white walls was only the mountain and the long treacherous descent past Sky and Snow and Stone to the Gates of the Moon on the valley floor. There was no place to go and little to do. The older servants said these halls rang with laughter when her father and Robert Baratheon had been Jon Arryn’s wards, but those days were many years gone. Her aunt kept a small household, and seldom permitted any guests to ascend past the Gates of the Moon. Aside from her aged maid, Sansa’s only companion was the Lord Robert, eight going on three.
And Marillion. There is always Marillion. When he played for them at supper, the young singer often seemed to be singing directly at her. Her aunt was far from pleased. Lady Lysa doted on Marillion, and had banished two serving girls and even a page for telling lies about him.
Lysa was as lonely as she was. Her new husband seemed to spend more time at the foot of the mountain than he did atop it. He was gone now, had been gone the past four days, meeting with the Corbrays. From bits and pieces of overheard conversations Sansa knew that Jon Arryn’s bannermen resented Lysa’s marriage and begrudged Petyr his authority as Lord Protector of the Vale. The senior branch of House Royce was close to open revolt over her aunt’s failure to aid Robb in his war, and the Waynwoods, Redforts, Belmores, and Templetons were giving them every support. The mountain clans were being troublesome as well, and old Lord Hunter had died so suddenly that his two younger sons were accusing their elder brother of having murdered him. The Vale of Arryn might have been spared the worst of the war, but it was hardly the idyllic place that Lady Lysa had made it out to be.
I am not going back to sleep, Sansa realized. My head is all a tumult. She pushed her pillow away reluctantly, threw back the blankets, went to her window, and opened the shutters.
Snow was falling on the Eyrie.
Outside the flakes drifted down as soft and silent as memory. Was this what woke me? Already the snowfall lay thick upon the garden below, blanketing the grass, dusting the shrubs and statues with white and weighing down the branches of the trees. The sight took Sansa back to cold nights long ago, in the long summer of her childhood.
She had last seen snow the day she’d left Winterfell. That was a lighter fall than this, she remembered. Robb had melting flakes in his hair when he hugged me, and the snowball Arya tried to make kept coming apart in her hands. It hurt to remember how happy she had been that morning. Hullen had helped her mount, and she’d ridden out with the snowflakes swirling around her, off to see the great wide world. I thought my song was beginning that day, but it was almost done.
Sansa left the shutters open as she dressed. It would be cold, she knew, though the Eyrie’s towers encircled the garden and protected it from the worst of the mountain winds. She donned silken smallclothes and a linen shift, and over that a warm dress of blue lambswool. Two pairs of hose for her legs, boots that laced up to her knees, heavy leather gloves, and finally a hooded cloak of soft white fox fur.
Her maid rolled herself more tightly in her blanket as the snow began to drift in the window. Sansa eased open the door, and made her way down the winding stair. When she opened the door to the garden, it was so lovely that she held her breath, unwilling to disturb such perfect beauty. The snow drifted down and down, all in ghostly silence, and lay thick and unbroken on the ground. All color had fled the world outside. It was a place of whites and blacks and greys. White towers and white snow and white statues, black shadows and black trees, the dark grey sky above. A pure world, Sansa thought. I do not belong here.
Yet she stepped out all the same. Her boots tore ankle-deep holes into the smooth white surface of the snow, yet made no sound. Sansa drifted past frosted shrubs and thin dark trees, and wondered if she were still dreaming. Drifting snowflakes brushed her face as light as lover’s kisses, and melted on her cheeks. At the center of the garden, beside the statue of the weeping woman that lay broken and half-buried on the ground, she turned her face up to the sky and closed her eyes. She could feel the snow on her lashes, taste it on her lips. It was the taste of Winterfell. The taste of innocence. The taste of dreams.
When Sansa opened her eyes again, she was on her knees. She did not remember falling. It seemed to her that the sky was a lighter shade of grey. Dawn, she thought. Another day. Another new day. It was the old days she hungered for. Prayed for. But who could she pray to? The garden had been meant for a godswood once, she knew, but the soil was too thin and stony for a weirwood to take root. A godswood without gods, as empty as me.
She scooped up a handful of snow and squeezed it between her fingers. Heavy and wet, the snow packed easily. Sansa began to make snowballs, shaping and smoothing them until they were round and white and perfect. She remembered a summer’s snow in Winterfell when Arya and Bran had ambushed her as she emerged from the keep one morning. They’d each had a dozen snowballs to hand, and she’d had none. Bran had been perched on the roof of the covered bridge, out of reach, but Sansa had chased Arya through the stables and around the kitchen until both of them were breathless. She might even have caught her, but she’d slipped on some ice. Her sister came back to see if she was hurt. When she said she wasn’t, Arya hit her in the face with another snowball, but Sansa grabbed her leg and pulled her down and was rubbing snow in her hair when Jory came along and pulled them apart, laughing.
What do I want with snowballs? She looked at her sad little arsenal. There’s no one to throw them at. She let the one she was making drop from her hand. I could build a snow knight instead, she thought. Or even . . . 
She pushed two of her snowballs together, added a third, packed more snow in around them, and patted the whole thing into the shape of a cylinder. When it was done, she stood it on end and used the tip of her little finger to poke holes in it for windows. The crenellations around the top took a little more care, but when they were done she had a tower. I need some walls now, Sansa thought, and then a keep. She set to work.
The snow fell and the castle rose. Two walls ankle-high, the inner taller than the outer. Towers and turrets, keeps and stairs, a round kitchen, a square armory, the stables along the inside of the west wall. It was only a castle when she began, but before very long Sansa knew it was Winterfell. She found twigs and fallen branches beneath the snow and broke off the ends to make the trees for the godswood. For the gravestones in the lichyard she used bits of bark. Soon her gloves and her boots were crusty white, her hands were tingling, and her feet were soaked and cold, but she did not care. The castle was all that mattered. Some things were hard to remember, but most came back to her easily, as if she had been there only yesterday. The Library Tower, with the steep stonework stair twisting about its exterior. The gatehouse, two huge bulwarks, the arched gate between them, crenellations all along the top . . . 
And all the while the snow kept falling, piling up in drifts around her buildings as fast as she raised them. She was patting down the pitched roof of the Great Hall when she heard a voice, and looked up to see her maid calling from her window. Was my lady well? Did she wish to break her fast? Sansa shook her head, and went back to shaping snow, adding a chimney to one end of the Great Hall, where the hearth would stand inside.
Dawn stole into her garden like a thief. The grey of the sky grew lighter still, and the trees and shrubs turned a dark green beneath their stoles of snow. A few servants came out and watched her for a time, but she paid them no mind and they soon went back inside where it was warmer. Sansa saw Lady Lysa gazing down from her balcony, wrapped up in a blue velvet robe trimmed with fox fur, but when she looked again her aunt was gone. Maester Colemon popped out of the rookery and peered down for a while, skinny and shivering but curious.
Her bridges kept falling down. There was a covered bridge between the armory and the main keep, and another that went from the fourth floor of the bell tower to the second floor of the rookery, but no matter how carefully she shaped them, they would not hold together. The third time one collapsed on her, she cursed aloud and sat back in helpless frustration.
“Pack the snow around a stick, Sansa.”
She did not know how long he had been watching her, or when he had returned from the Vale. “A stick?” she asked.
“That will give it strength enough to stand, I’d think,” Petyr said. “May I come into your castle, my lady?”
Sansa was wary. “Don’t break it. Be . . .”
“. . . gentle?” He smiled. “Winterfell has withstood fiercer enemies than me. It is Winterfell, is it not?”
“Yes,” Sansa admitted.
He walked along outside the walls. “I used to dream of it, in those years after Cat went north with Eddard Stark. In my dreams it was ever a dark place, and cold.”
“No. It was always warm, even when it snowed. Water from the hot springs is piped through the walls to warm them, and inside the glass gardens it was always like the hottest day of summer.” She stood, towering over the great white castle. “I can’t think how to do the glass roof over the gardens.”
Littlefinger stroked his chin, where his beard had been before Lysa had asked him to shave it off. “The glass was locked in frames, no? Twigs are your answer. Peel them and cross them and use bark to tie them together into frames. I’ll show you.” He moved through the garden, gathering up twigs and sticks and shaking the snow from them. When he had enough, he stepped over both walls with a single long stride and squatted on his heels in the middle of the yard. Sansa came closer to watch what he was doing. His hands were deft and sure, and before long he had a crisscrossing latticework of twigs, very like the one that roofed the glass gardens of Winterfell. “We will need to imagine the glass, to be sure,” he said when he gave it to her.
“This is just right,” she said.
He touched her face. “And so is that.”
Sansa did not understand. “And so is what?”
“Your smile, my lady. Shall I make another for you?”
“If you would.”
“Nothing could please me more.”
She raised the walls of the glass gardens while Littlefinger roofed them over, and when they were done with that he helped her extend the walls and build the guardshall. When she used sticks for the covered bridges, they stood, just as he had said they would. The First Keep was simple enough, an old round drum tower, but Sansa was stymied again when it came to putting the gargoyles around the top. Again he had the answer. “It’s been snowing on your castle, my lady,” he pointed out. “What do the gargoyles look like when they’re covered with snow?”
Sansa closed her eyes to see them in memory. “They’re just white lumps.”
“Well, then. Gargoyles are hard, but white lumps should be easy.” And they were.
The Broken Tower was easier still. They made a tall tower together, kneeling side by side to roll it smooth, and when they’d raised it Sansa stuck her fingers through the top, grabbed a handful of snow, and flung it full in his face. Petyr yelped, as the snow slid down under his collar. “That was unchivalrously done, my lady.”
“As was bringing me here, when you swore to take me home.”
She wondered where this courage had come from, to speak to him so frankly. From Winterfell, she thought. I am stronger within the walls of Winterfell.
His face grew serious. “Yes, I played you false in that . . . and in one other thing as well.”
Sansa’s stomach was aflutter. “What other thing?”
“I told you that nothing could please me more than to help you with your castle. I fear that was a lie as well. Something else would please me more.” He stepped closer. “This.”
Sansa tried to step back, but he pulled her into his arms and suddenly he was kissing her. Feebly, she tried to squirm, but only succeeded in pressing herself more tightly against him. His mouth was on hers, swallowing her words. He tasted of mint. For half a heartbeat she yielded to his kiss . . . before she turned her face away and wrenched free. “What are you doing?”
Petyr straightened his cloak. “Kissing a snow maid.”
“You’re supposed to kiss her.” Sansa glanced up at Lysa’s balcony, but it was empty now. “Your lady wife.”
“I do. Lysa has no cause for complaint.” He smiled. “I wish you could see yourself, my lady. You are so beautiful. You’re crusted over with snow like some little bear cub, but your face is flushed and you can scarcely breathe. How long have you been out here? You must be very cold. Let me warm you, Sansa. Take off those gloves, give me your hands.”
“I won’t.” He sounded almost like Marillion, the night he’d gotten so drunk at the wedding. Only this time Lothor Brune would not appear to save her; Ser Lothor was Petyr’s man. “You shouldn’t kiss me. I might have been your own daughter . . .”
“Might have been,” he admitted, with a rueful smile. “But you’re not, are you? You are Eddard Stark’s daughter, and Cat’s. But I think you might be even more beautiful than your mother was, when she was your age.”
“Petyr, please.” Her voice sounded so weak. “Please . . .”
“A castle!”
The voice was loud, shrill, and childish. Littlefinger turned away from her. “Lord Robert.” He sketched a bow. “Should you be out in the snow without your gloves?”
“Did you make the snow castle, Lord Littlefinger?”
“Alayne did most of it, my lord.”
Sansa said, “It’s meant to be Winterfell.”
“Winterfell?” Robert was small for eight, a stick of a boy with splotchy skin and eyes that were always runny. Under one arm he clutched the threadbare cloth doll he carried everywhere.
“Winterfell is the seat of House Stark,” Sansa told her husband-to-be. “The great castle of the north.”
“It’s not so great.” The boy knelt before the gatehouse. “Look, here comes a giant to knock it down.” He stood his doll in the snow and moved it jerkily. “Tromp tromp I’m a giant, I’m a giant,” he chanted. “Ho ho ho, open your gates or I’ll mash them and smash them.” Swinging the doll by the legs, he knocked the top off one gatehouse tower and then the other.
It was more than Sansa could stand. “Robert, stop that.” Instead he swung the doll again, and a foot of wall exploded. She grabbed for his hand but she caught the doll instead. There was a loud ripping sound as the thin cloth tore. Suddenly she had the doll’s head, Robert had the legs and body, and the rag-and-sawdust stuffing was spilling in the snow.
Lord Robert’s mouth trembled. “You killlllllllled him,” he wailed. Then he began to shake. It started with no more than a little shivering, but within a few short heartbeats he had collapsed across the castle, his limbs flailing about violently. White towers and snowy bridges shattered and fell on all sides. Sansa stood horrified, but Petyr Baelish seized her cousin’s wrists and shouted for the maester.
Guards and serving girls arrived within instants to help restrain the boy, Maester Colemon a short time later. Robert Arryn’s shaking sickness was nothing new to the people of the Eyrie, and Lady Lysa had trained them all to come rushing at the boy’s first cry. The maester held the little lord’s head and gave him half a cup of dreamwine, murmuring soothing words. Slowly the violence of the fit seemed to ebb away, till nothing remained but a small shaking of the hands. “Help him to my chambers,” Colemon told the guards. “A leeching will help calm him.”
“It was my fault.” Sansa showed them the doll’s head. “I ripped his doll in two. I never meant to, but . . .”
“His lordship was destroying the castle,” said Petyr.
“A giant,” the boy whispered, weeping. “It wasn’t me, it was a giant hurt the castle. She killed him! I hate her! She’s a bastard and I hate her! I don’t want to be leeched!”
“My lord, your blood needs thinning,” said Maester Colemon. “It is the bad blood that makes you angry, and the rage that brings on the shaking. Come now.”
They led the boy away. My lord husband, Sansa thought, as she contemplated the ruins of Winterfell. The snow had stopped, and it was colder than before. She wondered if Lord Robert would shake all through their wedding. At least Joffrey was sound of body. A mad rage seized hold of her. She picked up a broken branch and smashed the torn doll’s head down on top of it, then pushed it down atop the shattered gatehouse of her snow castle. The servants looked aghast, but when Littlefinger saw what she’d done he laughed. “If the tales be true, that’s not the first giant to end up with his head on Winterfell’s walls.”
“Those are only stories,” she said, and left him there.
Back in her bedchamber, Sansa took off her cloak and her wet boots and sat beside the fire. She had no doubt that she would be made to answer for Lord Robert’s fit. Perhaps Lady Lysa will send me away. Her aunt was quick to banish anyone who displeased her, and nothing displeased her quite so much as people she suspected of mistreating her son.
Sansa would have welcomed banishment. The Gates of the Moon was much larger than the Eyrie, and livelier as well. Lord Nestor Royce seemed gruff and stern, but his daughter Myranda kept his castle for him, and everyone said how frolicsome she was. Even Sansa’s supposed bastardy might not count too much against her below. One of King Robert’s baseborn daughters was in service to Lord Nestor, and she and the Lady Myranda were said to be fast friends, as close as sisters.
I will tell my aunt that I don’t want to marry Robert. Not even the High Septon himself could declare a woman married if she refused to say the vows. She wasn’t a beggar, no matter what her aunt said. She was thirteen, a woman flowered and wed, the heir to Winterfell. Sansa felt sorry for her little cousin sometimes, but she could not imagine ever wanting to be his wife. I would sooner be married to Tyrion again. If Lady Lysa knew that, surely she’d send her away . . . away from Robert’s pouts and shakes and runny eyes, away from Marillion’s lingering looks, away from Petyr’s kisses. I will tell her. I will!
It was late that afternoon when Lady Lysa summoned her. Sansa had been marshaling her courage all day, but no sooner did Marillion appear at her door than all her doubts returned. “Lady Lysa requires your presence in the High Hall.” The singer’s eyes undressed her as he spoke, but she was used to that.
Marillion was comely, there was no denying it; boyish and slender, with smooth skin, sandy hair, a charming smile. But he had made himself well hated in the Vale, by everyone but her aunt and little Lord Robert. To hear the servants talk, Sansa was not the first maid to suffer his advances, and the others had not had Lothor Brune to defend them. But Lady Lysa would hear no complaints against him. Since coming to the Eyrie, the singer had become her favorite. He sang Lord Robert to sleep every night, and tweaked the noses of Lady Lysa’s suitors with verses that made mock of their foibles. Her aunt had showered him with gold and gifts; costly clothes, a gold arm ring, a belt studded with moonstones, a fine horse. She had even given him her late husband’s favorite falcon. It all served to make Marillion unfailingly courteous in Lady Lysa’s presence, and unfailingly arrogant outside it.
“Thank you,” Sansa told him stiffly. “I know the way.”
He would not leave. “My lady said to bring you.”
Bring me? She did not like the sound of that. “Are you a guardsman now?” Littlefinger had dismissed the Eyrie’s captain of guards and put Ser Lothor Brune in his place.
“Do you require guarding?” Marillion said lightly. “I am composing a new song, you should know. A song so sweet and sad it will melt even your frozen heart. ‘The Roadside Rose,’ I mean to call it. About a baseborn girl so beautiful she bewitched every man who laid eyes upon her.”
I am a Stark of Winterfell, she longed to tell him. Instead she nodded, and let him escort her down the tower steps and along a bridge. The High Hall had been closed as long as she’d been at the Eyrie. Sansa wondered why her aunt had opened it. Normally she preferred the comfort of her solar, or the cozy warmth of Lord Arryn’s audience chamber with its view of the waterfall.
Two guards in sky-blue cloaks flanked the carved wooden doors of the High Hall, spears in hand. “No one is to enter so long as Alayne is with Lady Lysa,” Marillion told them.
“Aye.” The men let them pass, then crossed their spears. Marillion swung the doors shut and barred them with a third spear, longer and thicker than those the guards had borne.
Sansa felt a prickle of unease. “Why did you do that?”
“My lady awaits you.”
She looked about uncertainly. Lady Lysa sat on the dais in a high-backed chair of carved weirwood, alone. To her right was a second chair, taller than her own, with a stack of blue cushions piled on the seat, but Lord Robert was not in it. Sansa hoped he’d recovered. Marillion was not like to tell her, though.
Sansa walked down the blue silk carpet between rows of fluted pillars slim as lances. The floors and walls of the High Hall were made of milk-white marble veined with blue. Shafts of pale daylight slanted down through narrow arched windows along the eastern wall. Between the windows were torches, mounted in high iron sconces, but none of them was lit. Her footsteps fell softly on the carpet. Outside the wind blew cold and lonely.
Amidst so much white marble even the sunlight looked chilly, somehow . . . though not half so chilly as her aunt. Lady Lysa had dressed in a gown of cream-colored velvet and a necklace of sapphires and moon-stones. Her auburn hair had been done up in a thick braid, and fell across one shoulder. She sat in the high seat watching her niece approach, her face red and puffy beneath the paint and powder. On the wall behind her hung a huge banner, the moon-and-falcon of House Arryn in cream and blue.
Sansa stopped before the dais, and curtsied. “My lady. You sent for me.” She could still hear the sound of the wind, and the soft chords Marillion was playing at the foot of the hall.
“I saw what you did,” the Lady Lysa said.
Sansa smoothed down the folds of her skirt. “I trust Lord Robert is better? I never meant to rip his doll. He was smashing my snow castle, I only . . .”
“Will you play the coy deceiver with me?” her aunt said. “I was not speaking of Robert’s doll. I saw you kissing him.”
The High Hall seemed to grow a little colder. The walls and floor and columns might have turned to ice. “He kissed me.”
Lysa’s nostrils flared. “And why would he do that? He has a wife who loves him. A woman grown, not a little girl. He has no need for the likes of you. Confess, child. You threw yourself at him. That was the way of it.”
Sansa took a step backward. “That’s not true.”
“Where are you going? Are you afraid? Such wanton behavior must be punished, but I will not be hard on you. We keep a whipping boy for Robert, as is the custom in the Free Cities. His health is too delicate for him to bear the rod himself. I shall find some common girl to take your whipping, but first you must own up to what you’ve done. I cannot abide a liar, Alayne.”
“I was building a snow castle,” Sansa said. “Lord Petyr was helping me, and then he kissed me. That’s what you saw.”
“Have you no honor?” her aunt said sharply. “Or do you take me for a fool? You do, don’t you? You take me for a fool. Yes, I see that now. I am not a fool. You think you can have any man you want because you’re young and beautiful. Don’t think I haven’t seen the looks you give Marillion. I know everything that happens in the Eyrie, little lady. And I have known your like before, too. But you are mistaken if you think big eyes and strumpet’s smiles will win you Petyr. He is mine.” She rose to her feet. “They all tried to take him from me. My lord father, my husband, your mother . . . Catelyn most of all. She liked to kiss my Petyr too, oh yes she did.”
Sansa retreated another step. “My mother?”
“Yes, your mother, your precious mother, my own sweet sister Catelyn. Don’t you think to play the innocent with me, you vile little liar. All those years in Riverrun, she played with Petyr as if he were her little toy. She teased him with smiles and soft words and wanton looks, and made his nights a torment.”
“No.” My mother is dead, she wanted to shriek. She was your own sister, and she’s dead. “She didn’t. She wouldn’t.”
“How would you know? Were you there?” Lysa descended from the high seat, her skirts swirling. “Did you come with Lord Bracken and Lord Blackwood, the time they visited to lay their feud before my father? Lord Bracken’s singer played for us, and Catelyn danced six dances with Petyr that night, six, I counted. When the lords began to argue my father took them up to his audience chamber, so there was no one to stop us drinking. Edmure got drunk, young as he was . . . and Petyr tried to kiss your mother, only she pushed him away. She laughed at him. He looked so wounded I thought my heart would burst, and afterward he drank until he passed out at the table. Uncle Brynden carried him up to bed before my father could find him like that. But you remember none of it, do you?” She looked down angrily. “Do you?”
Is she drunk, or mad? “I was not born, my lady.”
“You were not born. But I was, so do not presume to tell what is true. I know what is true. You kissed him!”
“He kissed me,” Sansa insisted again. “I never wanted—”
“Be quiet, I haven’t given you leave to speak. You enticed him, just as your mother did that night in Riverrun, with her smiles and her dancing. You think I could forget? That was the night I stole up to his bed to give him comfort. I bled, but it was the sweetest hurt. He told me he loved me then, but he called me Cat, just before he fell back to sleep. Even so, I stayed with him until the sky began to lighten. Your mother did not deserve him. She would not even give him her favor to wear when he fought Brandon Stark. I would have given him my favor. I gave him everything. He is mine now. Not Catelyn’s and not yours.”
All of Sansa’s resolve had withered in the face of her aunt’s onslaught. Lysa Arryn was frightening her as much as Queen Cersei ever had. “He’s yours, my lady,” she said, trying to sound meek and contrite. “May I have your leave to go?”
“You may not.” Her aunt’s breath smelled of wine. “If you were anyone else, I would banish you. Send you down to Lord Nestor at the Gates of the Moon, or back to the Fingers. How would you like to spend your life on that bleak shore, surrounded by slatterns and sheep pellets? That was what my father meant for Petyr. Everyone thought it was because of that stupid duel with Brandon Stark, but that wasn’t so. Father said I ought to thank the gods that so great a lord as Jon Arryn was willing to take me soiled, but I knew it was only for the swords. I had to marry Jon, or my father would have turned me out as he did his brother, but it was Petyr I was meant for. I am telling you all this so you will understand how much we love each other, how long we have suffered and dreamed of one another. We made a baby together, a precious little baby.” Lysa put her hands flat against her belly, as if the child was still there. “When they stole him from me, I made a promise to myself that I would never let it happen again. Jon wished to send my sweet Robert to Dragonstone, and that sot of a king would have given him to Cersei Lannister, but I never let them . . . no more than I’ll let you steal my Petyr Littlefinger. Do you hear me, Alayne or Sansa or whatever you call yourself? Do you hear what I am telling you?”
“Yes. I swear, I won’t ever kiss him again, or . . . or entice him.” Sansa thought that was what her aunt wanted to hear.
“So you admit it now? It was you, just as I thought. You are as wanton as your mother.” Lysa grabbed her by the wrist. “Come with me now. There is something I want to show you.”
“You’re hurting me.” Sansa squirmed. “Please, Aunt Lysa, I haven’t done anything. I swear it.”
Her aunt ignored her protests. “Marillion!” she shouted. “I need you, Marillion! I need you!”
The singer had remained discreetly in the rear of the hall, but at Lady Arryn’s shout he came at once. “My lady?”
“Play us a song. Play ‘The False and the Fair.’”
Marillion’s fingers brushed the strings. “The lord he came a-riding upon a rainy day, hey-nonny, hey-nonny, hey-nonny-hey . . .”
Lady Lysa pulled at Sansa’s arm. It was either walk or be dragged, so she chose to walk, halfway down the hall and between a pair of pillars, to a white weirwood door set in the marble wall. The door was firmly closed, with three heavy bronze bars to hold it in place, but Sansa could hear the wind outside worrying at its edges. When she saw the crescent moon carved in the wood, she planted her feet. “The Moon Door.” She tried to yank free. “Why are you showing me the Moon Door?”
“You squeak like a mouse now, but you were bold enough in the garden, weren’t you? You were bold enough in the snow.”
“The lady sat a-sewing upon a rainy day,” Marillion sang. “Hey-nonny, hey-nonny, hey-nonny-hey.”
“Open the door,” Lysa commanded. “Open it, I say. You will do it, or I’ll send for my guards.” She shoved Sansa forward. “Your mother was brave, at least. Lift off the bars.”
If I do as she says, she will let me go. Sansa grabbed one of the bronze bars, yanked it loose, and tossed it down. The second bar clattered to the marble, then the third. She had barely touched the latch when the heavy wooden door flew inward and slammed back against the wall with a bang. Snow had piled up around the frame, and it all came blowing in at them, borne on a blast of cold air that left Sansa shivering. She tried to step backward, but her aunt was behind her. Lysa seized her by the wrist and put her other hand between her shoulder blades, propelling her forcefully toward the open door.
Beyond was white sky, falling snow, and nothing else.
“Look down,” said Lady Lysa. “Look down.”
She tried to wrench free, but her aunt’s fingers were digging into her arm like claws. Lysa gave her another shove, and Sansa shrieked. Her left foot broke through a crust of snow and knocked it loose. There was nothing in front of her but empty air, and a waycastle six hundred feet below clinging to the side of the mountain. “Don’t!” Sansa screamed. “You’re scaring me!” Behind her, Marillion was still playing his woodharp and singing, “Hey-nonny, hey-nonny, hey-nonny-hey.”
“Do you still want my leave to go? Do you?”
“No.” Sansa planted her feet and tried to squirm backward, but her aunt did not budge. “Not this way. Please . . .” She put a hand up, her fingers scrabbling at the doorframe, but she could not get a grip, and her feet were sliding on the wet marble floor. Lady Lysa pressed her forward inexorably. Her aunt outweighed her by three stone. “The lady lay a-kissing, upon a mound of hay,” Marillion was singing. Sansa twisted sideways, hysterical with fear, and one foot slipped out over the void. She screamed. “Hey-nonny, hey-nonny, hey-nonny-hey.” The wind flapped her skirts up and bit at her bare legs with cold teeth. She could feel snowflakes melting on her cheeks. Sansa flailed, found Lysa’s thick auburn braid, and clutched it tight. “My hair!” her aunt shrieked. “Let go of my hair!” She was shaking, sobbing. They teetered on the edge. Far off, she heard the guards pounding on the door with their spears, demanding to be let in. Marillion broke off his song.
“Lysa! What’s the meaning of this?” The shout cut through the sobs and heavy breathing. Footsteps echoed down the High Hall. “Get back from there! Lysa, what are you doing?” The guards were still beating at the door; Littlefinger had come in the back way, through the lords’ entrance behind the dais.
As Lysa turned, her grip loosened enough for Sansa to rip free. She stumbled to her knees, where Petyr Baelish saw her. He stopped suddenly. “Alayne. What is the trouble here?”
“Her.” Lady Lysa grabbed a handful of Sansa’s hair. “She’s the trouble. She kissed you.”
“Tell her,” Sansa begged. “Tell her we were just building a castle . . .”
“Be quiet!” her aunt screamed. “I never gave you leave to speak. No one cares about your castle.”
“She’s a child, Lysa. Cat’s daughter. What did you think you were doing?”
“I was going to marry her to Robert! She has no gratitude. No . . . no decency. You are not hers to kiss. Not hers! I was teaching her a lesson, that was all.”
“I see.” He stroked his chin. “I think she understands now. Isn’t that so, Alayne?”
“Yes,” sobbed Sansa. “I understand.”
“I don’t want her here.” Her aunt’s eyes were shiny with tears. “Why did you bring her to the Vale, Petyr? This isn’t her place. She doesn’t belong here.”
“We’ll send her away, then. Back to King’s Landing, if you like.” He took a step toward them. “Let her up, now. Let her away from the door.”
“NO!” Lysa gave Sansa’s head another wrench. Snow eddied around them, making their skirts snap noisily. “You can’t want her. You can’t. She’s a stupid empty-headed little girl. She doesn’t love you the way I have. I’ve always loved you. I’ve proved it, haven’t I?” Tears ran down her aunt’s puffy red face. “I gave you my maiden’s gift. I would have given you a son too, but they murdered him with moon tea, with tansy and mint and wormwood, a spoon of honey and a drop of pennyroyal. It wasn’t me, I never knew, I only drank what Father gave me . . .”
“That’s past and done, Lysa. Lord Hoster’s dead, and his old maester as well.” Littlefinger moved closer. “Have you been at the wine again? You ought not to talk so much. We don’t want Alayne to know more than she should, do we? Or Marillion?”
Lady Lysa ignored that. “Cat never gave you anything. It was me who got you your first post, who made Jon bring you to court so we could be close to one another. You promised me you would never forget that.”
“Nor have I. We’re together, just as you always wanted, just as we always planned. Just let go of Sansa’s hair . . .”
“I won’t! I saw you kissing in the snow. She’s just like her mother. Catelyn kissed you in the godswood, but she never meant it, she never wanted you. Why did you love her best? It was me, it was always meeee!”
“I know, love.” He took another step. “And I am here. All you need to do is take my hand, come on.” He held it out to her. “There’s no cause for all these tears.”
“Tears, tears, tears,” she sobbed hysterically. “No need for tears . . . but that’s not what you said in King’s Landing. You told me to put the tears in Jon’s wine, and I did. For Robert, and for us! And I wrote Catelyn and told her the Lannisters had killed my lord husband, just as you said. That was so clever . . . you were always clever, I told Father that, I said Petyr’s so clever, he’ll rise high, he will, he will, and he’s sweet and gentle and I have his little baby in my belly . . . Why did you kiss her? Why? We’re together now, we’re together after so long, so very long, why would you want to kiss herrrrrr?”
“Lysa,” Petyr sighed, “after all the storms we’ve suffered, you should trust me better. I swear, I shall never leave your side again, for as long as we both shall live.”
“Truly?” she asked, weeping. “Oh, truly?”
“Truly. Now unhand the girl and come give me a kiss.”
Lysa threw herself into Littlefinger’s arms, sobbing. As they hugged, Sansa crawled from the Moon Door on hands and knees and wrapped her arms around the nearest pillar. She could feel her heart pounding. There was snow in her hair and her right shoe was missing. It must have fallen. She shuddered, and hugged the pillar tighter.
Littlefinger let Lysa sob against his chest for a moment, then put his hands on her arms and kissed her lightly. “My sweet silly jealous wife,” he said, chuckling. “I’ve only loved one woman, I promise you.”
Lysa Arryn smiled tremulously. “Only one? Oh, Petyr, do you swear it? Only one?”
“Only Cat.” He gave her a short, sharp shove.
Lysa stumbled backward, her feet slipping on the wet marble. And then she was gone. She never screamed. For the longest time there was no sound but the wind.
Marillion gasped, “You . . . you . . .”
The guards were shouting outside the door, pounding with the butts of their heavy spears. Lord Petyr pulled Sansa to her feet. “You’re not hurt?” When she shook her head, he said, “Run let my guards in, then. Quick now, there’s no time to lose. This singer’s killed my lady wife.”

Once, when she was just a little girl, a wandering singer had stayed with them at Winterfell for half a year. An old man he was, with white hair and windburnt cheeks, but he sang of knights and quests and ladies fair, and Sansa had cried bitter tears when he left them, and begged her father not to let him go. “The man has played us every song he knows thrice over,” Lord Eddard told her gently. “I cannot keep him here against his will. You need not weep, though. I promise you, other singers will come.”
They hadn’t, though, not for a year or more. Sansa had prayed to the Seven in their sept and old gods of the heart tree, asking them to bring the old man back, or better still to send another singer, young and handsome. But the gods never answered, and the halls of Winterfell stayed silent.
But that was when she was a little girl, and foolish. She was a maiden now, three-and-ten and flowered. All her nights were full of song, and by day she prayed for silence.
If the Eyrie had been made like other castles, only rats and gaolers would have heard the dead man singing. Dungeon walls were thick enough to swallow songs and screams alike. But the sky cells had a wall of empty air, so every chord the dead man played flew free to echo off the stony shoulders of the Giant’s Lance. And the songs he chose . . . He sang of the Dance of the Dragons, of fair Jonquil and her fool, of Jenny of Oldstones and the Prince of Dragonflies. He sang of betrayals, and murders most foul, of hanged men and bloody vengeance. He sang of grief and sadness.
No matter where she went in the castle, Sansa could not escape the music. It floated up the winding tower steps, found her naked in her bath, supped with her at dusk, and stole into her bedchamber even when she latched the shutters tight. It came in on the cold thin air, and like the air, it chilled her. Though it had not snowed upon the Eyrie since the day that Lady Lysa fell, the nights had all been bitter cold.
The singer’s voice was strong and sweet. Sansa thought he sounded better than he ever had before, his voice richer somehow, full of pain and fear and longing. She did not understand why the gods would have given such a voice to such a wicked man. He would have taken me by force on the Fingers if Petyr had not set Ser Lothor to watch over me, she had to remind herself. And he played to drown out my cries when Aunt Lysa tried to kill me. 

That did not make the songs any easier to hear. “Please,” she begged Lord Petyr, “can’t you make him stop?”
“I gave the man my word, sweetling.” Petyr Baelish, Lord of Harrenhal, Lord Paramount of the Trident, and Lord Protector of the Eyrie and the Vale of Arryn, looked up from the letter he was writing. He had written a hundred letters since Lady Lysa’s fall. Sansa had seen the ravens coming and going from the rookery. “I’d sooner suffer his singing than listen to his sobbing.”
It is better that he sings, yes, but . . .  “Must he play all night, my lord? Lord Robert cannot sleep. He cries . . .”
“. . . for his mother. That cannot be helped, the wench is dead.” Petyr shrugged. “It will not be much longer. Lord Nestor is making his ascent on the morrow.”
Sansa had met Lord Nestor Royce once before, after Petyr’s wedding to her aunt. Royce was the Keeper of the Gates of the Moon, the great castle that stood at the base of the mountain and guarded the steps up to the Eyrie. The wedding party had guested with him overnight before beginning their ascent. Lord Nestor had scarce looked at her twice, but the prospect of him coming here terrified her. He was High Steward of the Vale as well, Jon Arryn’s trusted liege man, and Lady Lysa’s. “He won’t . . . you won’t let Lord Nestor see Marillion, will you?”
Her horror must have shown on her face, since Petyr put down his quill. “On the contrary. I shall insist on it.” He beckoned her to take the seat beside him. “We have come to an agreement, Marillion and I. Mord can be most persuasive. And if our singer disappoints us and sings a song we do not care to hear, why, you and I need only say he lies. Whom do you imagine Lord Nestor will believe?”
“Us?” Sansa wished she could be certain.
“Of course. Our lies will profit him.”
The solar was warm, the fire crackling merrily, but Sansa shivered all the same. “Yes, but . . . but what if . . .”
“What if Lord Nestor values honor more than profit?” Petyr put his arm around her. “What if it is truth he wants, and justice for his murdered lady?” He smiled. “I know Lord Nestor, sweetling. Do you imagine I’d ever let him harm my daughter?” 
I am not your daughter, she thought. I am Sansa Stark, Lord Eddard’s daughter and Lady Catelyn’s, the blood of Winterfell. She did not say it, though. If not for Petyr Baelish it would have been Sansa who went spinning through a cold blue sky to stony death six hundred feet below, instead of Lysa Arryn. He is so bold. Sansa wished she had his courage. She wanted to crawl back into bed and hide beneath her blanket, to sleep and sleep. She had not slept a whole night through since Lysa Arryn’s death. “Couldn’t you tell Lord Nestor that I am . . . indisposed, or . . .”
“He will want to hear your account of Lysa’s death.”
“My lord, if . . . if Marillion tells what truly . . .”
“If he lies, you mean?” 
“Lies? Yes . . . if he lies, if it is my tale against his, and Lord Nestor looks in my eyes and sees how scared I am . . .”
“A touch of fear will not be out of place, Alayne. You’ve seen a fearful thing. Nestor will be moved.” Petyr studied her eyes, as if seeing them for the first time. “You have your mother’s eyes. Honest eyes, and innocent. Blue as a sunlit sea. When you are a little older, many a man will drown in those eyes.”
Sansa did not know what to say to that.
“All you need do is tell Lord Nestor the same tale that you told Lord Robert,” Petyr went on. 
Robert is only a sick little boy, she thought, Lord Nestor is a man grown, stern and suspicious. Robert was not strong and had to be protected, even from the truth. “Some lies are love,” Petyr had assured her. She reminded him of that. “When we lied to Lord Robert, that was just to spare him,” she said. 
“And this lie may spare us. Else you and I must leave the Eyrie by the same door Lysa used.” Petyr picked up his quill again. “We shall serve him lies and Arbor gold, and he’ll drink them down and ask for more, I promise you.” 
He is serving me lies as well, Sansa realized. They were comforting lies, though, and she thought them kindly meant. A lie is not so bad if it is kindly meant. If only she believed them . . . 
The things her aunt had said just before she fell still troubled Sansa greatly. “Ravings,” Petyr called them. “My wife was mad, you saw that for yourself.” And so she had. All I did was build a snow castle, and she meant to push me out the Moon Door. Petyr saved me. He loved my mother well, and . . . 

And her? How could she doubt it? He had saved her.
He saved Alayne, his daughter, a voice within her whispered. But she was Sansa too . . . and sometimes it seemed to her that the Lord Protector was two people as well. He was Petyr, her protector, warm and funny and gentle . . . but he was also Littlefinger, the lord she’d known at King’s Landing, smiling slyly and stroking his beard as he whispered in Queen Cersei’s ear. And Littlefinger was no friend of hers. When Joff had her beaten, the Imp defended her, not Littlefinger. When the mob sought to rape her, the Hound carried her to safety, not Littlefinger. When the Lannisters wed her to Tyrion against her will, Ser Garlan the Gallant gave her comfort, not Littlefinger. Littlefinger never lifted so much as his little finger for her. 
Except to get me out. He did that for me. I thought it was Ser Dontos, my poor old drunken Florian, but it was Petyr all the while. Littlefinger was only a mask he had to wear. Only sometimes Sansa found it hard to tell where the man ended and the mask began. Littlefinger and Lord Petyr looked so very much alike. She would have fled them both, perhaps, but there was nowhere for her to go. Winterfell was burned and desolate, Bran and Rickon dead and cold. Robb had been betrayed and murdered at the Twins, along with their lady mother. Tyrion had been put to death for killing Joffrey, and if she ever returned to King’s Landing the queen would have her head as well. The aunt she’d hoped would keep her safe had tried to murder her instead. Her uncle Edmure was a captive of the Freys, while her great-uncle the Blackfish was under siege at Riverrun. I have no place but here, Sansa thought miserably, and no true friend but Petyr. 

That night the dead man sang “The Day They Hanged Black Robin,” “The Mother’s Tears,” and “The Rains of Castamere.” Then he stopped for a while, but just as Sansa began to drift off he started to play again. He sang “Six Sorrows,” “Fallen Leaves,” and “Alysanne.” Such sad songs, she thought. When she closed her eyes she could see him in his sky cell, huddled in a corner away from the cold black sky, crouched beneath a fur with his woodharp cradled against his chest. I must not pity him, she told herself. He was vain and cruel, and soon he will be dead. She could not save him. And why should she want to? Marillion tried to rape her, and Petyr had saved her life not once but twice. Some lies you have to tell. Lies had been all that kept her alive in King’s Landing. If she had not lied to Joffrey, his Kingsguard would have beat her bloody. 
After “Alysanne” the singer stopped again, long enough for Sansa to snatch an hour’s rest. But as the first light of dawn was prying at her shutters, she heard the soft strains of “On a Misty Morn” drifting up from below, and woke at once. That was more properly a woman’s song, a lament sung by a mother on the dawn after some terrible battle, as she searches amongst the dead for the body of her only son. The mother sings her grief for her dead son, Sansa thought, but Marillion grieves for his fingers, for his eyes. The words rose like arrows and pierced her in the darkness.

Oh, have you seen my boy, good ser? 
His hair is chestnut brown
He promised he’d come back to me 
Our home’s in Wendish Town.

Sansa covered her ears with a goose down pillow to shut out the rest of it, but it was no good. Day had come and she had woken, and Lord Nestor Royce was coming up the mountain.
The High Steward and his party reached the Eyrie in the late afternoon, with the valley gold and red beneath them and the wind rising. He brought his son Ser Albar, along with a dozen knights and a score of men-at-arms. So many strangers. Sansa looked at their faces anxiously, wondering if they were friends or foes.
Petyr welcomed his visitors in a black velvet doublet with grey sleeves that matched his woolen breeches and lent a certain darkness to his grey-green eyes. Maester Colemon stood beside him, his chain of many metals hanging loose about his long, skinny neck. Although the maester was much the taller of the two men, it was the Lord Protector who drew the eye. He had put away his smiles for the day, it seemed. He listened solemnly as Royce introduced the knights who had accompanied him, then said, “My lords are welcome here. You know our Maester Colemon, of course. Lord Nestor, you will recall Alayne, my natural daughter?”
“To be sure.” Lord Nestor Royce was a bullnecked, barrel-chested, balding man with a grey-shot beard and a stern look. He inclined his head a whole half inch in greeting.
Sansa curtsied, too frightened to speak for fear she might misspeak. Petyr drew her to her feet. “Sweetling, be a good girl and bring Lord Robert to the High Hall to receive his guests.”
“Yes, Father.” Her voice sounded thin and strained. A liar’s voice, she thought as she hurried up the steps and across the gallery to the Moon Tower. A guilty voice.

Gretchel and Maddy were helping Robert Arryn squirm into his breeches when Sansa stepped into his bedchamber. The Lord of the Eyrie had been crying again. His eyes were red and raw, his lashes crusty, his nose swollen and runny. A trail of snot glistened underneath one nostril, and his lower lip was bloody where he’d bitten it. Lord Nestor must not see him like this, Sansa thought, despairing. “Gretchel, fetch me the washbasin.” She took the boy by the hand and drew him to the bed. “Did my Sweetrobin sleep well last night?” 
“No.” He sniffed. “I never slept one bit, Alayne. He was singing again, and my door was locked. I called for them to let me out, but no one ever came. Someone locked me in my room.”
“That was wicked of them.” Dipping a soft cloth into the warm water, she began to clean his face . . . gently, oh so gently. If you scrubbed Robert too briskly, he might begin to shake. The boy was frail, and terribly small for his age. He was eight, but Sansa had known bigger five-year-olds.
Robert’s lip quivered. “I was going to come sleep with you.”
I know you were. Sweetrobin had been accustomed to crawling in beside his mother, until she wed Lord Petyr. Since Lady Lysa’s death he had taken to wandering the Eyrie in quest of other beds. The one he liked best was Sansa’s . . . which was why she had asked Ser Lothor Brune to lock his door last night. She would not have minded if he only slept, but he was always trying to nuzzle at her breasts, and when he had his shaking spells he often wet the bed. 
“Lord Nestor Royce has come up from the Gates to see you.” Sansa wiped beneath his nose. 
“I don’t want to see him,” he said. “I want a story. A story of the Winged Knight.”
“After,” Sansa said. “First you must see Lord Nestor.”
“Lord Nestor has a mole,” he said, squirming. Robert was afraid of men with moles. “Mommy said he was dreadful.” 
“My poor Sweetrobin.” Sansa smoothed his hair back. “You miss her, I know. Lord Petyr misses her too. He loved her just as you do.” That was a lie, though kindly meant. The only woman Petyr ever loved was Sansa’s murdered mother. He had confessed as much to Lady Lysa just before he pushed her out the Moon Door. She was mad and dangerous. She murdered her own lord husband, and would have murdered me if Petyr had not come along to save me. 

Robert did not need to know that, though. He was only a sick little boy who’d loved his mother. “There,” Sansa said, “you look a proper lord now. Maddy, fetch his cloak.” It was lambswool, soft and warm, a handsome sky-blue that set off the cream color of his tunic. She fastened it about his shoulders with a silver brooch in the shape of a crescent moon, and took him by the hand. Robert came meekly for once.
The High Hall had been closed since Lady Lysa’s fall, and it gave Sansa a chill to enter it again. The hall was long and grand and beautiful, she supposed, but she did not like it here. It was a pale cold place at the best of times. The slender pillars looked like fingerbones, and the blue veins in the white marble brought to mind the veins in an old crone’s legs. Though fifty silver sconces lined the walls, less than a dozen torches had been lit, so shadows danced upon the floors and pooled in every corner. Their footsteps echoed off the marble, and Sansa could hear the wind rattling at the Moon Door. I must not look at it, she told herself, else I’ll start to shake as badly as Robert.

With Maddy’s help, she got Robert seated on his weirwood throne with a stack of pillows underneath him and sent word that his lordship would receive his guests. Two guards in sky-blue cloaks opened the doors at the lower end of the hall, and Petyr ushered them in and down the long blue carpet that ran between the rows of bone-white pillars.
The boy greeted Lord Nestor with squeaky courtesy and made no mention of his mole. When the High Steward asked about his lady mother, Robert’s hands began to tremble ever so slightly. “Marillion hurt my mother. He threw her out the Moon Door.”
“Did your lordship see this happen?” asked Ser Marwyn Belmore, a lanky ginger-headed knight who had been Lysa’s captain of guards till Petyr had put Ser Lothor Brune in his place.
“Alayne saw it,” the boy said. “And my lord stepfather.”
Lord Nestor looked at her. Ser Albar, Ser Marwyn, Maester Colemon, all of them were looking. She was my aunt but she wanted to kill me, Sansa thought. She dragged me to the Moon Door and tried to push me out. I never wanted a kiss, I was building a castle in the snow. She hugged herself to keep from shaking.
“Forgive her, my lords,” Petyr Baelish said softly. “She still has nightmares of that day. Small wonder if she cannot bear to speak of it.” He came up behind her and put his hands gently on her shoulders. “I know how hard this is for you, Alayne, but our friends must hear the truth.”
“Yes.” Her throat felt so dry and tight it almost hurt to speak. “I saw . . . I was with the Lady Lysa when . . .” A tear rolled down her cheek. That’s good, a tear is good. “. . . when Marillion . . . pushed her.” And she told the tale again, hardly hearing the words as they spilled out of her. 
Before she was half-done Robert began to cry, the pillows shifting perilously beneath him. “He killed my mother. I want him to fly!” The trembling in his hands had grown worse, and his arms were shaking too. The boy’s head jerked and his teeth began to chatter. “Fly!” he shrieked. “Fly, fly.” His arms and legs flailed wildly. Lothor Brune strode to the dais in time to catch the boy as he slipped from his throne. Maester Colemon was just a step behind, though there was naught that he could do.
Helpless as the rest, Sansa could only stand and watch as the shaking spell ran its course. One of Robert’s legs kicked Ser Lothor in the face. Brune cursed, but still held on as the boy twitched and flailed and wet himself. Their visitors said not a word; Lord Nestor at least had seen these fits before. It was long moments before Robert’s spasms began to subside, and seemed even longer. By the end, the little lordling was so weak he could not stand. “Best take his lordship back to bed and bleed him,” Lord Petyr said. Brune lifted the boy in his arms and carried him from the hall. Maester Colemon followed, grim-faced.
When their footsteps died away there was no sound in the High Hall of the Eyrie. Sansa could hear the night wind moaning outside and scratching at the Moon Door. She was very cold and very tired. Must I tell the tale again? she wondered. 
But she must have told it well enough. Lord Nestor cleared his throat. “I misliked that singer from the first,” he grumbled. “I urged Lady Lysa to send him away. Many a time I urged her.”
“You always gave her good counsel, my lord,” Petyr said.
“She took no heed of it,” Royce complained. “She heard me grudgingly and took no heed.” 
“My lady was too trusting for this world.” Petyr spoke so tenderly that Sansa would have believed he’d loved his wife. “Lysa could not see the evil in men, only the good. Marillion sang sweet songs, and she mistook that for his nature.”
“He called us pigs,” Ser Albar Royce said. A blunt broad-shouldered knight who shaved his chin but cultivated thick black side-whiskers that framed his homely face like hedgerows, Ser Albar was a younger version of his father. “He made a song about two pigs snuffling round a mountain, eating a falcon’s leavings. That was meant to be us, but when I said so he laughed at me. ‘Why, ser, ’tis a song about some pigs,’ he said.”
“He made mock of me as well,” Ser Marwyn Belmore said. “Ser Ding-Dong, he named me. When I vowed I’d cut his tongue out, he ran to Lady Lysa and hid behind her skirts.” 
“As oft he did,” Lord Nestor said. “The man was craven, but the favor Lady Lysa showed him made him insolent. She dressed him like a lord, gave him gold rings and a moonstone belt.”
“Even Lord Jon’s favorite falcon.” The knight’s doublet showed the six white candles of Waxley. “His lordship loved that bird. King Robert gave it to him.”
Petyr Baelish sighed. “It was unseemly,” he agreed, “and I put an end to it. Lysa agreed to send him away. That was why she met him here, that day. I should have been with her, but I never dreamt . . . if I had not insisted . . . it was I who killed her.”
No, Sansa thought, you mustn’t say that, you mustn’t tell them, you mustn’t. But Albar Royce was shaking his head. “No, my lord, you must not blame yourself,” he said. 
“This was the singer’s work,” his father agreed. “Bring him up, Lord Petyr. Let us write an end to this sorry business.”
Petyr Baelish composed himself, and said, “As you wish, my lord.” He turned to his guardsmen and spoke a command, and the singer was fetched up from the dungeons. The gaoler Mord came with him, a monstrous man with small black eyes and a lopsided, scarred face. One ear and part of his cheek had been cleaved off in some battle, but twenty stone of pallid white flesh remained. His clothes fit poorly and had a rank, ripe smell.
Marillion by contrast looked almost elegant. Someone had bathed him and dressed him in a pair of sky-blue breeches and a loose-fitting white tunic with puffed sleeves, belted with a silvery sash that had been a gift from Lady Lysa. White silk gloves covered his hands, while a white silk bandage spared the lords the sight of his eyes. 
Mord stood behind him with a lash. When the gaoler prodded him in the ribs, the singer went to one knee. “Good lords, I beg your forgiveness.”
Lord Nestor scowled. “You confess your crime?”
“If I had eyes I should weep.” The singer’s voice, so strong and sure by night, was cracked and whispery now. “I loved her so, I could not bear to see her in another’s arms, to know she shared his bed. I meant no harm to my sweet lady, I swear it. I barred the door so no one could disturb us whilst I declared my passion, but Lady Lysa was so cold . . . when she told that she was carrying Lord Petyr’s child, a . . . a madness seized me . . .”
Sansa stared at his hands while he spoke. Fat Maddy claimed that Mord had taken off three of his fingers, both pinkies and a ring finger. His little fingers did appear somewhat stiffer than the others, but with those gloves it was hard to be certain. It might have been no more than a story. How would Maddy know?

“Lord Petyr has been kind enough to let me keep my harp,” the blind singer said. “My harp and . . . my tongue . . . so I may sing my songs. Lady Lysa dearly loved my singing . . .”
“Take this creature away, or I’m like to kill him myself,” Lord Nestor growled. “It sickens me to look at him.”
“Mord, take him back to his sky cell,” said Petyr.
“Yes, m’lord.” Mord grabbed Marillion roughly by the collar. “No more mouth.” When he spoke, Sansa saw to her astonishment that the gaoler’s teeth were made of gold. They watched as he half dragged half shoved the singer toward the doors. 
“The man must die,” Ser Marywn Belmore declared when they were gone. “He should have followed Lady Lysa out the Moon Door.”
“Without his tongue,” Ser Albar Royce added. “Without that lying, mocking tongue.”
“I have been too gentle with him, I know,” Petyr Baelish said in an apologetic tone. “If truth be told, I pity him. He killed for love.” 
“For love or hate,” said Belmore, “he must die.”
“Soon enough,” Lord Nestor said gruffly. “No man lingers long in the sky cells. The blue will call to him.”
“It may,” said Petyr Baelish, “but whether Marillion will answer, only he can say.” He gestured, and his guardsmen opened the doors at the far end of the hall. “Sers, I know you must be weary after your ascent. Rooms have been prepared for all of you to spend the night, and food and wine await you in the Lower Hall. Oswell, show them the way, and see that they have all they need.” He turned to Nestor Royce. “My lord, will you join me in the solar for a cup of wine? Alayne, sweetling, come pour for us.” 
A low fire burned in the solar, where a flagon of wine awaited them. Arbor gold. Sansa filled Lord Nestor’s cup whilst Petyr prodded at the logs with an iron poker.
Lord Nestor seated himself beside the fire. “This will not be the end of it,” he said to Petyr, as if Sansa were not there. “My cousin means to question the singer himself.”
“Bronze Yohn mistrusts me.” Petyr pushed a log aside.
“He means to come in force. Symond Templeton will join him, do not doubt it. And Lady Waynwood too, I fear.”
“And Lord Belmore, Young Lord Hunter, Horton Redfort. They will bring Strong Sam Stone, the Tolletts, the Shetts, the Coldwaters, some Corbrays.”
“You are well-informed. Which Corbrays? Not Lord Lyonel?”
“No, his brother. Ser Lyn mislikes me, for some reason.”
“Lyn Corbray is a dangerous man,” Lord Nestor said doggedly. “What do you intend to do?”
“What can I do but make them welcome if they come?” Petyr gave the flames another stir and set the poker down.
“My cousin means to remove you as Lord Protector.”
“If so, I cannot stop him. I keep a garrison of twenty men. Lord Royce and his friends can raise twenty thousand.” Petyr went to the oaken chest that sat beneath the window. “Bronze Yohn will do what he will do,” he said, kneeling. He opened the chest, drew out a roll of parchment, and brought it to Lord Nestor. “My lord. This is a token of the love my lady bore you.”
Sansa watched Royce unroll the parchment. “This . . . this is unexpected, my lord.” She was startled to see tears in his eyes. 
“Unexpected, but not undeserved. My lady valued you above all her other bannermen. You were her rock, she told me.”
“Her rock.” Lord Nestor reddened. “She said that?”
“Often. And this”—Petyr gestured at the parchment—“is the proof of it.”
“That . . . that is good to know. Jon Arryn valued my service, I know, but Lady Lysa . . . she scorned me when I came to court her, and I feared . . .” Lord Nestor furrowed his brow. “It bears the Arryn seal, I see, but the signature . . .”
“Lysa was murdered before the document could be presented for her signature, so I signed as Lord Protector. I knew that would have been her wish.”
“I see.” Lord Nestor rolled the parchment. “You are . . . dutiful, my lord. Aye, and not without courage. Some will call this grant unseemly, and fault you for making it. The Keeper’s post has never been hereditary. The Arryns raised the Gates, in the days when they still wore the Falcon Crown and ruled the Vale as kings. The Eyrie was their summer seat, but when the snows began to fall the court would make its descent. Some would say the Gates were as royal as the Eyrie.”
“There has been no king in the Vale for three hundred years,” Petyr Baelish pointed out. 
“The dragons came,” Lord Nestor agreed. “But even after, the Gates remained an Arryn castle. Jon Arryn himself was Keeper of the Gates whilst his father lived. After his ascent, he named his brother Ronnel to the honor, and later his cousin Denys.”
“Lord Robert has no brothers, and only distant cousins.”
“True.” Lord Nestor clutched the parchment tightly. “I will not say I had not hoped for this. Whilst Lord Jon ruled the realm as Hand, it fell to me to rule the Vale for him. I did all that he required of me and asked nothing for myself. But by the gods, I earned this!” 
“You did,” said Petyr, “and Lord Robert sleeps more easily knowing that you are always there, a staunch friend at the foot of his mountain.” He raised a cup. “So . . . a toast, my lord. To House Royce, Keepers of the Gates of the Moon . . . now and forever.”
“Now and forever, aye!” The silver cups crashed together.
Later, much later, after the flagon of Arbor gold was dry, Lord Nestor took his leave to rejoin his company of knights. Sansa was asleep on her feet by then, wanting only to crawl off to her bed, but Petyr caught her by the wrist. “You see the wonders that can be worked with lies and Arbor gold?”
Why did she feel like weeping? It was good that Nestor Royce was with them. “Were they all lies?”
“Not all. Lysa often called Lord Nestor a rock, though I do not think she meant it as a compliment. She called his son a clod. She knew Lord Nestor dreamed of holding the Gates in his own right, a lord in truth as well as name, but Lysa dreamed of other sons and meant the castle to go to Robert’s little brother.” He stood. “Do you understand what happened here, Alayne?”
Sansa hesitated a moment. “You gave Lord Nestor the Gates of the Moon to be certain of his support.”
“I did,” Petyr admitted, “but our rock is a Royce, which is to say he is overproud and prickly. Had I asked him his price, he would have swelled up like an angry toad at the slight upon his honor. But this way . . . the man is not utterly stupid, but the lies I served him were sweeter than the truth. He wants to believe that Lysa valued him above her other bannermen. One of those others is Bronze Yohn, after all, and Nestor is very much aware that he was born of the lesser branch of House Royce. He wants more for his son. Men of honor will do things for their children that they would never consider doing for themselves.”
She nodded. “The signature . . . you might have had Lord Robert put his hand and seal to it, but instead . . .”
“. . . I signed myself, as Lord Protector. Why?”
“So . . . if you are removed, or . . . or killed . . .”
“. . . Lord Nestor’s claim to the Gates will suddenly be called into question. I promise you, that is not lost on him. It was clever of you to see it. Though no more than I’d expect of mine own daughter.”
“Thank you.” She felt absurdly proud for puzzling it out, but confused as well. “I’m not, though. Your daughter. Not truly. I mean, I pretend to be Alayne, but you know . . .”
Littlefinger put a finger to her lips. “I know what I know, and so do you. Some things are best left unsaid, sweetling.”
“Even when we are alone?” 
“Especially when we are alone. Elsewise a day will come when a servant walks into a room unannounced, or a guardsman at the door chances to hear something he should not. Do you want more blood on your pretty little hands, my darling?” 
Marillion’s face seemed to float before her, the bandage pale across his eyes. Behind him she could see Ser Dontos, the crossbow bolts still in him. “No,” Sansa said. “Please.”
“I am tempted to say this is no game we play, daughter, but of course it is. The game of thrones.” 
I never asked to play. The game was too dangerous. One slip and I am dead. “Oswell . . . my lord, Oswell rowed me from King’s Landing the night that I escaped. He must know who I am.”
“If he’s half as clever as a sheep pellet, you would think so. Ser Lothor knows as well. But Oswell has been in my service a long time, and Brune is close-mouthed by nature. Kettleblack watches Brune for me, and Brune watches Kettleblack. Trust no one, I once told Eddard Stark, but he would not listen. You are Alayne, and you must be Alayne all the time.” He put two fingers on her left breast. “Even here. In your heart. Can you do that? Can you be my daughter in your heart?”
“I . . .” I do not know, my lord, she almost said, but that was not what he wanted to hear. Lies and Arbor gold, she thought. “I am Alayne, Father. Who else would I be?” 
Lord Littlefinger kissed her cheek. “With my wits and Cat’s beauty, the world will be yours, sweetling. Now off to bed.”
Gretchel had laid a fire in her hearth and plumped her featherbed. Sansa undressed and slipped beneath the blankets. He will not sing tonight, she prayed, not with Lord Nestor and the others in the castle. He would not dare. She closed her eyes.
Sometime during the night she woke, as little Robert climbed up into her bed. I forgot to tell Lothor to lock him in again, she realized. There was nothing to be done for it, so she put her arm around him. “Sweetrobin? You can stay, but try not to squirm around. Just close your eyes and sleep, little one.”
“I will.” He cuddled close and laid his head between her breasts. “Alayne? Are you my mother now?”
“I suppose I am,” she said. If a lie was kindly meant, there was no harm in it.

